(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“Tell us in the comments!”
“Watch it here:Fallon has chatted with multiple members of the Star Wars cast over past few weeks, including John Boyega, who talked about Prince Harry’s and Prince William’s cameos in the upcoming film:Are you seeing Star Wars: The Last Jedi this weekend?”
“Yoda, Darth Vader, C-3PO, and Jabba the Hutt all make appearances in the funny video.”
“In honor of Star Wars: The Last Jedi hitting theaters this week, Jimmy Fallon and the Tonight Show team made a hilarious mashup video of characters from all the movies singing “MMMBop” by Hanson.”
“This is the Star Wars mashup we’re looking for.”
“He may be small in stature, but this Jedi master, who was rendered in CGI in the Star Wars prequels, wields one heck of a lightsaber.”


"Tell us in the comments!"
"Be careful here: Fallon has been chatting with several members of the Star Wars crew over the past few weeks, including John Boiga, about Prince Harry and Prince William's cameo in the upcoming movie: are you watching Star Wars: the last Jedi of the weekend?"
"Yoda, Darth Vader, C-3PO and Jabba the Hutt are all in this interesting video."
In honor of this week's Star Wars: the last Jedi, Jimmy Fallon and the tonight show team produced a funny mashup video with all the characters singing Hansen's mmmbop
"This is the Star Wars mashup we're looking for."
"He may be short, but the Jedi Master in Star Wars prequel uses CGI to present himself with a lightsaber."



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Week pulling off some killer looks that only a fashion trendsetter could...”
“...comes to fashion and sports thousands of dollars worth of clothing by some of the top designers Recently she s been traveling the world on her Spider Man Homecoming press tour and making an appearance at Paris Haute Couture Fashion...”
“You can catch the quadruple threat actress singer dancer and designer at any red carpet press event or even just walking the streets in her eye catching style Working with her stylist Law Roach Zendaya pushes the envelope when it...”
“Former Disney star Zendaya is on top of her fashion game lately, thanks to her killer sense of style.”


"This week, we will launch some killer models that only fashion leaders can do..."
“… Coming to fashion and sports, thousands of dollars worth of clothing by some of the top designers, she recently traveled around the world on her spider man homecoming news tour and made her debut at the Paris haute couture show
"You can capture the quadruple menace at any red carpet press conference, actress, singer, dancer and designer, and even just walk down the street in her eye-catching style and work with her stylist, rocky zendaya, when it comes to it
"Zendaya, a former Disney star, has recently been at the top of the fashion world, thanks to her devastating sense of fashion."



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple announced their engagement few months later and they have now three children together.”
“Two years after his retirement from the sport, the once-married former NFL player started dating singer Jessica Simpson.”
“The following year he got re-signed by the team, but the Saints released him for good on July 31, 2008.”
“He remained with the San Francisco 49ers until 2006, and he signed a one-year contract with the New Orleans Saints in 2007.”
“But still, he did miss all of the 2003 and 2005seasons, due to injuries.”
“When healthy, he was a big contributor to the 49ers passing game.”
“He turned pro after he was drafted by the San Francisco 49ers in the seventh round of the 2001 NFL Draft.”
“He was the one to catch 21 receptions for 244 yards in Yale's come-from-behind victory against Harvard in 1999, including the game-winning touchdown catch.”
“Athletically gifted Johnson first got the chance to flaunt his football skills on a wider scale at Yale, where he played as a wide receiver.”
“Born Eric Maxwell Johnson on September 15, 1979, in Needham, Massachusetts, US, he played as a tight end in the National Football League.”


"The couple announced their engagement a few months later and now have three children together."
Two years after retiring, the once married former NFL player began dating singer Jessica Simpson
"The next year he was re signed by the team, but the saints released him forever on July 31, 2008."
"He stayed with the San Francisco 49ers until 2006, when he signed a one-year contract with the New Orleans Saints in 2007."
"However, due to injury, he did miss all the seasons in 2003 and 2005
"When he's healthy, he's an important contributor to the 49 man pass game."
"After being selected by the San Francisco 49ers in the seventh round of the 2001 NFL draft, he became a professional player."
"He was the man who received the ball 21 times at 244 yards in the 1999 Yale Harvard game, including the touchdown that won the game."
"For the first time, the athletic Johnson had a chance to show off his football skills on a larger scale at Yale University, where he was a catcher on the wing."
"Eric Maxwell Johnson was born in Needham, Massachusetts on September 15, 1979. He is a tough guy in the National Football League."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So get voting now, because a mind filled with Real Housewives knowledge is a terrible thing to waste.”
“Luann will discuss her divorce with the WWHL host from her home in the Hamptons.”
“Create a free profile to get unlimited access to exclusive videos, sweepstakes, and more!”
“Luann de Lesseps will sit down with Andy Cohen to discuss her split from Tom D'Agostino at her home in Sag Harbor on Wednesday, September 6 at 11/10c.”
“The special, Watch What Happens Live One-on-One with Luann de Lesseps, will mark her first interview of this nature since announcing her divorce earlier this month.”
“Check out a preview of the interview, above.”
“The Real Housewives of New York City mom will get candid about the red flags she ignored, the rumors surrounding Tom's loyalty to the Big Apple pal and what finally led to the separation.”
“Andy and Luann will sit down and discuss her split from Tom in an interview debuting on September 6.”
“And don't forget to tune in this Wednesday, August 30, at 8/9c to check out Part 3 of the RHONY Season 9 reunion.”
“Until then, be sure to check out all things Real Housewives Awards at Bravotv.com/RHAwards for lots more fun and extra credit.”


"So vote now, because a mind full of real housewife knowledge is a terrible waste."
"Luan will be at her home in Hampton to discuss the divorce with wwhl hosts."
"Create a free profile to get unlimited exclusive videos, raffles, etc!"
"LuAnn de Lesseps will discuss her breakup with Tom D'Agostino with Andy Cohen at her home in port saga on September 6 (Wednesday) at 11 / 10."
"The special," one-on-one live observation of what happened with Luan de Lesseps, "will be her first such interview since she announced her divorce earlier this month
"Please see the interview preview above."
"The mothers of Real Housewives in New York City will be honest about the danger signs she ignored, the rumors about Tom's loyalty to big apple friends, and the reasons that eventually led to the breakup."
"Andy and Luan will sit down and discuss her breakup with Tom in the premiere interview on September 6."
"Don't forget to watch the third episode of Lonnie's season 9 reunion at 8:9am on Wednesday, August 30."
"Before that, be sure to look at everything, the real housewife award Bravotv.com/RHAwards Get more fun and extra credit. "



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...say...”
“After peering into the small slot that a patient lies in as their body is scanned the Duke joked I wouldn t like to lie in there for too much I m not sure it s as roomy as they...”
“The equipment will be trialled at the end of the year but only the MR (magnetic resonance) imaging facility will be used, with the radiotherapy to follow.”
“...targeted precisely in real time...”
“William who is the hospital s president was also shown a 10 million MR Linac scanner the first of its kind in the country that combines radiotherapy treatment with traditional imaging and has the potential to allow tumours to be...”
“She said: "We just introduced him as William, he was really relaxed and friendly and spent a lot of time talking to the patients, not many people spotted him - one lady said he was a lookalike."”
“...that visit...”
“Patient Charlie Miller three with parents Daryl and Sally Credit PA Radiotherapy aid Fiona Bragg 55 who had previously met William at the south London hospital in 2005 recalled how she showed the Duke how to check patients in during...”
“"And being a dad with two young children you can see how he relates very well to the children."”
“Mr Wood, 45, added: "It's particularly nice he's come around, it shows he's interested in the Royal Marsden and the patients - it gives a boost to everyone.”


“… Say... "
"When a patient was lying in a slit for a body scan, the Duke looked and joked that I didn't want to lie there too long. I'm not sure if it was as spacious as they were..."
The device will be on trial by the end of the year, but will only use MRI equipment, followed by radiotherapy
“… Real time precise positioning... "
"Hospital President William also showed a 10 million magnetic resonance linear accelerator scanner, which is the first scanner in China to combine radiotherapy with traditional imaging, and it is likely to make tumors grow
"We just introduced him as William, and he's really relaxed, friendly, spent a lot of time talking to patients, and not many people found him - a woman said he looks like him," she said
“… That visit... "
"Patient Charlie Miller III with parents Daryl and Sally credit PA radiotherapy aid Fiona Bragg 55 who had met William at South London hospital in 2005 recalled how she showed the Duke how to examine patients in
"As a father of two, you can see that he gets on well with the children."
Mr Wood, 45, added: "it's great that he's back, which shows that he's interested in the Royal Marsden Hospital and the patients - it helps everyone."



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See a sneak peek of all the pieces in the line at Target.com.”
“In fact, it even has a whole assortment of wreaths, ornaments and stockings that will let you channel your inner Joanna as you get your house ready for Santa.”
“That’s because Chip and Joanna Gaines’ new line, Hearth and Hand, will officially be launching at Target stores and Target.com.”
“While we're still mourning the announcement that "Fixer Upper" is ending, Chip and Joanna Gaines have more in store for us.”
“Nathan Congleton / NBCThe collection was created exclusively for Target in collaboration with the HGTV couple’s home and lifestyle brand, Magnolia.”
“From home decor to family sleepwear, the line features pieces in the rustic-chic style we’ve come to love and expect from the duo — and at a fraction of the cost.”
“For example, items like these embroidered placemats start at just $4.99.”
“(Score!)”
“The icing on top of the Magnolia cake?”
“The line comes at the perfect time for holiday shopping and decorating.”


"Take a look at all the clips on this line" target website
"In fact, it even has a variety of wreaths, decorations and stockings that allow you to guide your inner Joanna as you prepare the house for Santa."
"This is because chip and Joanna Gaines' new product line, stoves and hands, will officially launch target websites in target stores and stores."
"While we mourn the news that shoeshine is coming to an end, chip and Joanna Gaines have prepared more for us."
"Nathan congleton / NBC is a collaboration between target and Magnolia, the HGTV couple's home and lifestyle brand."
"From home decor to pajamas, this range of products adopts the simple and chic style that we love and expect from this combination - and it's very cheap."
"For example, items like these embroidered cushions start at just $4.99."
"(score!)"
"The icing on the Mulan cake?"
"This line is the perfect time for holiday shopping and decoration."



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Emma Baty Emma Baty is the Associate Entertainment Editor at Cosmopolitan who focuses on movies and TV.”
“Follow Emma on Instagram.”
“Bring on allllll the fried chicken.”
“YES DEMI.”
“It's like, sometimes that's what you want and it's OK to treat yourself every once in a while."”
“"I think that dieting is something that we've been forced to kind of do because of the diet culture...we're praised if we don't eat fried chicken and we eat a salad," she said.”
“Instagram stories @DdLovatoDieting isn't part of her life, but she does bring a nutritionist on tour with her as well as a personal trainer to stay healthy.”
“She's been vocal in the past about suffering from eating disorders and depression, and has said loving herself has always been a struggle.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Emma Baty Emma Baty is cosmopolitan's associate entertainment editor, focusing on film and television."
"Follow Emma on instagram."
"Bring all the fried chicken."
"Yes, Demi."
"Like, sometimes that's what you want, and it doesn't matter if you reward yourself once in a while."
"I think dieting is something we are forced to do because of the dieting culture If we don't eat fried chicken and eat salad, we will be praised, "she said
“Instagram  stories@DdLovatoDieting It's not part of her life, but she does bring a nutritionist and a personal trainer to stay healthy
"She used to say that she suffered from eating disorders and depression, and that loving herself has always been a struggle."



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Kim Kardashian West Tells All About Parisian Gunpoint Robbery on 'Keeping Up With the Kardashians' This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“For more on the Kardashians watch the video below.”
“The new season will focus on Kim as she debates removing herself from the spotlight to focus on her family after the traumatic experience in Paris, Khloe’s relationship with Tristan, and Kourtney trying to figure out how to best co-parent with Scott.”
“RELATED: Khloe Kardashian Shares Sexy Bikini Pic of Mom Kris Jenner: '6 Kids and Bad'The Keeping Up with the Kardashians 10 Year Anniversary Special airs Sunday, Sept. 24, with the 14th season of Keeping Up With the Kardashians premiering Oct. 1.”
“"I can't even remember a time before Keeping Up," says Kylie in the clip as scenes of the family flash on the screen behind them.”
“From breakups to weddings, to births and all the drama and happy moments in between, the family discusses their unforgettable moments that they've shared with the world.”
“WATCH: Kim Kardashian Takes a Trip Down Memory Lane at Her Old HouseThe first teaser for the upcoming special shows Ryan Seacrest sitting down with Kris Jenner, Kim, Khloe, Kourtney, Kendall and Kylie to reflect back on the most monumental events in their lives.”
“The hit reality show which introduced the world to the Kardashian and Jenner clan is celebrating 10 years of being on-air with a special 90-minute television event, Keeping Up with the Kardashians 10 Year Anniversary Special.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Kim Kardashian West has all the information about the armed robbery in Paris. The video" follow Kardashian "is not available because we can't load the sponsor's information."
"For more information about the Kardashian family, watch the video below."
"The focus of the new season will be on Kim because of her traumatic experience in Paris, Chloe's relationship with Tristan and Courtney's attempt to figure out how best to be a parent with Scott. She is debating how to take herself out of the spotlight and focus on her family."
Related reports: on Sunday, September 24, Kardashian shared a sexy bikini photo of her mother Chris Jenner: "six kids and bad kids" Kardashian's 10th anniversary special. Season 14 "Kardashian" will premiere on October 1
"I can't even remember when I'll be able to keep up," Kelly said in the clip, with a family scene flashing on the screen behind them
"From the breakup to the wedding to the birth, and all the dramatic and happy moments in between, the whole family is talking about the unforgettable moments they shared with the world."
"Watch: Kim Kardashian travels along memory lane in her old house, the first teaser of the upcoming special Ryan Seacrest and Kris Jenner Jenner, Kim, Khloe, Kourtney, Kendall and Kylie sit down and look back on the most memorable moments of their lives
"This popular reality show that introduces Kardashian and the Jenner family to the world will celebrate its 10-year broadcast with a 90 minute special TV program, keeping pace with Kardashian's 10th anniversary special."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...series...”
“It s unclear what exactly has changed in the intervening weeks to bring back Sense8 for a final episode but fans of the show that were disappointed by season 2 s cliffhanger should at least take solace in the fact that there will be some kind of closure on the...”
“...we can t The show was praised for its incredibly diverse cast of characters but the multiple location conceit meant that Sense8 was also one of the most expensive shows on television some estimates were putting it at 9 million per episode which may have contributed to the cancelation...”
“Posted by Sense8 on Thursday June 29 2017 The news is particularly unexpected given that Netflix previously posted a response to the multitude of fan campaigns a week after the cancelation apologetically stating We ve thought long and hard here at Netflix to try to make it work but unfortunately...”
“Tell your cluster.”
“2 hour finale episode in the works.”
“Death doesn't let you say goodbye.”
“It will air in 2018, as announced through a letter from creator Lana Wachowski on the show’s Facebook page.”
“After getting canceled by Netflix at the beginning of June following the release of its second season, Sense8 is now getting a last-minute stay of execution in the form of a two-hour special.”


“… Series... "
"It's not clear what changes will take place in the next few weeks to bring senses 8 back to the final episode, but fans who are disappointed with the suspense of the second season should at least be comforted that the show will have some kind of ending..."
“…… We can't say that the show is praised for its incredibly diverse cast of characters, but the conceit of multiple locations means that sense 8 is also one of the most expensive shows on TV, with an estimated 9 million per episode, which may be the reason for the cancellation... "
"Sense8 released this news on June 29, 2017 (Thursday), which was particularly unexpected, because Netflix had previously released a response to many fans' activities after a week's cancellation. I'm sorry to say that we had a long and hard time thinking about Netflix, trying to make it work, but unfortunately..."
"Tell your team."
"The 2-hour finale in the work."
"Death won't let you say goodbye."
"The show will air in 2018, as the creator Lana Wachowski announced in a letter on the show's Facebook page."
"After the release of season 2, which was cancelled by Netflix in early June, sense8 is now suspended at the last minute in the form of a two-hour special."



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Swift makes no secret of the fact that she is a big fan of the Rhimes-produced “Grey’s Anatomy.” Adweek reports Swift named her cat Meredith after a character on the show played by Ellen Pompeo, who appeared in Swift’s 2014 “Bad Blood” video.”
“That culminated in Shonda Rhimes, who produces the TGIT shows, tweeting out a mention of Swift and her new single.”
““Look What You Made Me Do” was also featured in ABC’s Thursday night TGIT lineup promos that began airing the day the single dropped, concurrent with a steady push on social media, with accounts for ABC’s three TGIT shows pumping hashtags for #TGITaylor, #Reputation and #LookWhatYouMadeMeDo.”
“It’s unknown whether her sports foray is a feint at rival pop queen Katy Perry, whose basketball themed “Swish Swish” was released in May, followed by a hoop-themed music video in August.”
“...pic.twitter.com/pojroWJRHL — ESPN (@espn) September 3, 2017That release shattered multiple records, paving the way for a season of Swift.”
“Right NOW on ABC and streaming live on the ESPN App.”
“3 Florida State.”
“No.”
“1 Alabama.”


"Swift made no secret that he was a big fan of Rhimes' anatomy of gray. Swift named her cat Meredith after a role played by Ellen Pompeo in the show, which appeared in Swift's 2014 bad blood video, Adweek reported
"This eventually led to a tweet by TGIT producer Shonda Rhimes about swift and her new single."
"Look what you asked me to do" also appeared in ABC's TGIT series promo on Thursday night. The promo started on the day of the single's broadcast, and steadily progressed on social media. ABC's three TGIT program accounts were labeled "tgitallor", "reputation" and "look what you made me do"
"It's not known whether her sports March is a feint against her rival pop star Katie Perry. Her basketball theme" whoosh whoosh "was released in May this year, followed by a basketball themed music video in August."
“... pic.twitter.com/pojroWJRHL -ESPN (@ ESPN) on September 3, 2017, this release broke many records and paved the way for Swift's first season
"Now live on ABC and ESPN applications."
"3 Florida."
"No
"1 Alabama."



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m sure she’s going to build a beautiful house with all her pigs and dogs and she’ll turn it into something magical.””
““She’s like the phoenix.”
““She is such a positive person,” Ronson told the U.K. website.”
“Since recording the track, Cyrus lost the Malibu home she shared with her fiancé, Liam Hemsworth, in the devastating wildfires that swept through Southern California earlier this month.”
“Then a few months ago, I sent a little idea for the chorus of this song and she wrote right back,” the “Uptown Funk” producer recently told Official Charts.”
““I had my manager reach out to her, but we never hooked up.”
“The Hannah Montana alum and Ronson, 43, are set to perform the tune, which will appear on his upcoming fifth album, during the December 15 episode of Saturday Night Live.”
“This is the first time that Cyrus, 26, has dropped new music since her 2017 album, Younger Now, which featured the hit single “Malibu.” She started teasing “Nothing Breaks Like a Heart” on social media on Monday, November 26, and continued to share video clips leading up to the release.”
“The pop star and Mark Ronson released their new single and music video, “Nothing Breaks Like a Heart,” on Thursday, November 29.”
“Miley Cyrus is back with another banger!”


"I believe she will build a beautiful house with all the pigs and dogs, and she will turn it into something magical."
"She's like a Phoenix."
"She's a positive person," Ronson said on the UK website.
"Since recording the song, Cyrus lost his Malibu home with fiance Liam Hemsworth in the devastating wildfire that swept Southern California earlier this month."
"A few months ago, I had a little idea for the chorus of this song, and she wrote back immediately," the producer of "the scaremonger of the city" recently told the official chart
"I asked the manager to get in touch with her, but we never got in touch."
Hannah Montana's alumni and 43 year old Ronson will sing the song on "Saturday night live" on December 15, which will appear in his upcoming fifth album
"This is the first time Cyrus, 26, has given up on new music since the 2017 album young now released the hit single Malibu. On Monday, November 26, she began joking on social media that "nothing is more heartbreaking than heartbreak," and continued to share pre release video clips
The pop star and mark Ronson released their new single and music video "nothing is more heartbreaking than heartbreak" on Thursday, November 29
"Miley Cyrus is back!"



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...throughout summer.”
“'Sharks are my favorite animal because they eat people,' the tiny heartbreaker explained during the duo's juice date.”
“And Jimmy Kimmel welcomed back the often-scandalous summer series with the most innocent parody possible, putting precocious toddlers in the place of lovelorn contestants.”
“The late night skit was a laugh-a-minute, showing lovesick little ones don floaties and nurse drinks in sippy cups while uttering classic reality one-liners like 'I just wanna find love' and 'I always fall for bad boys.'”
“Scroll down for videoPint-sized Paradise!”
“Jimmy Kimmel welcomed back Bachelor In Paradise with a new parody showing precocious toddlers in the place of love sick contestants for Baby Bachelor In Paradise The late night host welcomed all to pint sized Paradise calling it a serene...”
“...utopia for small children whose parents have no problem with them doing this for some reason...”
“Following in the footsteps of Jimmy's earlier Baby Bachelor and Baby Bachelorette, the little contestants fight for each other's attention with 'passionate play dates' and 'canoodling in the kiddie pool.'”
“There are gags aplenty, with returning contestant Dylan, six, coming back to the beach with a hilarious fake mustache while 'bad boy' Alex pumped iron in a leather vest.”
“Parental supervision required!”


"All summer"
"Sharks are my favorite animals because they eat people," the little heartbroken man explained during their juice date
"Jimmy Kimmel welcomed this often obnoxious summer series in the purest way, allowing precocious children to replace lovelorn contestants."
"This late night sketch is a one minute comedy. It shows lovesick kids wearing floats and drinking milk from small cups. It also tells classic realistic lines, such as" I just want to find love "and" I always love bad boys. "
"Scroll down to see the pint sized paradise of the video!"
"Jimmy Kimmel welcomes the return of" the Bachelor in heaven "with a new mimetic drama" the Bachelor in heaven ". The precocious toddlers in the play replace the love sick contestants in" the Bachelor in heaven ". The late night host welcomes everyone to the pint sized hall, calling it tranquility..."
“… The Utopia of a child whose parents have no objection to doing so for some reason... "
"Following in the footsteps of Jimmy's early" Bachelor baby "and" single girl baby ", the young players compete for each other's attention through" passionate game dating "and" canoeing in the children's swimming pool. "
"There are a lot of GAGs. Dylan, the 6-year-old comeback, returns to the beach with a funny moustache, while Alex, the" bad boy ", draws iron in a leather vest."
"Need parental supervision!"



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Derbez also runs a Santa Monica-based TV and film production company called 3Pas Studios.”
“The actor will also star in Sony’s upcoming drama “Miracles From Heaven” alongside Jennifer Garner and Queen Latifah.”
“2011 Girl in Progress 2012 and Geostorm which just wrapped shooting...”
“He directed and starred in the Mexican comedy sketch program XHDRbZ and later wrote and starred in the show s sitcom spinoff La Familia P Luche Derbez s other acting credits include Sundance grand jury prize winner Sangre de mi Sangre 2007 Under the Same Moon 2007 Jack and Jill...”
“He wrote, produced and starred in the 2013 dramedy “Instructions Not Included,” which earned more than $100 million and became the most successful Spanish-language film ever in the U.S. and worldwide.”
“Derbez, who topped Variety’s Power of Latinos list in 2014, is one of the most recognized actors among the country’s Spanish-speaking population.”
“Alessandra Rosaldo Aislinn Derbez Mauricio Ochmann Vadhir Derbez José Eduardo Derbez Rob Schneider Karla Souza Martha Higareda and Consuelo Duval among others...”
“Derbez will receive the 2 576th star on the Walk of Fame which will be located at 7013 Hollywood Boulevard on March 10 at 11 30 a m Hollywood Chamber of Commerce president and CEO Leron Gubler will serve as the emcee for the event whose special attendees will include...”
“Actor-writer-director Eugenio Derbez will be honored with a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame, Variety has learned.”


"Derbez also runs a Santa Monica based television and film production company called 3pas studios."
The actor will also work with Jennifer Garner and queen Latifa on Sony's upcoming TV series miracle from heaven
"2011 girl in progress 2012 and geological storm just finished shooting..."
"He directed and starred in xhdrbz, a Mexican comedy sketch, and later wrote and starred in other performances of P luche Derbez, a derivative of the sitcom family, including Sangre de Mi Sangre 2007 under the same moon, Jack and Jill..."
"He created, produced and starred in dramedy's" excluding instructions "in 2013, which earned more than $100 million and became the most successful Spanish film in the history of the United States and even the world."
"Debez topped the 2014 variety list of Latin American influences and is one of the most recognized actors among the Spanish speaking population in the country."
"Alexandra Rosaldo esrin debenz Mauricio ochman wadhill debenz Jos é Eduardo debenz rob Schneider Kara suza Martha higardar and CONSUELO Duval et al..."
"Derbez will receive 2576 stars at 7013 Hollywood Boulevard at 11:30 a.m. on March 10. The chairman and CEO of Hollywood chamber of Commerce, LERON Gubler, will be the host of the event. Special participants will include..."
Actor, screenwriter and director Eugenio debez will be honored as a star on the Hollywood Walk of fame, variety magazine has learned



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We will update this story with any developments.”
“In our coverage of the Rob and Chyna feud, INSIDER reached out repeatedly to both Rob and Chyna's lawyers as well as representatives for Rob Kardashian for further comment.”
“The Kardashians have still not spoken publicly about the scandal.”
“News, but Jenner "told [Rob] that this was going to affect Dream in many ways if he didn't get his act together."”
“He allegedly offered multiple apologies, according to E!”
“A separate source told the website that when Rob apologized over the phone to his mom, Kris Jenner, she "really put him in his place."”
“The source added that "he is embarrassed [by his actions] and knows he needs to be better for [his and Chyna's daughter] Dream."”
“"He is very remorseful and upset with himself over what he did."”
“News.”
“"Rob did apologize to the family and has major regrets over the way he acted," one source told E!”


"We'll keep this story up to date."
"In our report on the discord between rob and ziner, insider repeatedly contacted rob and ziner's lawyers and rob Kardashian's representative for further opinions."
"The kardashians have yet to talk publicly about the scandal."
"Good news, but Jenner" tells (ROB) that if he doesn't act, it will affect his dream in many ways
"It is said that he apologized many times, according to e!"
Another source told the website that when rob apologized to his mother, Chris Jenner, over the phone, she "really put him in his place."
"He was embarrassed [about his behavior] and knew he needed to do better for the dream [of his and Zina's daughter]," the source added
"He was very remorseful and upset about what he had done."
"News."
"Rob did apologize to his family and deeply regretted the way he acted," a source told e! "



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“News that she believes beauty is about feeling confident in who you are.”
“Haart previously told E!”
“The colorful look is accessorized with a cross-body micro Ada Bag made with pony hair.”
“The 21-year-old is also featured in the La Perla Slip Dress which boasts a built-in padded bra and sculpted bodice sewn from stretch silk with Leavers lace detailing that echo the floral pattern.”
“The scintillating look is finished with a sky-high floral platform wedge.”
“In one rather revealing image, Kenny, rocking a red lip, shows off her lean limbs in La Perla's triangle bra and shorts with floral-inspired Leavers lace embroidered in contrasting color and finished with velvet trim.”
“Photographed by Mert & Marcus, "The explosive visual message is intended to shock and transport the viewer to a world of fantasy, color, and art."”
“...empowered femininity...”
“According to the brand s press release Kendall has been cast as a Dorothy esque protagonist entering into the colorful Land of Oz Jenner exudes the certainty and self assurance of a true heroine owning her world through confidence and...”
“The supermodel showed off her phenomenal form in the psychedelic shoot, which fuses pop art, modernism and fashion.”


"She believes that beauty is the message of confidence in herself."
"Harold told him before!"
"The multicolored design is matched with a straddle Mini ADA bag made of horse hair."
"The 21-year-old is also wearing a La Perla slip dress with a built-in padded bra and a body shaping bra sewn with elastic silk, and the riverside lace details echo the floral pattern."
"The dazzling shape is decorated with expensive flower wedge."
"In a fairly revealing photo, Kenny shakes her red lips, wears La Perla's Triangle Bra and shorts, flowers inspired leavers lace, embroiders in contrasting colors, and adorns her thin limbs with velvet trim."
"Shot by Mert and Marcus," the explosive visual message aims to shock and transport audiences to the world of fantasy, color and art
“… Make women attractive... "
"According to the brand's press release, Kendall is portrayed as a Dorothy style protagonist who enters the colorful land of Oz. Jenner exudes a real heroine who possesses the certainty and self-confidence of her world through self-confidence and self-confidence..."
"The supermodel showed her extraordinary appearance in psychedelic photography, combining pop art, modernism and fashion."



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The sharp, sleek silhouette will quickly upgrade the chunky sweaters, lace blouses, and anything else you’re buying this fall—not to mention the obvious choice: a great pair of boots.”
“Super-wide ’70s flares and faded Levi’s 501s are great, but those looking to make a quieter, less literal statement may want to consider the oft-forgotten boot-cut jean.”
“The minimalism that ruled the runways and our wardrobes for the better part of five years has been replaced by a cobbled together anything goes sensibility now more than ever women are being encouraged to mix match and wear only...”
“...what they love...”
“To many of us, Gucci’s glittering knits and Vetements’s tablecloth boots are an invitation to get creative—but to the uninitiated, it could all simply read as tacky.”
“The concept of “good” vs. “bad” taste has been of recent debate here in the Vogue offices—how do you determine what’s chic and what isn’t?”
“Or is some degree of tackiness the secret to inspired style?”
“The continued ’90s revival indicates the answer is yes—and that counts for denim, too.”
“More curve-hugging than a flare but longer and leaner than a straight-leg, it nails the tricky middle ground between familiar and au courant.”
“Either way, there’s no denying the thigh-slimming, rear-lifting powers of a fitted, dark-rinse, mid- or high-rise jean that kicks out just below the knee.”


"Sharp, sleek silhouettes will soon upgrade to heavy sweaters, lace shirts, and anything you want to buy this fall, not to mention the obvious choice: a great pair of boots."
"The '70s super wide flared pants and the faded Levi's 501 are good choices, but those who want to make quieter, less elegant statements may want to consider the often forgotten boot cut jeans."
"In the past five years, minimalism, which dominates the runway and wardrobe, has been replaced by a sense of patchwork, and now more than ever, women are encouraged to mix and match, just wear..."
“… What they love... "
"For many of us, Gucci's glittering T-shirts and vetements' tablecloth boots are an invitation to creativity, but for those who are not familiar with them, they can be simply understood as tacky."
The concept of "good" and "bad" taste has recently caused a debate in the office of fashion magazine. How do you determine what is fashionable and what is not? "
Or is a certain degree of vulgarity the secret of inspiration? "
"The sustained recovery in the 1990s shows that the answer is yes, and that's important for denim as well."
"It's more curved than a trumpet, but it's longer and thinner than a straight leg. It nails the familiar and familiar middle zone together."
"Either way, undeniable thigh slimming, rear lift strength fit, dark wash, mid or high-rise jeans kick just below the knee."



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Do you want tracksuits?””
“He’s like, ‘Nope, they are becoming too popular.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Cue Sarah McLachlan’s “Angel.”Armie Hammer, who earlier this year went through a period where he exclusively wore Adidas tracksuits, announced on Conan Tuesday that he’s officially done with the look for good.”
“The Call Me by Your Name actor starting wearing the suits at the end of January while promoting the film in Paris, and continued wearing the comfy style — to internet acclaim — for weeks.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Hammer explained the origin story of his athleisure phase to Conan O Brien saying that after a 14 month period of doing CMBYN press he had developed a case of what I like to call the f its and that...”
“...he basically had senioritis For those who were immune in high school senioritis is when you just can t anymore at the end of high school...”
“So the outfit came about because he realized If I m gonna continue to jump through these hoops and I m gonna continue to talk about this movie that I ve talked about ad nauseum I m gonna be comfortable...”
“But soon Hammer started to wear human clothes more and more and we felt the tracksuits slipping away...”


"Do you want a sportswear?"
"He said," no, they're so popular. "
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
Take Sarah McClaren's angel, for example. Earlier this year, Armie hammer announced in Conan on Tuesday that he no longer wore Adidas sportswear
"At the end of January, when I was promoting the film in Paris, an actor named me your name started wearing this suit and wearing this comfortable style for several weeks - winning the praise of the Internet."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Hammer explained to Conan o Brien the origin of his sports and leisure stage. He said that after 14 months of cmbyn press, he developed a case I like to call its, and..."
“…… He basically got geriatrics. For those who are immunized in high school, geriatrics means that you can't get geriatrics any more after graduating from high school. "
"So the costume came out because he realized that if I could continue to jump over these obstacles, I would continue to talk about the film I talked about, and I would be very comfortable..."
"But soon, hammer began to put on more and more human clothes, and we felt the sportswear slipping away..."



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You have to do what’s good for you.””
“At the end of the day nobody is perfect.”
“Her rep confirmed the split to PEOPLE on Thursday, and according to court documents, Patridge felt compelled to file for divorce after an alleged domestic violence incident, filing for a temporary restraining order against the Australian professional BMX dirt bike rider Monday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In the wake of their breakup a source tells PEOPLE that these problems have existed their entire relationship They broke up and got back together and she really thought things would be different when they got married but she s realized things had to change before it got even worse...”
“...and she had to get her and her daughter out of the situation the insider adds...”
“Patridge and Bohan began dating in 2008, spending several years together on and off before dramatically splitting on her VH1 reality show, Audrina, in 2011.”
“At the premiere party for the reality series, Patridge told PEOPLE of the breakup, “It’s something that was an ongoing thing that I talk about in the show.”
“It was a long time coming.”
“Enough is enough.”


"You have to do what's good for you."
"At the end of the day, no one is perfect."
"Patric's representatives confirmed the break-up on Thursday, and according to court documents, Patric felt forced to file a divorce after being suspected of domestic violence and applied for a temporary restraining order against the Australian professional BMX SUV rider on Monday."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"After they broke up, a source told people that these problems already existed in their whole relationship, they broke up and got together again, she really thought things would be different after they got married, but she realized that things had to change before they got worse..."
"And she has to get her and her daughter out of the woods," the source added
"Partridge and Bohan started dating in 2008 and spent a few years off and on, until they split up dramatically in 2011 on her VH1 reality show" Audrey. "
"At the premiere of the reality series, partridge told people about the breakup," which I've been talking about on the show
"Long time no see."
"Enough is enough."



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She is pictured last month during Taylor Swift's Reputation Tour...”
“Matthew, who is a dating guru and has appeared on the Today Show as the resident love expert, recently revealed he's ready to start a family.”
“And things appear to be serious between Camila Cabello, 21, and her British beau Matthew Hussey, 31, as the couple stepped out with the singer's mom Sinuhe Estrabao on Tuesday.”
“The duo coordinated in casual khaki green outfits as they strolled around the Venice Beach neighborhood of Los Angeles.”
“Getting serious: Camila Cabello is pictured out in Venice Beach on Tuesday with boyfriend Matthew HusseyThe former Fifth Harmony member sported a camouflage print T-shirt and sweatpants and wrapped a plaid shirt around her waist.”
“The Havana hitmaker finished her off-duty look with some trendy small sunglasses.”
“Her Essex-born beau wore a green T-shirt tucked into navy Nike shorts and covered his head with a baseball cap.”
“The trio stopped for some smoothies and juice as they enjoyed some fresh air in the beach-side neighborhood.”
“Friendly with the family: The 21-year-old singer's mom Sinuhe Estrabao was seen out with the pair'When the time is right I would love to [start a family] and my mum wants me to as well,' the relationship expert told Australian magazine New Idea in July.”
“Songstress: It's just been announced that Camila will be performing at the American Music Awards on October 9.”


"She was photographed last month on Taylor Swift's reputation tour..."
"Matthew is a dating guru who appeared as a resident love expert on today's show and recently revealed that he is ready to start a family."
"The affair between 21-year-old Camilla Cabello and 31 year old British boyfriend Matthew Hussain seems serious because the couple went out with the singer's mother, sinuhe estrabo, on Tuesday."
"Wearing casual khaki green, they strolled around Venice Beach in Los Angeles."
"Take it seriously: Camilla Cabello posed with her boyfriend Matthew Hussey on Venice Beach on Tuesday, a former fifth harmony member wearing a camouflage printed T-shirt and sweatpants and a plaid shirt around her waist."
"The thugs in Havana finished her off-duty look with some fashionable little sunglasses."
"Her Essex born boyfriend was wearing a green T-shirt, Navy Nike shorts and a baseball cap."
"When they were enjoying the fresh air in the seaside community, they stopped to drink some smoothies and juice."
"Get along with your family: sinuhe estrabao, the 21-year-old singer's mother, was seen going out with them." when the time is right, I really want to (form a family), and my mother wants me to do the same, "the relationship expert said in an interview with new ideas magazine in Australia in July
"Female Singer: just announced that Camilla will perform at the American Music Awards on October 9."



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Photo by Steve Granitz/WireImage) | Credit: Steve Granitz/WireImage/Getty images...”
“Image zoom SANTA MONICA, CA - JANUARY 11: Emma Roberts arrives at the The 23rd Annual Critics' Choice Awards at Barker Hangar on January 11, 2018 in Santa Monica, California.”
“It all came together for the perfect hint-of-edge vibe.”
“She kept her jewelry and accessories simple and elegant, complimenting the look with a statement brow with pink lip.”
“She looks like an old Hollywood movie star, especially in her cream satin strapless Giorgio Armani gown, which she paired with coordinating strappy sandals.”
“Emma has been rocking a short blonde bob for a while now, but her blunt bangs are giving us so many vintage vibes.”
“The couple walked the red carpet together, but we gotta say, Emma’s blunt bangs stole the show.”
“Emma was on hand at the 2018 Critics’ Choice Awards to support her longtime partner Evan Peters, who was nominated for Best Actor for his role in American Horror Story: Cult.”
“In fact, she’s proving that blunt bangs might be the trend to watch in 2018.”
“But her latest look has little to do with color and everything to do with a dramatic haircut.”


"(Steve granitz / WireImage photography) | image source: Steve granitz / WireImage / Getty Images..."
"January 11, Santa Monica, California: Emma Roberts attends the 23rd annual critic's Choice Award at the Barker hangar in Santa Monica, California."
"It's all for the perfect edge atmosphere."
"She keeps her jewelry and accessories simple and elegant, complimenting her look with a personalized eyebrow with pink lips."
"She looks like an old Hollywood star, especially in a Cream Satin Strapless Giorgio Armani dress with lace up sandals."
"Emma has been rocking a Blonde Bob for some time, but her blunt bangs give us a lot of retro feeling."
"The couple walked the red carpet together, but we have to say that Emma's blunt bangs stole the limelight."
"Emma attended the critic's Choice Award 2018 in support of her long-term partner Evan Peters, who was named in American terror story: the cult Story:Cult ）The role in the film was nominated for best actor
"In fact, she is proving that blunt bangs may be a noteworthy trend in 2018."
"But her latest look has little to do with the color, it's all about the dramatic hairstyle."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here’s the full list of Grammy nominees.”
““The Late Late Show” host James Corden returns to emcee the ceremony for a second year.”
“ET on CBS.”
“The show will be broadcast live from Madison Square Garden at 4:30 p.m. PT/7:30 p.m.”
“The Grammys return to New York this Sunday for the first time in 15 years and feature performances from nominees Kendrick Lamar, U2, Elton John, Kesha and Pink.”
“Following the impact of the Golden Globes red carpet blackout, the Grammys have responded with their own statement, with many artists wearing white roses on the red carpet.”
“Dressed in a white lace gown, the rapper joined the music industry in its support of the #MeToo and Time’s Up movements by sporting a white rose with her look.”
“Cardi B landed her first two Grammy nominations this year, best rap song and best rap performance, both for her hit “Bodak Yellow.” Cardi will also take the Grammy stage with Bruno Mars to perform their new collaboration “Finesse” during the show.”
“...continuing the conversation...”
“In an interview with E s Giuliana Rancic on Sunday s award show red carpet Cardi B said I m feeling good I m feeling overwhelmed nervous everything I feel it all butterflies in my stomach and vagina she added causing Rancic to pause for a few notable seconds before...”


"This is the full list of Grammy nominees."
James Corden, host of the evening show, presided over the award ceremony again the next year
"CBS et."
"The show will be broadcast live at 4:30 p.m. / 7:30 p.m. in Madison Square Garden."
"The Grammy Awards will return to New York on Sunday for the first time in 15 years with nominees Kendrick Lamar, U2, Elton John, Kesha and Pinker
"Under the influence of the blackout of the Golden Globe red carpet, the Grammy Awards have also made their own response. Many artists wear white roses on the red carpet."
Dressed in a white lace robe and a white rose, the rapper joined the music industry and supported the popular movements of "meto o" and "time weekly"
Katie B won the first two nominations for this year's Grammy Awards, best rap song and best rap performance, both for her hit song "bodak yellow". Caddy will also be on the Grammy stage with Bruno Mars, performing their new collaboration "finesse" during the show
“… Continue the conversation... "
"In an interview with E.S. Giuliana Rancic, red carpet Cardi B, at the Sunday awards ceremony, she said I feel good, I feel very nervous, I feel like a butterfly in my stomach and vagina, she added, causing Rancic to pause for a few seconds, and then..."



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“To be frank, it’s the new and innovative way of conveying the next level of swimsuit game.”
“Her pose by wearing a harness bottom-ed velvet sphinx suit grabbed lots of attention in the social media and it sets a new trend in the boring bikini culture.”
“Recently, she posted one of her bikini photos which are captured on her cannes trip.”
“Image: POPSUGAR.COMImage: InStyle.COMIf you follow the Instagram account of the hot chick Emily Ratajkowski they you would will be perfectly entertained by the bold avatar of the American actress and hot model.”
“...very much keen to entertain their fans by posting their hot images every now and then...”
“Emily Ratajkowski s Cannes Bikini was a bold choice It s become a quite common thing that actress keep on posting their bold appearance though it can be considered as they are willing to do bold scenes on demand of the movie scripts it s pretty clear that actresses are...”


"Frankly, it's an innovative way to convey the new level of swimsuit gaming."
"Her posture in a velvet Sphinx suit with a harness hem has attracted a lot of attention on social media and set off a new trend in the boring bikini culture."
"Recently, she released a picture of a bikini taken during a trip to Cannes."
"Image: POPSUGAR.com Image: InStyle.COMIf If you follow the account of Emily ratajkovsky on instagram, you will be perfectly entertained by the bold incarnation of this American actress and model. "
“… Very keen on entertaining their fans by publishing their popular pictures from time to time... "
"Emily ratajkovsky's Cannes bikini is a bold choice. It has become common for actresses to constantly show their bold looks, although it can be considered that they are willing to make bold scenes according to the requirements of the screenplay. Obviously, the actress is... "



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Rihanna and Drake | Credit: Kevin Mazur/WireImageThe “Hotline Bling” singer has never shied away from showing his adoration of the Barbados-native, publicly proclaiming his love for Rihanna at the 2016 MTV Video Music Awards.”
“However, another insider told PEOPLE the duo “spent a lot of time together and were really close but never considered themselves to be ‘dating.’ ” The relationship fizzled out in fall 2016.”
“Lo' (and Seemingly Mentions Rihanna) in New SongDrake is re-visiting women from his past in a surprise new song.”
“The Toronto rapper dropped two new tracks, “God’s Plan” and “Diplomatic Immunity,” on Friday night ahead of the release of his Scary Hours EP.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On the latter, he references his former flame Jennifer Lopez.”
““2010 was when I lost my halo / 2017 I lost a J.”
“Lo / A Rotterdam trip had me on front page, though,” the 31-year-old raps, possibly addressing a Jan. 2017 report that included photos of him having a meal with a woman identified as former porn star Sophie Brussaux, in the Netherlands.”
“Brussaux claimed she was pregnant with Drake’s child months later, which his rep strongly denied.”
“Lopez and Drake first sparked romance rumors back in December 2016 after the rapper was spotted (twice!)”


Image zooming Rihanna and Drake | image source: Kevin mazul / WireImage at the MTV Music Video Awards 2016, the "hot line bling" singer never evaded the adoration of the Barbados native and publicly declared his love for Rihanna
However, another person familiar with the matter told people that the two "spent a long time together and had a very close relationship, but never considered themselves a 'date'" The relationship failed in the fall of 2016
"Lo" (seems to mention Rihanna) in new song Drake is revisited from his past in a surprise new song woman. "
On Friday night, the Toronto rapper gave up two new songs, "God's plan" and "diplomatic immunity" before the EP release of "moments of terror."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"As for the latter, he mentioned his ex lover, Jennifer Lopez."
"I lost my aura in 2010 / I lost J in 2017."
"A trip to Rotterdam put me on the front page," the 31 year old rapper may have written in a January 2017 report that showed him having dinner with a former porn star named Sophie brussaux in the Netherlands
"Brusoe claimed that she was pregnant with Drake's child a few months later, but Drake's representative strongly denied it."
"Lopez and Drake first sparked romantic rumors in December 2016, when rappers were found (twice!)"



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Khloe presented the matriarch with a bottle of gluten-free Tito's vodka.”
“The Good American designer also shared a clip to her Instagram stories that revealed the family was having a birthday lunch for MJ at the Polo Lounge inside the Beverly Hills Hotel.”
“And her family too to social media to wish her a great birthday with gushing notes.”
“Her granddaughter Kim Kardashian, 37, was one of the first as she shared an old photograph with the caption, 'Happy 84th Birthday to my main idol, my grandma MJ!'”
“She looks up to her Kim Kardashian gushed about her grandmother MJ as she wished her a happy 84th birthday on Instagram on Thursday Always working The 37 year old entrepreneur has been plugging her KKW Beauty products all week here she is seen in a photo from Thursday The...”
“...mother of three she has North Saint and Chicago with Kanye West added My grandma is the strongest person I know...”
“'I saw her be the provider of her family and run her own clothing store my whole life, she’s battled cancer and beat it twice, and she always gives me the realest best advice!”
“'She’s probably the only person on this planet that I still remember their home number by heart lol.”
“So much love for her mom: Kris Jenner, 62, shared a touching note.”
“'Happy birthday to my beautiful mom who I love beyond words!!!'”


"Chloe gave her parents a bottle of gluten free Tito vodka."
"The great American designer also shared her instagram story clip, which revealed that a family was preparing MJ's birthday lunch in the Polo lounge of Beverly Hills Hotel."
"Her family also used endless messages on social media to wish her a happy birthday."
Kim kardishian, her 37 year old granddaughter, was the first person to share an old photo with you. The title of the photo was: "happy 84th birthday to my idol, my grandmother MJ!"
"She has great respect for Kim Kardashian, who talked about her grandmother MJ on instagram on Thursday and wished her a happy 84th birthday. She has been working all the time. The 37 year old entrepreneur has been charging her kkw beauty products for a week, and you can see her in a picture on Thursday..."
“… A mother of three, she has North saint and Chicago with Kanye West, adding that my grandmother is the most powerful person I know... "
"I see that she is the breadwinner of her family. She has been running her own clothing store all her life. She has fought against cancer and defeated it twice. She always gives me the most authentic and best advice!"
"She may be the only one on the planet I remember their phone number, ha ha."
"The love for mom is so deep: Chris Jenner, 62, shared a touching note."
"Happy Birthday to my beautiful mother, I love her more than words can express!"



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Asked in an interview later to confirm his rumored marriage, Oldman said he and Schmidt had opted to get married “quietly.”This is the actor’s fifth marriage, after ending his marriage to his fourth wife, Alexandra Edenborough, in 2015.”
“They married in August 2017, at the Beverly Hills home of his friend and manager Doug Urbanski in front of several dozen friends.”
““It’s funny you should say that,” the actor said, “because my wife has often said she went to bed with Winston Churchill but woke up with Gary Oldman.”The couple first went public at Milan Men’s Fashion Week in June 2015.”
“A flustered Oldman turned beet red and smiled sheepishly.”
““So you did not get the chance to consummate as Winston Churchill?” Kimmel asked jokingly.”
“Oldman explained that almost immediately following his life-changing question, he was called back on-set to shoot the next scene.”
“'”The couple’s romantic moment didn’t last long, however.”
“And as Winston Churchill, I said ‘Will you marry me?”
““We were down in the war rooms, and I took her into the map room.”
““There was a break in the filming, and we had talked about it and I just felt the urge,” the actor told Kimmel.”


Asked in a subsequent interview if he confirmed his rumored marriage, oldman said he and Schmidt chose to marry "quietly.". "This is his fifth marriage with his fourth wife, Alexandra edenborough, after their marriage ended in 2015."
"They were married at Beverly Hills in August 2017 at the home of his friend and manager, Doug Urbanski, in front of dozens of friends."
"It's funny you say that," the actor said, "because my wife often says that she slept with Winston Churchill and woke up with Gary Oldman." The couple made their first public appearance at Milan men's fashion week in June 2015
"A flustered old man blushed and laughed shyly."
"So you don't have a chance to be as perfect as Winston Churchill? "Kimmel asked jokingly."
"Alderman explained that almost immediately after he raised the issue of life changing, he was recalled to the set to shoot the next scene."
"However, the couple's romantic moments didn't last long."
"As Winston Churchill, I said, 'will you marry me
"We're in the war room. I'll take her into the map room."
"There was a break in the filming, we've talked about it, and I just felt the impulse," the actor told Kimmel



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think it’s never going to be easy for the two of us to talk about our mother, but 20 years on seems like a good time to remind people of the difference that she made, not just to the Royal Family but also to the world.””
“Family members, close friends, political figures, and journalists will be featured, including Tony Blair, Alastair Campbell, Earl Spencer, and Lady Sarah McCorquodale.”
“The conversations will air as part of a two-hour documentary, Diana, 7 Days, which will premiere on NBC Friday, Sept. 1 at 8 p.m. ET/PT, the network announced on Thursday.”
““Part of the reason why Harry and I want to do this is because we feel we owe it to her,” Prince William says in the doc.”
““I think an element of it is feeling like we let her down when we were younger.”
“We couldn’t protect her.”
“We feel we at least owe her 20 years on to stand up for her name and remind everybody of the character and person that she was.”
“Do our duties as sons in protecting her.”Directed by documentarian Henry Singer (9/11: The Falling Man), Diana, 7 Days examines the week between Diana’s death and her funeral.”
“Princess Diana died on Aug. 31, 1997 from injuries sustained in a car crash in France, a loss that rippled throughout the world.”
“When you’re that young and something like that happens to you, I think it’s lodged in here, there, wherever — in your heart, in your head, and it stays there for a very, very long time.”


"I think it's never easy for both of us to talk about mother, but 20 years on, it seems like a good time to remind people that the changes she has made are not only for the royal family, but also for the world."
Family members, close friends, politicians and journalists will be watched, including Tony Blair, Alastair Campbell, Earl Spencer and Mrs. Sarah mccordale
The network announced on Thursday that the dialogue will be broadcast as part of a two-hour documentary "Diana, seven days," which will premiere on NBC on Friday, September 1, at 8 p.m. EDT
"Harry and I did it in part because we felt we owed her," Prince William said in the doctor
"I think one of the factors is the feeling that we let her down when we were young."
"We can't protect her."
"We feel that we owe her at least 20 years to stick to her name and remind everyone of her character and personality."
"Do our son's duty to protect her." Directed by documentary director Henry Singh (9 / 11: the falling man), seven days tells the week between Diana's death and her funeral
On August 31, 1997, Princess Diana was injured and died in a car accident in France. The loss spread all over the world
"When you were so young, something like that happened to you, and I think it was here, there, anywhere - in your heart, in your mind, where it stayed for a long, long time."



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...list consent terms here Please allow a moment for the liveblog to load...”
“...to your inbox every week Thanks for signing up to the Independent Culture newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing...”
“(E!”
“/ People's Choice Awards)The 44th People's Choice Awards kicked off at 9pm ET in Santa Monica on Sunday, with Nicki Minaj opening the evening.”
“Rita Ora and John Legend also sang during the ceremony.”
“This year, 43 awards were to be attributed across the categories of movies, TV, music, and pop culture.”
“Members of the public voted ahead of time for their favourite films, TV shows, musicians, and influencers.”
“Three special awards were given.”
“Melissa McCarthy was named People Icon of 2018, Victoria Beckham earned the Fashion Icon title, and lawyer and social justice activist Bryan Stevenson was awarded the People's Champion gong.”
“In addition to providing the opening performance for the evening, Minaj collected two major awards during the ceremony.”


“… Please allow live blog to load... "
“… Thank you for signing up for the independent cultural communication verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors the independent. Please check the box if you want to contact us, please read our complete email... "
“（E！”
The 44th people's choice awards opened in Santa Monica at 9 p.m. EDT on Sunday, and Nicky Minagi announced the opening of the awards that night
"Rita Ola and John Legend also sang at the ceremony."
This year, 43 awards have been awarded in the fields of film, television, music and popular culture
The public voted in advance for their favorite movies, TV shows, musicians and influential people
"Won three special awards."
"Melissa McCarthy was named people's idol of the year 2018, Victoria Beckham was named fashion idol, and lawyer and social justice activist Brian Stevenson was awarded people's champion."
"In addition to providing an opening performance for the evening, Minagi won two major awards at the awards ceremony."



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After Dr Luke began his attempt to sue her for defamation, she launched a counterclaim which was rejected in May.”
““Katy Perry herself confirmed that Dr Luke did not rape her,” a statement from the producer’s legal team reads.”
“According to court documents, the singer had sent a text message to Lady Gaga in 2016 alleging the attack.”
“She is currently involved in a defamation case with the producer, whose real name is Lukasz Gottwald.”
“Kesha has previously claimed that he raped her, which he has also challenged in the legal action.”
““On February 26, 2016 [Kesha] sent a text message to Stefani Germanotta p/k/a/ Lady Gaga which repeated [Kesha’s] false claim that [Luke] had raped her,” the documents read.”
““[Kesha] also falsely asserted that [Luke] had also raped Kathryn Hudson p/k/a/ Katy Perry.”
“Following this text message conversation, and with [Kesha’s] encouragement, [Gaga] spread negative messages about [Luke] in the press and on social media.”The documents also show that Perry has been deposed as part of the trial although she has made no public statement about Dr Luke.”
“He had previously worked with her on earlier songs including I Kissed A Girl and California Gurls.”
““Kesha’s accusation to the contrary – just like her other outrageous lies about Dr Luke – is baseless and irresponsible, and it is disrespectful to both Katy Perry and Dr Luke.”


After Dr. Luke began trying to sue her for libel, she filed a counterclaim, which was dismissed in May
"Katie Perry himself confirmed that Dr. Luke did not rape her," a statement from the producer's legal team wrote
"According to court documents, the singer texted Lady Gaga in 2016 accusing her of the attack."
"She is currently involved in a libel case with a producer whose real name is Lucas Gottwald."
"Kesha had previously claimed that he raped her, and he challenged that in legal proceedings."
"On February 26, 2016, [Kesha] sent a text message to Stefani Germanotta P / K / A / Lady Gaga, repeating [Kesha] lied that [Luke] raped her," the document reads
"[Kesha] also lied that [Luke] raped Catherine Hudson P / K / A / Katie Perry."
"After this text message conversation, [Gaga] spread negative information about [Luke] in the press and social media with the encouragement of [Kesha]." The documents also show that Perry was removed from the trial, although she did not make a public statement about Dr. Luke. "
"He has worked with her on early songs, including" I kissed a girl "and" gules, California. "
"Kesha's accusation, on the contrary - just like her other shameless lies to Dr. Luke - is groundless and irresponsible, which is disrespect for Katie Perry and Dr. Luke."



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The ceremony airs live on ABC at 8pm ET from the T-Mobile Arena in Las Vegas.”
“The Feeling WINNER Top Streaming Song Audio The Chainsmokers Featuring Halsey Closer Drake Featuring WizKid Kyla One Dance WINNER D R A M”
“Pilots WINNER Top Male Artist Justin Bieber Drake WINNER Future Shawn Mendes The Weeknd Top Female Artist Adele Beyonce WINNER Ariana Grande Rihanna Sia Top Duo Group The Chainsmokers Coldplay Florida Georgia Line Guns N Roses Twenty One Pilots WINNER Top Billboard 200 Artist Beyonce Drake WINNER Prince Twenty One...”
“Pilots The Weeknd Top Hot 100 Artist The Chainsmokers Drake WINNER Rihanna Twenty One Pilots The Weeknd Top Song Sales Artist The Chainsmokers Drake WINNER Prince Justin Timberlake Twenty One Pilots Top Radio Songs Artist Justin Bieber The Chainsmokers Drake Rihanna Twenty One Pilots WINNER Top Streaming Songs Artist The...”
“Chainsmokers Desiigner Drake WINNER Rihanna Twenty One Pilots Top Social Artist Justin Bieber BTS WINNER Selena Gomez Ariana Grande Shawn Mendes Top Touring Artist Justin Bieber Beyonce WINNER Coldplay Guns N Roses Bruce Springsteen The E Street Band Top R B Artist Beyonce WINNER Bruno Mars Frank Ocean Rihanna The...”
“Weeknd Top R B Tour Beyonce WINNER Lionel Richie Rihanna Top Rap Artist J Cole Desiigner Drake WINNER Future Rae Sremmurd Top Rap Tour Drake WINNER Future Kanye West Top Country Artist Florida Georgia Line Blake Shelton WINNER Keith Urban Chris Stapleton Jason Aldean Top Country Tour Luke Bryan Kenny...”
“Chesney WINNER Dixie Chicks Top Rock Artist Coldplay The Lumineers Metallica Twenty One Pilots WINNER X Ambassadors Top Rock Tour Coldplay WINNER Guns N Roses Bruce Springsteen The E Street Band Top Latin Artist J Balvin Juan Gabriel WINNER Los Plebes Del Rancho De Ariel Camacho Maluma Nicky Jam Top...”
“Dance Electronic Artist The Chainsmokers WINNER Calvin Harris Major Lazer DJ Snake Lindsey Stirling Top Christian Artist Lauren Daigle WINNER Hillsong Worship Hillary Scott the Family Skillet Chris Tomlin Top Gospel Artist Jekalyn Carr Kirk Franklin WINNER Travis Greene Tamela Mann Hezekiah Walker Top Billboard 200 Album Beyonce Lemonade Drake...”
“Views WINNER Rihanna Anti Twenty One Pilots Blurryface The Weeknd Starboy Top Soundtrack Cast Album Hamilton An American Musical WINNER Moana Purple Rain Suicide Squad The Album Trolls Top R B Album Beyonce Lemonade WINNER Bruno Mars 24K Magic Frank Ocean Blonde Rihanna Anti The Weeknd Starboy Top Rap Album...”
“J Cole 4 Your Eyez Only Drake Views WINNER Kevin Gates Isla DJ Khaled Major Key A Tribe Called Quest We Got It From Here Thank You For Your Service Top Country Album Jason Aldean They Don t Know Florida Georgia Line Dig Your Roots Blake Shelton If I m...”


"The awards ceremony was broadcast live from the T-Mobile arena in Las Vegas at 8pm EDT."
"The feeling winner top streaming song audio the chainmokers featuring Halsey closer Drake featuring wizkid Kyla one dance winner d r a m"
"Pilot champion best male artist Justin Bieber Drake champion future Sean Mendes week 2 best female artist Adele Beyonce champion Arianna grand Rihanna SIA best combination chain smoker Coldplay Florida Georgia line gun n rose 21 pilot champion best billboard 200 artist Beyonce Drake champion Prince 21 ……”
"Pilot's week top 100 popular artists chain smoker Drake champion Rihanna 21 pilot's week ago first song sales artist chain smoker Drake champion Justin Black Prince 21 pilot top radio song artist Justin Bieber chain smoker Drake champion Rihanna 21 pilot top streaming song artist …”
"Designer Drake award winner Rihanna 21 pilot best social artist Justin Bieber BTS award winner Selena Gomez Ariana grand Sean Mendes best touring artist Justin Bieber Beyonce award winner Coldplay gun n Rose Bruce Springsteen E Street Band best R B Artist Beyonce award winner Bruno Frank ocean Rihanna's
"Best R of the week" B tour Beyonce award winner Lionel Ritchie Rihanna best rapper J Cole desina Drake award winner future ray slymoud best rapper tour Drake award winner future Kanye West best country singer Georgia route black Sheldon award winner Keith Urban Chris Stapleton Jason o "The best country tour of Erden, Luke Bryan Kenny..."
"Chesney champion Dixie Chicks top rock artist Coldplay the lumineers Metallica 21 pilots champion x ambassadors top rock tour Coldplay champion gun n roses Bruce Springsteen E Street top Latin artist J balvin Juan Gabriel champion Los plebes del Rancho de Ariel Camacho maluma Nicky jam top..."
Dance electronic artist champion Calvin Harris major Lazer DJ sneckling sesterlin top Christian artist Lauren dagger champion hillsson worship Hilary Scott family frying pan Chris Tomlin top evangelical artist Jacqueline karkork Franklin champion Travis greentame Raman Heather Walker top billboard 200 album Beyonce lemonade Drake ……”
"Watch champion Rihanna anti 21 pilot fuzzy face Zhouxing boy's best soundtrack album Hamilton American musical champion Mona purple rain suicide team album Troll top R B album Beyonce lemonade champion Bruno Mars 24K magic Frank ocean golden hair Rihanna anti Zhouxing boy's best rap album..."
"J Cole 4 your eyez only Drake views laureate Kevin gates Isla DJ Khalid major Kay, a tribe called discovery, we got it from here. Thank you for your service. Top country album Jason Alden. They don't know the Florida Georgia line digging your roots. Black Sheldon, if I were..."



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Advertisement...”
“It looks like it's slugs and snails and puppy dog tails for the Alba/Warrens soon!”
“Nwah!”
“The expectant mum also included the hashtags #OfficiallyOutnumbered and #Can'tWaitToSpoilHim.”
“??"”
“#officiallyoutnumbered #babyboy #cantwaittospoilhim #hugsandkissesforlife #soontobemamaofthree A post shared by Jessica Alba (@jessicaalba) on Oct 25, 2017 at 3:16pm PDTCaptioning the adorable video, Alba wrote:"Cash and I couldn’t be more thrilled to announce...”
“??”
“@cash_warren and I couldn’t be more thrilled to announce...”
“AdvertisementSimilar to how she back in June revealed the news that she was pregnant again, the 36-year-old once again took to social media to share her family's happy news.”
“Jessica Alba is already a mama to two girls, Honor, 9, and 6-year-old Haven, and now the actress and businesswoman has taken to Instagram to announce that she and husband Cash Warren will be welcoming a baby boy in a couple of months.”


"Advertising..."
"It looks like there will soon be slugs, snails and dog tails at Alba / Warren's house!"
"Ah
"The mother to be was also labeled" official number "and" don't cheat him. "
“??"”
At 3:16 p.m. on October 25, 2017, Jessica Alba (@ jessicalba) shared a post on "officially numbered baby, cantvetos Boym, hugging and kissing for life." Alba wrote: "KASH and I are very excited to announce..."
“??”
"@ Cash Warren and I are very excited to announce..."
"Similar to the news that she was pregnant again in June, the 36 year old once again shared the good news of her family on social media."
"Jessica Alba is the mother of two girls, 9 and 6, and now the actress and businesswoman announced on instagram that she and her husband, Cash Warren, will have a baby boy in a few months."



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out an exclusive preview of her appearance, below.”
“We had a bit of a complication that was hard to deal with, but she was very cool."”
“However, it wasn't all smooth sailing, Terry noted: "Very difficult problem.”
“She actually turned out to be a patient I really liked [and] was a lot of fun to work with."”
“I liked her.”
“She was funny.”
“I know her what her reputation was on Housewives being very argumentative [but] when they need help, and they have high-risk plastic surgery — she was so normal, so cool, and just wanted to be fixed.”
“"You know what's funny?”
“But, Terry saw a different side of the Garden State boutique owner.”
“"So, I was really concerned."”


"Please see the exclusive preview below."
"We're a bit complicated and hard to deal with, but she's calm."
"However, it's not plain sailing," Terry said. "It's a very difficult problem
"It turns out that she's a patient I really like and it's fun to work with."
"I like her."
"She's funny."
"I know what her reputation is because housewives are argumentative, (but) when they need help and have high-risk plastic surgery - she's normal, she's cool, she just wants to be cured."
"Do you know what's funny?"
"But Terry saw the other side of the owner of the garden state boutique."
"So, I'm really worried."



**Something goes wrong**
“Try partnering a pair with a T-shirt and sneakers for a cute casual look or a button-up and booties for something slightly more luxe.”
“Denim ShortsWhen you want to show off your legs in summer, denim shorts are a perfect choice.”
“White ShirtA white button-up shirt is another versatile summer essential.”
“SHOP: Two-Strap Sandals4.”
“Not only will the open style keep your feet from overheating, but it will also elongate the appearance of your legs.”
“As such, this time of the year is perfect for ditching your classic pumps and rocking two-strap sandals instead.”
“Classic Two-Strap SandalsNobody likes sweaty feet in summer.”
“SHOP: Denim Jackets3.”
“Perfect for mornings and evenings, the classic design will keep you feeling warm even when the temperature starts to drop.”
“Denim JacketAlthough you don’t need a lot of outerwear in summer, a denim jacket is essential.”


"Try to pair it with a T-shirt and sneakers for a lovely casual look, or with buttons and boots for a slightly more luxurious look."
"Denim shorts when you want to show off your legs in the summer, denim shorts are a perfect choice."
"White shirt white button shirt is another versatile summer must-have."
"Shop: Double sandals."
"The open style can not only prevent the feet from overheating, but also lengthen the shape of the legs."
So this time of year is the best time to get rid of your classic high heels and switch to sandals
"Classic double sandals. In summer, your body likes sweaty feet."
"Store: denim jacket 3."
"This classic design is perfect for use in the morning and in the evening. It can keep you warm even when the temperature starts to drop."
"Denim jacket although you don't need many coats in summer, denim jacket is essential."



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Williams has previously shared her wedding day advice for Meghan, telling ABC News, “I think it’s so important to enjoy the moment and eat cake.”
“I’m just too nervous.’ ”Serena reacted with complete understanding, writing back, “Daddy, it’s okay, if you don’t want to come to the wedding at all, that’s okay too.”
“Look, when we first came on the scene, there were a lot of people who didn’t get him.”
““And if he doesn’t want to be up there in front of a lot of people, I completely understand.”
“His health is better now, but I know he still doesn’t feel like himself, doesn’t feel like he’s perfect,” Serena said.”
““Maybe a lot of daughters wouldn’t react the same way, but I know the struggles he’s had these last few years.”
“...father felt uncomfortable...”
“I m not going to be upset with you about it so I don t want you to be upset about it The 36 year old athlete who welcomed daughter Alexis Olympia just two months before tying the knot with the Reddit co founder explained that she recognized why her...”
“I’m not myself anymore.”
“I don’t think a lot of him could have anyway.”She continued, “Our family knows what we have.”


Williams previously shared her wedding day advice with Megan, telling ABC News, "I think it's so important to enjoy the moment and eat the cake."
"I'm just too nervous." Serena replied with complete understanding, "Dad, it doesn't matter. If you don't want to come to the wedding at all, it doesn't matter."
"You see, when we first got to the scene, a lot of people didn't catch him."
"If he doesn't want to be in front of a lot of people, I fully understand."
"His body is much better now, but I know he still doesn't feel himself, doesn't feel perfect," Serena said
"Maybe a lot of daughters won't have the same reaction, but I know he's been struggling these years."
“… Father is not feeling well... "
"I don't want to upset you about it, so I don't want to upset you about it. Just two months before her marriage to reddit's co-founder, the 36 year old athlete welcomed her daughter, Alexis Olympia, who explained that she realized why she... "
"I'm not myself anymore."
"I don't think he's going to have much," she continued. "Our family knows what we have."



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED”
“Tuesday’s statement noted that Newton-John will reschedule her postponed concert dates in the coming weeks.”
““It’s to help people through grief and through healing, whatever time it takes you,” she told Hoda Kotb and Kathie Lee Gifford in October.”
“Last fall Newton-John released an album with Amy Sky and Beth Nielsen Chapman, “Liv On,” that was inspired by their experiences with loss and illness, including the death of Newton-John's sister.”
“She lost her sister, Rona Newton-John, to brain cancer in 2013.”
“The “Grease” star was first diagnosed with breast cancer in 1992, on the same weekend her father died of cancer.”
“Ross Gilmore / Redferns/Getty ImagesNewton-John previously postponed some shows earlier in May for what she described at the time as “a long running issue with sciatica” that was causing her back pain.”
“...consultation with my doctors and natural therapists and the medical team at my Olivia Newton John Cancer Wellness and Research Centre in Melbourne Australia Newton John performing in the U K in January...”
“In addition to natural wellness therapies Olivia will complete a short course of photon radiation therapy and is confident she will be back later in the year better than ever to celebrate her shows The statement includes a quote from Newton John I decided on my direction of therapies after...”
““The back pain that initially caused her to postpone the first half of her concert tour, has turned out to be breast cancer that has metastasized to the sacrum,” the statement reads.”


"Relevant"
"The statement on Tuesday pointed out that Newton John will reschedule her postponed concert in the coming weeks."
"It's to help people through grief and healing, no matter how much time you spend," she told Hoda Kotb and Kathie Lee Gifford in October
Last fall, Newton John released an album, Liv ANN, with Amy sky and Beth Nelson Chapman, inspired by their experiences of loss and illness, including the death of Newton John's sister
"She lost her sister Rona Newton John to brain cancer in 2013."
The fat star was first diagnosed with breast cancer in 1992, and her father died of cancer the same weekend
"Ross Gilmore / redferns / Getty Images Newton John had previously postponed some of her shows in early May because she called them" chronic sciatica "and caused her back pain."
“… Consult my doctor and nature therapist and medical team at my Olivia Newton John cancer health and Research Center in Melbourne, Australia, Newton John performing in the UK in January... "
"In addition to natural health therapy, Olivia will complete a short course in photon radiation therapy, and she is confident that later this year she will be better than ever to come back to celebrate her show. The statement also quoted Newton John as saying that I was After that, I decided the direction of my treatment. "
"The back pain that initially caused her to postpone her first half concert tour turned out to be breast cancer metastasizing to the sacrum," the statement said



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
““I said, ‘Get out of here.”
““It was a great likeness,” Curry said of the S.N.L.”
“He took a selfie with the crew on his American Airlines flight back to the U.S., he said, and Keenan Thompson on Saturday Night Live did an impression of him on the show’s “Weekend Update” segment that night.”
“Born in Chicago, Curry said he has had a “remarkable and very surprising” last few days after his sermon on the power of love enchanted the world.”
““And it was actually true.”A month later, when he was finally able to tell his wife the news, she had the same, stunned reaction, he said.”
“You gotta be kidding,'” he said.”
“It’s April Fools.”
“When he got the phone call from the Archbishop’s Lambeth Palace informing him of their decision, he couldn’t believe it.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
"I said, get out of here."
"It's a great similarity," curry said of s.n.l
"He took a selfie with the crew on American Airlines flight back to the United States, and Keenan Thompson made an impression on him on Saturday night during the" weekend update "segment of the live show," he said
Currie, who was born in Chicago, said he had had an "extraordinary and amazing" experience in the past few days after his preaching about the power of love captivated the world
"In fact, it is." A month later, when he was finally able to tell his wife the news, his wife had the same shock response, he said
"You're kidding," he said
"It's April Fool's day."
"When he got a call from Archbishop Lambeth Palace telling him their decision, he couldn't believe it."
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As his co-stars got off the bus, Corden reluctantly agreed to give the tour all over again for the tardy star.”
“We must protect the pretty face of Cumberbatch.”As Corden wrapped up the tour, a very late Chris Hemsworth boarded the bus and tried to join.”
“The stars of Marvel Studios’ Avengers: Infinity War boarded a bus for the company's inaugural tour.”
“Tom Hiddleston was the first castmember to arrive.”
“After Hiddleston introduced himself a quiet Corden responded I m sorry I just got lost in your eyes Paul Bettany Chris Pratt Benedict Cumberbatch Pom Klementieff Zoe Saldana Winston Duke Sebastian Stan Letitia Wright Elizabeth Olsen Don Cheadle Anthony Mackie and Josh Brolin then all boarded the bus one by...”
“...one to join Hiddleston on the tour...”
““This is more stars than I could have dreamt of,” declared Corden during the boarding process.”
“While welcoming the group to the tour, Corden stated that flash photography was allowed.”
““Just make sure you tag me in all the photos,” he said.”
“The host added, “Weapons are prohibited on the bus.”


"When his partner got out of the car, cordon reluctantly agreed to reschedule the tour for the late star."
"We have to protect the beautiful face of Cumberbatch." At the end of cordon's tour, a late Chris Hemsworth boarded the bus and tried to join
"The stars of Marvel studio's Avenger: Infinite War boarded the bus of the company's founding journey."
"Tom sidleston was the first actor to come."
"After sidleston introduced himself, a quiet Corden replied," I'm sorry I'm lost in your eyes, Paul bettini Chris Platt Benedict Cumberbatch Bohm clementif Zoe soldana Winston Duke Sebastian Stan letia Wright Elizabeth Olsen don sheder Anthony McKee and Joe Hi Brolin then boarded the bus one by one... "
“… A tour to sidleston... "
"It's something I never dreamed of," cordon said as he boarded the plane
While welcoming the tour group, cordon said flash photography was allowed
"Be sure to put my label on all the photos," he said
"No weapons on buses," the owner added



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If the movie wasn’t diverse, it would give the actor a legal reason to back out of the contract — meaning the rider could have a serious effect on all the hiring practices on a film.”
“The clause can be added to contracts for actors and others working on a movie, requiring that the movie’s producers hire a diverse cast and crew.”
“She also mentioned the Inclusion Rider, something people working in film can include in their contracts.”
“...her and asked for producers to tell and finance their stories...”
“Also Read Jennifer Lawrence Jodie Foster to Present Best Actress in Place of Casey Affleck Foster and Lawrence presented the coveted award to Frances McDormand for her role in Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri During her acceptance speech McDormand asked every single other female Oscar nominee to stand up alongside...”
“...told TheWrap that Foster fell while skiing a few weeks ago which is why she needed crutches...”
“Before presenting Best Actress alongside Jennifer Lawrence at the 90th Academy Awards on Sunday night the 55 year old actress hobbled onto the stage with a pair of crutches and a boot joking that Streep had I Tonya ed her although she preferred not to discuss it Foster s representative...”
“Meryl Streep isn’t actually to blame for Jodie Foster needing crutches at the Oscars on Sunday night, but a ski accident is.”


"If the film is not diversified, it will give the actor a legal reason to withdraw from the contract - which means that this additional clause may have a serious impact on all employment in a film."
"This clause can be added to the contracts of actors and other filmmakers, requiring filmmakers to employ different actors and staff."
"She also mentioned the addition of additional clauses, which people working in the film industry can add to the contract."
“… She asked producers to tell and fund their stories... "
"Please also read the award-winning speech of Jennifer Lawrence Jodie Foster, who will replace Casey Affleck foster to win the best actress award. Lawrence presented the coveted award to Frances mcdorman McDormand, because of her role in the award-winning speeches on three billboards outside Missouri
“… Tell the wrap foster that she fell down skiing a few weeks ago, so she needs crutches... "
"Before going to the 90th Academy Awards with Jennifer Lawrence on Sunday night, the 55 year old actress hobbled onto the stage on crutches and boots, joking that Streep let me take her to Tonia. Although she didn't want to discuss this issue, Forster's representative..."
"Meryl Streep should not have been blamed for Judy Foster's need for crutches at the Oscars on Sunday night, but a ski accident was the culprit."



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now let's catch up with Katherine and Dylan revealing what they love about each other the most IRL:”
“Us too.”
“So I am just excited to see what they’re writing up for us.”YES.”
““Well, there were smiles...there will be some smiles...there will be some tears.”
“...slightly less vicious on our heartstrings Maybe some smiles he told E”
“I think Jessica has a really interesting story to tell and recovery to make Netflix While most fans would agree that they re looking for Bryce to be brought to justice Dylan is hoping that the next series will be...”
“"It’s interesting that in the first season we get to see what the characters go through post-Hannah’s death.”
“News.”
“Copyright [Getty]"Personally, I would be interested to see…more discussion into what’s happening afterward," she told E!”
“News that there are still a lot of loose ends looking to be tied up in the story.”


"Now let's see where Catherine and Dylan love each other best"
"So are we."
"So I'm glad to see what they wrote for us." yes
"Well, there's a smile There will be smiles There will be tears. "
“… Our heartstrings are a little less vicious. Maybe he said "smile" to E
"I think Jessica has a very interesting story to tell to restore Netflix, and most fans will agree that they are looking for Bryce to be brought to justice, Dylan hopes the next series will be..."
"Interestingly, in season one, we can see what happened to Hannah's character after her death."
"News."
"Personally, I'd love to see More discussion about what happened later, "she told e!"
"It is reported that there are still many outstanding issues to be solved."



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please give an overall site rating:”
“How can we improve?”
“العربية المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Feedback Home Celebs In Pics Entertainment Video Game Streams Local News Bollywood Music Send MSN Feedback We appreciate your input...”
“Polska polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية المتحدة”
“Deutsch España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines English...”
“...msn entertainment powered by Microsoft News web search Skip to Navigation Skip to Content Sign in Change language and content Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk Deutschland...”


Please give the overall rating of the website:
"How can we improve?"
From 1575; Every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every Respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective Family celebrity feedback local news bollywood music send MSN feedback we thank you for your comments... "
"Polska Polski Portugal Schweiz Germany Singapore English South Africa English Swiss French somisomiswirlich Svenska t ü rkiye t ü rkiye t ü rk ι e United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States Spanish Venezuelan Spanish VI è t Nam Ti è ng VI è t Ε λ λ δ α ε λ η ν ν ι κ p о C è me" "stage II"
“Deutsch España Español France français India English Indiaम2352; 2336; Indiaह2342; Indiaব2482; Indiaత3122; "Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italiano Magyarorsz á g Magyar Malaysia English Mexico Espa NIA ol Nederlands New Zealand English Norge Norsk bokm å L Ö sterreich Deutsch" Philippine English
“… MSN entertainment by Microsoft News supports web search jump to navigation jump to content login change language and content African French French French French French Spanish Argentina Spanish Argentina Spanish Australian English Belgium Netherlands Belgium French Brazil Portuguese Canadian English Canada French sesca Republic Chile Spanish Colombia Spanish Dan Madonna Germany.... "



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“My one regret is that I got the person I love most wrapped up in all that: Rebecca.”Of his family life, Dane said he feels happiest when he’s at home with them.”
“Speaking to PEOPLE in 2014, the actor said, “We’ve all made mistakes.”
“Two years later, Dane entered into rehab for an addiction to painkillers following a sports injury.”
“In 2009, an intimate video of Dane, Gayheart and another woman was released without their knowledge.”
“...number of challenges over the course of their relationship...”
“We kindly ask that you respect our privacy during this time as we navigate the next phase of our lives Image zoom Credit Matt Winkelmeyer Getty Images Gayheart and the former Grey s Anatomy star he rose to fame as Dr Mark Sloan in the ABC drama have faced a...”
““We will continue our friendship and work as a team to co-parent our two beautiful girls as they are the most important thing in the world to us.”
““After 14 years together we have decided that ending our marriage is the best decision for our family,” Dane, 45, said in a statement to PEOPLE.”
“2004 — had decided to end their marriage of 14 years after Gayheart, best known for films such as Jawbreaker and Scream 2, had filed.”
“Earlier this month, PEOPLE confirmed that the couple — who wed Aug. 29.”


"My only regret is that I have wrapped my favorite person, Rebecca, in all this." Speaking of his family life, Denny said he was happiest when he was with them
"In 2014, the actor told people," we all made mistakes. "
Two years later, Danes became addicted to painkillers after sports injuries and entered rehab
"In 2009, intimate videos of the Dane, gayhart and another woman were released without their knowledge."
“… The number of challenges in their relationship... "
"We urge you to respect our privacy during this time, because we are going to enter the next stage of our lives. Thanks to Matt winkelmeyer Getty, guy Hart and the former grey s anatomy star, who is famous for playing Dr. mark Sloan in ABC TV series, is facing a..."
"We will continue our friendship, as a team, to raise our two beautiful girls together, because they are the most important in the world to us."
"After 14 years together, our decision to end our marriage is the best decision for our family," the 45 year old Dane said in a statement
2004 - they decide to end their 14-year marriage after applying for guy Hart, which is famous for movies such as bone breaker and scream 2
Earlier this month, it was confirmed that the couple married on August 29



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Perhaps Chris Evans is in truth a great actor but he plays Captain America like he’s a big dumb hunk of s---,” Evans read out as he exploded into laughter.”
“Fittingly, Captain America got the final blow.”
““Don Cheadle look like a mix between a beetle, a muskrat and a roach,” Cheadle read, “that’s just f----- up,” he added.”
“As the segment continued, the tweets only got harsher.”
“I hate white people,” Johansson read with pure shock on her face.”
““Scarlett Johansson has the emotional range of a f*cking celery.”
“...last night (April 30,) It was time for the cast of Avengers: Infinity War to see that just because their film had the biggest box office opening of all time, didn't mean they were immune to the haters.”
“In the latest edition of “Mean Tweets” on Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
““Tom Hiddleston is so f*cking ugly why is no one acknowledging this,” the actor in question read out with a deadpan stare into the camera.”


"Maybe Chris Evans is actually a great actor, but he plays Captain America like he's a big dumb man" - Evans read, and he burst out laughing
"Just right, the captain of the United States got the last blow."
"Don Cheddar looks like a hybrid of beetles, muskrats and cockroaches," Cheddar read. "It's just nonsense," he added
"As this link continues, Weibo will only become more and more severe."
"I hate white people," Johnson read with pure shock on his face
"Scarlett Johnson's feelings are like a damn celery."
“…… Last night (April 30) was the time for the Avengers: Infinite War actors to see that just because their movie's biggest box office opening ever doesn't mean they're immune to haters. "
Live on the latest issue of "mean twitter" by Jimmy Kimmel
"Tom sidleston is so ugly. Why doesn't anyone admit it?" The actor said, staring at the camera without expression



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So what happens now is basically I’m just chilling waiting to figure out what happens next.”Swift then joined the audience in an a cappella version of her 2007 track “Our Song” before getting into another floating basket and resuming the show.”
““It’s supposed to take me to the other side of the stadium.”
““So what you just saw was me going, like, straight up and down in this sparkly basket,” she said, according to Billboard.”
““It’s a nice view, though.”After she finished performing her song “Delicate,” Swift kept the crowd entertained as stagehands tried to fix the glitch.”
““I’m pretty sure I’m stuck up here,” she told the crowd.”
“The singer later shared a photo of the happy occasion on Instagram, captioning the pic with the hashtag “#thirdwheel.”Swift’s concert in Philadelphia the following night made headlines, too, since a stage malfunction trapped her in a “sparkly basket” in midair.”
“Yannuzzi got down on bended knee, Pysher said yes, and Swift watched the proposal with mouth agape.”
“Help me spread the word so Taylor can see this.”Fortuitously, Yannuzzi and Pysher were randomly selected to take a photo with Swift during a meet-and-greet backstage.”
““I want to give my girlfriend the proposal of her dreams!”
““I NEED YOUR HELP!” he tweeted on June 3.”


"So what's happening now is basically I'm waiting to figure out what's going to happen next." Swift then joined the audience in the unaccompanied version of her 2007 song "our song" and went on to another floating basket
"You should take me to the other side of the stadium."
"So what you just saw was me, like, up and down in this shiny basket," she said, according to the billboard
"But the view is good." After swift finished her song delicate, the stage manager tried to solve the problem, and she kept the audience happy
"I'm sure I'm stuck here," she told the crowd
The singer later shared a photo of the happy moment on instagram and tagged it with "third wheel" in the title. The next night, Swift's concert in Philadelphia also made headlines, because of stage failure, she was trapped in the "shining basket" in mid air
"Janucci knelt down, pisher agreed, and swift looked at the offer with his mouth wide open."
"Help me spread the word so Tyler can see it." As it happens, Yannuzzi and pysher were randomly selected to take pictures with swift at a backstage meeting
"I want to give my girlfriend a dream proposal!"
"I need your help! "He tweeted on June 3."



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Photo: MTV)”
“The charity auction will also include Diem’s own jersey from 2008’s “The Gauntlet III.” (At press time Diem’s shirt had the highest bid at over $250!)”
“On January 16, The Challenge Charity Auction will kick off on eBay, giving fans of the show a chance to bid on memorabilia from the show’s long history.”
“The proceeds from the charity auction will benefit the charity Bright Pink, the only national non-profit focused on the prevention and early detection of breast and ovarian cancer in young women.”
“As ‘Challenge’ fans know, Diem passed away from ovarian cancer in 2014.”
“Before her death, Diem was extremely dedicated to helping women learn the importance of early cancer detection.”
“Diem made her Challenge debut in 2006 on Fresh Meat and went on to compete in The Duel The Gauntlet The Duel II The Ruins Battle of the Exes Rivals II and Battle of the Exes II She passed away two months after filming ended for Battle of the Exes...”
“II having received her third cancer diagnosis since her 2006 debut...”
“According to a press release for the charity auction, items being offered include signed game jerseys from the “Champs vs. Stars” and “Dirty 30” seasons.”
“Challengers who donated to the auction include Johnny Bananas, Emily Schromm, Wes Bergmann, Terrell Owens, Justina Valentine, Tori Deal, and Diem’s ex-boyfriend CT Tamburello (to name just a few!)”


"(photo: MTV)"
The charity auction will also include Tim's own Jersey from 2008's "challenge III". (as of press time, Tim's shirt had the highest bid of more than $250!) "
"On January 16, the challenge charity auction will open on eBay, giving fans the opportunity to bid for souvenirs from the show's long history."
"The proceeds from the charity auction will benefit the charity Liangfen, which is the only non-profit organization in the country focusing on the prevention and early detection of breast and ovarian cancer in young women."
"As challenge fans know, Tim died of ovarian cancer in 2014."
"Before she died, Tim was very committed to helping women understand the importance of early cancer detection."
"Tim took part in the challenge for the first time in 2006's fresh meat, and took part in duels" challenge "," duel II "," battle of ruins of former competitor II "and" battle of former competitor II ". Two months after the shooting of "battle of the former competitors", she died... "
"I was diagnosed with cancer for the third time since my debut in 2006..."
According to a press release from the charity auction, the items included signature jerseys for the "champion vs. star" and "dirty 30" seasons
"The challengers to donate to the auction include Johnny banana, Emily schrom, Wes Bergman, Terrel Owens, Justina Valentine, Tori Deere and Tim's ex boyfriend CT temprero (to name a few!)"



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’d go after I wrapped on set, or I’d go on my days off.”
“Sometimes I was out there for five or six hours at a time.”
“I did it for two weeks.”
“I sat outside on Wacker just across the street from Trump Tower asking Trump voters to come sit down across from me and speak and I would listen.”
“This was shortly after the election and I was so confused and enraged and sad and I had all these feelings and I didn’t have a creative outlet to express it, so created a piece of performance art.”
“I created a performance piece because I didn’t know what else to do!”
“A: Yes, that is correct.”


"I'll go after the set, or on a day off."
"Sometimes I stay out for five or six hours."
"I did it for two weeks."
"I'm sitting on Wacker Street opposite the trump building, asking trump voters to come and sit opposite me and speak, and I'll listen."
"Shortly after the election, I felt very confused, angry and sad. I had all these feelings. I didn't have a creative outlet to express it, so I created a performance art work."
"I created a performance because I don't know what else to do!"
A: Yes, that's right



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Miley Cyrus Drops 'Younger Now': The Meaning Behind Her New, Elvis-Inspired Song This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Check out the video below to see the beautifully shot video.”
“Last week, the singer dropped the Elvis-inspired music video for her new album's title track "Younger Now," paying tribute to her country roots while seemingly reflecting on her own career so far.”
“WATCH: Miley Cyrus' Transformation Timeline: From Disney Star to Infamous Twerker to Fresh-Faced 'Malibu'While Cyrus appears nearly nude on the Lost + Found cover, as a musical artist she's reinventing her wild child image into a more reserved and introspective persona.”
“Lost + Found, which hits shelves Dec. 1, is currently available for pre-order, and retails for $69.99.”
“The book contains more than 150 previously unpublished photos of some of LaChappelle's most famous subjects, including Amy Winehouse, David Bowie, Hillary Clinton, Amber Rose, Naomi Campbell, Lady Gaga, Kanye West, Michael Jackson and many others.”
“...to fame all while photographing some of the most recognizable figures in pop culture often showing the darker and less glamorous aspects of stardom...”
“David LaChappelle Taschen WATCH Miley Cyrus Sees Herself as a Genderless Spirit I m Just a Spirit Soul Lost Found published by Taschen is LaChappelle s first publication in 10 years and it details the iconic photographer s career from his beginnings in 1980s New York City through his rise...”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Miley Cyrus gave up 'younger now': the meaning behind her new, Elvis inspired song. This video is not available because we can't load information from sponsors."
"Please check out the video below to see the beautiful video shot."
"Last week, the singer gave up Elvis Presley inspired music videos for her new album's main song, younger now, to pay homage to her motherland, and seems to be reflecting on her career so far."
"Watch: Miley Cyrus's transformation schedule: from Disney star to infamous twick, and then to" Malibu ". Cyrus is almost naked on the cover of lost and found. As a music artist, she is reshaping her wild child image into a more introverted and introspective character."
"Lost and found" went on sale on December 1. It is now available for pre purchase and retails at $69.99
"This book contains more than 150 previously unpublished photos of some of lakapel's most famous subjects, including Amy Winehouse, David Bowie, Hillary Clinton, amber Ross, Naomi Campbell, Lady Gaga, Kanye West, Michael Jackson, etc."
“…… At the same time of becoming famous, shooting some of the most famous people in popular culture often shows the dark and less charming side of the identity of a star.... "
"David lacapel tasson sees Miley Cyrus as a soul without gender. I'm just a soul without soul. This book published by tasson is lacapel's first book in 10 years. It describes in detail the career of this iconic photographer, from his New York in the early 1980s to his rise..."



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s going to make great TV,” a source says.”
“I mean, the anchor had to be sawed off before they made it home because it was so rusty and tangled.”
““The vessel was so shaky and the waters so rocky that the women got really sick.”
““It was a disaster,” the source said.”
“And when the boat’s anchor caught mid-ride, the reality stars were left terrified.”
“Turbulent seas caused several people to get sick.”
“...because they knew it would make good TV Things got worse when the boat finally left the dock...”
“That s how bad this was Image zoom Tinsley Mortimer Sonja Morgan Bethenny Frankel Ramona Singer Dorinda Medly Luann de Lessepts Carole Radziwill Credit Patrick Ecclesine Bravo They didn t want to board the ship to ho home initially complaining right off the bat But production pushed them to continue...”
““There were no amenities, no food, and a crew that didn’t know what they were doing.”
“According to sources, one cast member found herself sick with a parasite and “had to wear a diaper.” Singer was also spotted in a wheelchair at the airport.”


"It's going to be a great TV," one source said
"I mean, the anchor has to be sawn off before they go home because it's rusty and tangled."
"The boat was rickety, the water was in a mess, and the women were very ill."
"It's a disaster," the source said
"When the boat broke down in the middle, the reality show stars were scared."
"The rough sea makes several people sick."
“… Because they know that when the ship finally leaves the dock, good TV programs get worse... "
"It's so bad, it's image zooming Tinsley Mortimer Sonia Morgan Bethany Frankel Ramona singer Dorinda medelli Andrew seputz Carol laziwell credit Patrick ecclessing Bravo they don't want to get on the boat home initially complaining about bats, but production pushes them on..."
"There's no amenities, no food, and a team of people who don't know what they're doing."
According to sources, an actor found himself infected with parasites and "had to wear diapers.". At the airport, the singer was also found in a wheelchair



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I will always look back at this time in my life with so much gratitude and love."”
“The former Bachelorette said of the breakup, "Garrett and I came to this decision after many conversations.”
““I feel like I could be happy with either guy and both of them would be a right choice for me,” she said.”
““But I’m going for the one that I can’t see myself without.”
“This love feels like it just fits my soul, it just fits my heart.”
“I’m so happy that I pushed through to find what I’ve always wanted.”
“I really feel like I ve not only found my partner in this but I ve also found myself In June 2020 Kufrin revealed that she didn t know the status of her relationship with Yrigoyen following his support of law enforcement in the wake of national protests against systemic...”
“...racism and police brutality...”
“In August 2020, after two years together, the pair called it quits.”
“Kufrin confirmed the split on the podcast she cohosts with fellow Bachelorette alum, Rachel Lindsay, Bachelor Happy Hour.”


"I will always look back on this moment in my life with so much gratitude and love."
"Garrett and I made this decision after many conversations," the former bachelor said of the breakup
"I think I'll be happy with any man and they're both the right choices for me," she said
"But I'm looking for someone I can't see myself."
"This love makes me feel that it suits my soul and my heart very well."
"I'm glad I've tried to find what I've always wanted."
"I really feel that not only did I find my partner in this matter, but also I found myself in June 2020. Kuflin revealed that after the national protest against systemic crime and his support for law enforcement, she did not know her relationship with yrigoyen..."
“… Racism and police brutality... "
"In August 2020, after two years together, they announced their separation."
"Kuflynn confirmed the differences in her podcast" Bachel happy hour "with single schoolgirl Rachel Lindsay



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““But sure, you hope that something like this could be transformed into a benefit for people rather than just a sad or tragic situation.””
“But you do hear a million fanciful rumors all the time.”
“...was because he is a sad sick man Allen said Via Variety...”
““I was surprised it was treated differently.”
“Lest there be any ambiguity this statement clarifies my intention and feelings Woody Allen addressed the very sad Harvey Weinstein sexual assault scandal in a new interview where the filmmaker admitted that he was unaware of the severity of the...”
“...claims against the producer...”
““No one ever came to me or told me horror stories with any real seriousness,” Allen told the BBC.”
““And they wouldn’t, because you are not interested in it.”
“You are interested in making your movie.”
“And some turn out to be true and some many are just stories about this actress or that actor The director and the producer have a long business relationship Allen directed films like Mighty Aphrodite and Bullets Over Broadway were...”


"Of course, you want such a thing to become a welfare to the people, not just a sad or tragic situation."
"But you always hear a lot of fantasy rumors."
“… It's because he's a sad patient, and Alan said through the variety show
"I'm surprised it's treated differently."
"To avoid any ambiguity, this statement clarifies my intentions and feelings. In a new interview, Woody Allen talked about the very sad Harvey Weinstein sex abuse scandal, and the filmmaker admitted that he did not know the seriousness of the scandal..."
“… Claims against manufacturers... "
"No one has ever come to me and no one has told me a horror story seriously," Allen told the BBC
"They won't because you're not interested."
"You're interested in making movies."
"Some are true, some are just about the actress or the actor. The director and producer have a long-term business relationship. Allen's films" magnificent Aphrodite "and" Broadway bullets "..."



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The programme also has the mostly insanely catchy theme tune, performed by Cribbins himself.”
“...of his adventures at sea with his dog Salty...”
“Charlie and Lola is very funny.”
“The good-natured battles between the two characters are highly amusing for anyone who has grown up with brothers and sisters.”
“The episode in which Lola ruins Charlie’s Birthday party by opening all his presents is bound to stir some memories for many people.”
“The show is so well-observed that you really do feel like you’re watching a genuine sibling relationship.”
“It also delivers a great deal of humour from the perspective of a parent.”
“A lot of the things Lola says, or can’t believe, are familiar to what our own children come out with, and being a parent can be the funniest thing in the world.”
“Old Jack’s BoatWhy kids love it: This is a bit of a mixed one.”
“On the one hand it s the story of a wise old fisherman Bernard Cribbins and the assortment of oddballs who populate his seaside town and on the other it s a Jackanory type affair with Jack telling a tale...”


"There's also one of the most fascinating themes of the show, which kribins played himself."
“… The adventure of him and his dog at sea... "
"Charlie and Lola are fun."
"The belligerence between the two characters is very interesting for anyone who grows up with brothers and sisters."
"The episode of Lola opening all of Charlie's presents and ruining his birthday party is bound to stir up some memories for many people."
"It's a good watch. You really feel like you're watching a real sibling relationship."
"From a parent's point of view, it also conveys a lot of humor."
"A lot of what Lola says, or can't believe it, is familiar to our own children. Being a parent can be the most interesting thing in the world."
"Old Jack's boat kids love it: it's a bit of a mix."
"On the one hand, it's the story of a clever old fisherman, Bernard cribbins, and all kinds of strange people living in his seaside town; on the other hand, it's a jack like story, Jack is telling a story..."



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tips for Beach Wedding Attire for GuestsFabricsLight and airy fabrics that don’t cling to the body are the best choices for women, especially if the beach wedding is held during the warm seasons of the year.”
“Put on a flowing maxi dress, and if you insist on wearing something short, ensure that it fits close to the body to ensure that nothing gets blown up.”
“Appropriate fabricOnce you know what the weather will be like, picking the right outfit for the beach wedding becomes quite easy.”
“Men can bring their suit jacket to manage the cold temperatures.”
“The best way for women to prepare for cool breezes when attending a beach wedding is to carry a pashmina or a shawl.”
“Also, you can use the location of the wedding to know the prevailing weather conditions and know whether you will be packing your warm clothes or rocking in breathable fabrics.”
“This explains the importance of making sure that you consider the season, and therefore the weather when choosing the outfit for the beach wedding.”
“Consider the weatherWhile beach weddings are thought to be limited only to the warm times of the year, many people have beach wedding throughout the year regardless of the season.”
“The last thing you want is to be the odd one out.”
“On the other hand, if the invitation doesn’t include the dressing code, you can seek clarification from the couple itself or ask around to know what everyone else will be wearing.”


"Tips for beach wedding guests: lightweight and breathable fabric is the best choice for women, especially when the beach wedding is held in the warm season of the year."
"Wear an elegant long skirt. If you insist on wearing a short one, make sure it is close to your body to make sure nothing will blow up."
"If you know what the weather will be like, it's easy to choose the right clothes for a beach wedding."
"Men can take suits and coats to keep out the cold."
"The best way for a woman to prepare for a cool breeze at a beach wedding is to carry a Pashmina or shawl with her."
"In addition, you can also use the location of the wedding to understand the weather conditions at that time, and know whether you want to pack warm clothes or swing with breathable fabrics."
"It shows that when choosing clothes for a beach wedding, you have to consider the season, so you have to consider the weather as well."
"Think about the weather. Although people think beach weddings are only held at warm times of the year, many people have beach weddings all year round, regardless of season."
"The last thing you want to do is be a weirdo."
"On the other hand, if there is no dress code in the invitation, you can ask the new person for clarification, or you can ask around to find out what other people will wear."



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Plastic surgeon Terry Dubrow explained to Kardashian that weight loss can play a role in the size of your nose.”
““Everyone says I’ve had a nose job because my nose is smaller now and I swear I haven’t,” she said.”
“Although the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star hasn’t gotten a nose job in the past, she isn’t opposed to having it done in the future.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On Friday, the Good American jeans founder admitted on Instagram that she thinks daily about getting the procedure done, but is currently relying on the power of makeup — specifically contouring — for her desired look.”
““@madi_martell did she get her nose done or just really fleeky contouring,” Instagram account holder @allysonclifton asked.”
“In response, Kardashian, 34, replied, “One day I think I’ll get one because I think about it everyday.”
“But I’m scared so for now it’s all about contour.”Image zoom Credit: Khloe Kardashian/InstagramKardashian, who became a first-time mom to daughter True Thompson in April, has been open with her opinions about plastic surgery in the past.”
““There’s this misconception that I’m not into plastic surgery, but I’m into it and I don’t care if you have it,” the reality star told Cosmopolitan in 2016.”
““We’re all putting on a f—— mask basically every day anyway,” she said.”


"Plastic surgeon Terry dubro explained to Kardashian that losing weight has an effect on the size of your nose."
"Everyone said I had nose surgery because my nose is smaller now, and I swear I didn't," she said
"Although the star who keeps in touch with Kardashian has not had nose surgery in the past, she is not opposed to having nose surgery in the future."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
On Friday, the founder of "good American jeans" admitted on instagram that she is thinking about how to complete the operation every day, but is now relying on the power of makeup - especially shaping - to achieve the effect she wants
"Madi è u Martell, did she have a nose job or did she really have a hairy silhouette job?" asked Allyson Clifton, an instagram account holder
In response, Kardashian, 34, said, "one day I'll get one because I think about it every day."
"But I'm scared, so now it's all about the outline." Photo zooming credit: Khloe Kardashian / instagram Kardashian, who became the first mother and daughter true Thompson in April, has always been open to plastic surgery
"Some people misunderstand that I don't like plastic surgery, but I like plastic surgery, and I don't care if you have plastic surgery," the reality TV star told the world metropolis daily in 2016
"In any case, we basically wear an f-mask every day," she said



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He has responsibilities in life that she has yet to experience.”Since getting together in September 2016, Lawrence and Aronofsky kept their relationship private, only making their public debut as a couple at the Venice Film Festival photocall nearly one year later.”
“Jen has yet to figure out her life and how it will evolve.”
““Each has to look practically to the future.”
“Image zoom Credit: TheImageDirect.com“There is a huge age difference, and they are different people,” the insider says.”
“They had fun, shared many beliefs, and enjoyed what they could learn from each other.”A source close to the pair suggests the age difference between the Oscar winner, 26, and the producer-director, 48, played a key role in the split.”
““They were never destined for marriage.”
““Once they are onto new projects and interests, it’s harder to keep up relationships of any kind,” a show business source told PEOPLE.”
“Lawrence and Aronofsky split in November after over a year of dating and just two months after the release of their movie mother!”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The pair appeared to be in good spirits during their afternoon stroll.”


"He has responsibilities in life that she hasn't experienced yet." Lawrence and Aronofsky have been in a private relationship since they got together in September 2016, until nearly a year later they made their debut as a couple at the Venice Film Festival
"Jane hasn't figured out her life and how it's going to evolve."
"Everyone has to look to the future."
"Image zoom: TheImageDirect.com "There's a huge age difference, they're different people," insiders said
"They have a good time, have a lot of common beliefs, and like what they learn from each other." The age difference between the 26 year old Oscar winner and the 48 year old producer was a key factor in their breakup, a person familiar with the matter said
"They were never meant to get married."
"Once they start a new project and interest, it's hard to maintain any kind of relationship," one showbiz person told people
Lawrence and Aronofsky broke up in November after dating for more than a year and two months after the film "mother" was released
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"They seem to be in good spirits when they walk in the afternoon."



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““So tasteless breaking the Vegas news to Mariah Carey live on TV, shame on you,” one Twitter user wrote.”
“I hope we have an end to this as soon as possible.”Viewers raged online at the awkward interview, with many criticising producers’ decision to quiz Mariah about the shooting.”
“It hurts my heart that this would happen to anyone who was just coming out to enjoy what should have been a fun night.”
“My Thoughts and prayers go out to everyone involved tonight.”
“I still dont know what to say but wanted to let everyone know that Me and my Crew are safe.”
“Tonight has been beyond horrific.”
“Aldean has two children and his wife is pregnant with their third.”
“It hurts my heart that this would happen to anyone who was just coming out to enjoy what should have been a fun night.”He added the hashtags #heartbroken and #stopthehate.”
“My thoughts and prayers go out to everyone involved tonight.”
“I still don’t know what to say but wanted to let everyone know that me and my crew are safe.”


One twitter user wrote: "it's tasteless to live the news of Vegas on TV to Maria Carey. You're disgraced."
"I hope we can finish this as soon as possible." Viewers were furious at the embarrassing interview online, with many criticizing the producer's decision to ask Maria questions about the shooting
"It's heartbreaking for anyone who just came out to enjoy what should have been a fun night."
"Tonight I express my thoughts and prayers to all concerned."
"I still don't know what to say, but I want you to know that I and my crew are safe."
"It's a terrible night."
"Aldin has two children and his wife has a third."
"It's heartbreaking for anyone who just came out to enjoy what should have been a fun night." He also labeled it "heartbreak" and "stop hating."
"Tonight I express my thoughts and prayers to all concerned."
"I still don't know what to say, but I want you to know that I and my crew are safe."



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The show is produced by WABC-TV in New York and executive produced by Michael Gelman, Ripa, and Seacrest.”
“Plainly said, everyone loves him, and so will our daily viewers.”“Live with Kelly and Ryan” is distributed in national syndication by Disney-ABC Home Entertainment and TV Distribution.”
“His tremendous success is only matched by his impeccable reputation.”
“Ryan is a close friend and his star shines as brightly off camera as it does on.”
““I am thrilled to start my mornings with him every day, and we are so fortunate at ‘Live’ to have him join the family.”
“...in a statement...”
“Seacrest s move into the seat next to Ripa comes nearly a year after Ripa s former co host Michael Strahan left the Disney distributed show for an anchor slot on ABC s Good Morning America Ryan is a quintessential broadcaster and at the top of his game said Ripa...”
“Phil” and “Ellen.”Ripa and Seacrest announced the surprise choice at the start of Monday’s edition of the show, which Ripa has hosted since early 2001.”
“The numbers were good enough to make the show the number one syndicated talk show on Monday in both measurements, topping “Dr.”
“It also drew a 1.3 rating in women 25-54.”


"The play was produced by wabc-tv in New York and by Michael Gelman, Ripa and Seacrest."
"To put it bluntly, everyone loves him, and so does our audience every day." "Living with Kelly and Ryan" is jointly released by Disney ABC Family Entertainment and TV distribution company across the country
"His great success can only be compared with his impeccable reputation."
"Ryan is a close friend and his star shines out of the camera as well as on the camera."
"I'm happy to be with him every morning, and we're lucky to be alive to have him in the family."
“… In the statement
"Seacrest moved into the position next to Ripa nearly a year ago when Ripa's former co host Michael Strahan left Disney's program and went to ABC's good morning American channel to act as anchor. Ryan is a typical broadcaster, saying Ripa at the top of his game..."
"Phil" and "Allen." Ripa and Seacrest announced the surprise choice at the start of Monday's show, which Ripa has been hosting since early 2001
Both numbers are enough to make the show number one on Monday's joint talk show, surpassing "Dr
"Among women aged 25-54, it also scored 1.3."



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The eye of the storm is expected to hit the Sunshine State on Sunday.”
“Six million Florida residents were ordered to evacuate before the first effects of Irma were felt in the Florida Keys on Saturday, bringing winds of 125 mph.”
“In a video posted on his Facebook page on Friday, September 8, the evangelical Christian spoke out about the disasters.”
““How should we look at two giant hurricanes coming back-to-back like this?” the 46-year-old said in the clip recorded at the airport in Orlando, Florida.”
““Do we write them off as coincidence?”
“Do we write it off as a statistical anomaly?”
“Wow!”
“Who would’ve thought?”
“Is it just Mother Nature in a bad mood?”
“I don t know how you think about it but I think it could be something much more than all of that He then quoted a section from the Bible and said that hurricanes are a spectacular display of God s immense power When he puts his power on display...”


"The eye of the storm is expected to hit sunny state on Sunday."
"Six million Florida residents were ordered to evacuate with winds of 125 miles an hour before IRMA's first impact was felt in the Florida islands on Saturday."
"On Friday, September 8, the evangelical Christian spoke out about the disaster in a video posted on Facebook."
"What do we think of two big hurricanes coming like this? The 46 year old man said in a video recorded at Orlando Airport in Florida
"Do we think of them as coincidences?"
"Do we treat it as a statistical anomaly?"
"Wow
"Who would have thought of that?"
"Is it just mother nature in a bad mood?"
"I don't know what you think, but I think it's probably much more than he quoted a verse from the Bible. He said that when God shows his power, the hurricane is a spectacular display of God's great power..."



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...real life...”
“You re the best come on She also tells the droid that though those porgs are adorable you re my guy BB 8 Head to theaters this weekend to see if Admiral Holdo and BB 8 are just as adorable in Star Wars The Last Jedi as they are in...”
“Ahead of their appearance Thursday on Good Morning America, the actress from The Last Jedi was spotted giving a pep talk to the roly-poly droid for the live taping.”
““Honey, you don’t have to be nervous,” Dern tells BB-8.”
““BB, you’ve done this so much.”
“We’ve been doing press all week.”Her advice for dealing with all the cameras?”
““Stay focused and have a great time, BB!”If that weren’t enough, the video (shown above) ends with Dern giving the mechanical ball of love a belly rub.”
“Reese Witherspoon, Dern’s Big Little Lies costar, even commented on the exchange.”
““I love him!”
“Can BB-8 be in [Big Little Lies season 2]?” Witherspoon tweeted.”


“… Real life... "
"You're the best. Come on, she also told the robot that although the pigs are cute, you're my man bb8. This weekend, I'll go to the cinema to see if general holdo and bb8 are as cute as they were in the last Jedi of Star Wars..."
"Before Thursday's Good Morning America, it was found that the actress of the last Jedi was making an inspiring speech for the live recording of Roly Poly droid."
"Honey, you don't have to be nervous," Dean told bb-8
"BB, you've done so much."
"We've been doing news all week." Her advice on dealing with all cameras? "
"Stay focused and have a good time, BB! "If that's not enough, the end of the video (shown above) is that dern rubs the ball of mechanical love."
"Reese Witherspoon, Dean's big lie little lie partner, even commented on the deal."
"I love him!"
"Can bb-8 play" big lies and little lies Season 2 "? "Witherspoon tweeted."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Serena Williams flaunts slim waist in form-fitting dress just one month after giving birth...”
“He was four years old when his father first beat him: “I remember it so well,” he said.”
“Petty was reportedly found unconscious in his Malibu home and rushed to the UCLA Santa Monica Hospital on Sunday night.”
“He was put on life support, but after it was determined that he had no brain activity, the decision was made on Monday to pull life support, according to TMZ.”
“Petty’s music career began more than 40 years ago with a local Gainesville, Fla. band named Mudcrutch.”
“The group fell apart, but two of its members, Mike Campbell and Benmont Tench, would soon rejoin their friend for a new (and much longer-lasting) venture: Tom Petty and the Heartbreakers.”
“Between 1976 and 1987, Tom Petty and the Heartbreakers released seven albums, organically becoming one of the biggest rock bands in the world.”
“Their third album Damn the Torpedoes 1979 went platinum almost immediately featuring breakthrough singles like Don t Do Me Like That and Refugee After a break from the band in the early 90s Tom Petty reunited with the Heartbreakers first for a movie soundtrack and then for their 1999 album...”
“Echo Since then the band has released three more albums and continue to tour around the globe Just last week they wrapped their 40th anniversary tour...”
“In his 2015 biography, Petty opened up about the darkness that had plagued him since childhood.”


"Serena Williams shows off her slim waist in a slim dress just one month after delivery..."
He was only four when his father first hit him: "I remember it very well," he said
"It is reported that Patty was found unconscious at Malibu's home and was taken to UCLA Santa Monica hospital on Sunday night."
He received life support, but decided on Monday to withdraw it after confirming that he had no brain activity, TMZ reported
Patty's music career began more than 40 years ago with a local band called mudcrutch in Gainesville, Florida
"The organization is falling apart, but two of its members, Mike Campbell and benmont Tengqi, will soon rejoin their friends and embark on a new (more enduring) Adventure: Tom Petty and heartbreak."
From 1976 to 1987, Tom Petty and heartbreaker released seven albums, becoming one of the largest rock bands in the world
"Their third album, 1979 damned torpedo, won platinum records almost immediately, including the breakthrough single don't do that to me and refugee. After breaking off from the band in the early 1990s, Tom Petty reunited with heartbreaker, first for the soundtrack of the film, and then for the 1999 album..."
"Since then, echo has released three more albums and continued to tour around the world. Just last week, they ended their 40th Anniversary Tour..."
"In her 2015 biography, Patty revealed the darkness that had plagued him since childhood."



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Stay tuned for more spoilers and updates.”
“"Bachelor in Paradise" Season 3 (2016) finale airs Sept. 5 and 6 at 8:30 pm on ABC.”
“The popular summer series airs Sunday and Monday nights on ABC at 8pm (Photo : Jesse Grant/Getty Images)"Bachelor in Paradise" Season 3 (2016) finale is only a week away.”
“ABC's latest reality dating show will see how contestants' quest of finding new love concludes.”
“Will they find love or not?”
“Will there be breakups or engagements?”
“Rumours suggest that only three six pairs come out of as couples in the end.”
“Here are the ultimate spoilers for the final rose ceremony revealing the couples that win it all and find love in Sayulita, Mexico.”
“Read on to find out what happens in the finale.”
“AdvertisementSpoiler alert!”


"Please continue to pay attention to more saboteurs and updates."
The season 3 (2016) finale of singles in paradise will be broadcast on ABC at 8:30 p.m. on September 5 and 6
The final episode of singles in paradise Season 3 (2016) will be broadcast on ABC at 8pm on Sunday and Monday in a week's time (photo: Jesse grant / Getty Images)
"ABC's latest reality show will see how contestants' search for new love ends."
"Will they find love?"
"Will there be a breakup or an engagement?"
"It's rumored that only three couples and six couples will make their debut in the end."
"The following is the ultimate spoiler of the final rose ceremony, revealing the couple who won everything and found love in sajolita, Mexico."
"Read on and see what happens in the end."
"Ad spoiler alert!"



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I love that when we get to the saucy stuff it’s a beautiful acceptance of a wordless … yep.”[Featured Image by Frazer Harrison/Getty Images]”
“The throne’s big enough for one dragon bum, and that’s mine.”
“Sunday night’s finale finally confirmed that Jon Snow is the legitimate son of Rhaegar Targaryen and Lyanna Stark, making him the rightful heir to the Iron Throne.”
“The episode also revealed that Jon’s real name is actually Aegon Targaryen and that Daenerys is his aunt.”
“So when Jon Snow and Daenerys Targaryen made love on their boat ride to the North, fans were freaked out by the incestuous scene.”
“The same goes for the actors that played the characters, Kit Harington and Emilia Clarke.”
“The Game of Thrones stars admitted that they were blown away by the revelation that complicates their budding romance.”
“In an interview with Entertainment Weekly, Emilia Clarke shared her thoughts on how Daenerys will react when she finds out that Jon is her nephew.”
“The 30-year-old actress predicted that the Mother of Dragons will probably be grossed out by the incestuous pairing.”
““Ewwwww!”


"I like that when we talk about playful things, it's a nice acceptance of silence Yes
"The throne is big enough to hold a dragon tramp. That's mine."
"The final on Sunday night confirmed Jon Snow as the legitimate son of reggae tangglien and liana stark, making him the legitimate successor to the Iron Throne."
"The episode also reveals that Jon's real name is actually Argonne tangorian, and daenerys is his aunt."
"So when Jon Snow and Denise tangorian had sex on their boat to the north, fans were terrified by the incest."
"It's the same with the actors kit Harrington and Amelia Clark who play these roles."
The stars of "game of Thrones" admit to being struck by the revelations that complicate their budding love
"In an interview with entertainment weekly, Amelia Clark shared her thoughts on danielis' reaction to the discovery that Jon was her nephew."
"The 30-year-old actress predicted that the mother of the dragon would probably be surprised by the incestuous couple."
"Wow



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Anger turned to sobbing turned to fleeing the set and getting a hotel room.”
“They were probably just talking about craft services honestly but in my mind she was like “hey we should bone” and he was like “haha fuck yeah!” — christine teigen (@chrissyteigen) July 30, 2018A few more shoulder touches and laughs with her later, I lost it.”
““Keep in mind john and I met on a video,” she reminded fans.”
“BUT DONT TEST ME.”The video shoot was particularly sensitive for Teigen because she and the Grammy winner were first introduced on the 2007 set of his “Stereo” visual.”
“I’m better now.”
“I was just a jealous, angry 22 year old.”
“Anyhow I wish more happened but no.”
“Everyone was.”
“...was baffled.”
““The director (ALAN FERGUSON!)”


"Anger turned into crying, into escaping from the set and getting a hotel room."
"They may just be honest about manual service, but in my mind, she's like," Hey, we should bone, "and he's like," ha ha, fuck, yeah! "Christine Taigen (@ Christy Teigen) on July 30, 2018a, I'll lose it if I touch her shoulder and smile a few more times."
"Remember that John and I met in the same video," she reminded fans
"But don't test me." This video is particularly sensitive to tygan because she and the Grammy winner were first introduced in the 2007 "three-dimensional" video of tygan
"I'm much better now."
"I'm just a jealous, angry 22-year-old."
"Anyway, I want more to happen, but it's not."
"Everyone is."
“… I'm confused. "
"Director (Alan Ferguson!)"



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Hall defended himself with a bag and eventually made it to his office.”
“He then attempts to enter the building and is challenged by our local geese.”
“Lieutenant Shane Basset shared footage from a surveillance camera at police headquarters saying, "Detective Hall forgot his keys...”
“P D”
“But it was a ferocious waterfowl that threatened Detective Hall on his way to work at the Clarksville Police Department in Indiana Hall was attacked by a goose as he tried to walk down the sidewalk into the building Clarksville...”
“CLARKSVILLE, Indiana (KTRK) -- Police officers put their lives on the line every day, facing all kinds of danger.”


"Hall defended himself with a bag and finally got to the office."
"Then he tried to get into the building and was challenged by our local geese."
"Lieutenant Shane Bassett shared the video from the security camera at the police headquarters and said," detective hall forgot his key... "
“P D”
"But this is a ferocious waterfowl that threatens detective hall. On his way to work at Clarksville police station in Indiana, he was attacked by a goose when he tried to walk along the sidewalk into Clarksville's building..."
"Clarksville, Indiana (KTRK) - the police are risking their lives every day, facing all kinds of dangers."



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...falsefalse...”
“At the end of the day, we likely won’t ever know what inspired the look, but we do know people loved it.”
“Morgan noted that the SAG Awards still aren’t gender neutral and called for change in his acceptance speech, which adds some weight to the theory.”
“There’s also a possibility that he was paying tribute to the Time’s Up movement — since the hat was black.”
“For one, he might have just liked it (which is valid).”
“Freeman joked about the moment, saying, “You see what I had to put up with?”While the actor didn’t reveal why he was wearing the cap, we have a few solid theories.”
“Now we can see you,” she quipped.”
““There we go.”
““Lift up your hat,” she said, making the moment more notable.”
“Freeman accepted the Life Achievement Award and his friend Rita Moreno — who presented the big honor — was quick to point out that he accepted it while sporting the baseball cap.”


“… Fake... "
"At the end of the day, we may never know what inspired the look, but we know people love it."
"Morgan pointed out that the sag award is still not gender neutral, and he called for a change in the acceptance speech, which adds some weight to this theory."
"He may also be paying homage to the progress of the times - because the hat is black."
"First of all, he may just like it (it works)."
Freeman joked, "do you know what I have to endure? "Although the actor didn't disclose why he wore the hat, we have some solid theories."
"Now we can see you," she joked
"All right."
"Raise your hat," she said, making the moment more compelling
"Freeman won the lifetime achievement award, and his friend Rita Moreno quickly pointed out that he accepted it when he was wearing a baseball cap."



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The show is expected to return to Bravo later this year.”
“It has been filming its fifth season in the St. Martin-St. Maarten area with a much smaller cast than previous seasons, to include Kate Chastain, Nico Scholly and Captain Lee Rosbach.”
“The cast and crew of Bravo's Below Deck got a rude awakening when their production boat sank in Caribbean waters on February 10, according to the Soualiga Post.”
“No one was hurt, according to Tricia, the chief on board the Silver Queen.”
“Rough waters!”
“The cast and crew of Bravo s Below Deck got a rude awakening when their production boat sank in Caribbean waters on February 10 according to the Soualiga Post the cast of season four is pictured here The canteen boat for the television show crew had arrived in Marigot three...”
“...days earlier...”
“After it got to the Marina Fort Louis' waters on February 9, trouble started.”
“It was around 12.00am Atlantic when the ship went down, after breaking its propeller with a mooring rope, according to the local paper.”
“No one was hurt No one was hurt according to Tricia the chief on board the Silver Queen Captain Lee Rosbach is pictured here It started out OK The canteen boat for the television show crew had arrived in Marigot three days earlier L R Sierra Storm Kyle Dixon Nico...”


"The show is expected to return to Bravo later this year."
"It's already shot its fifth season in St Martin St Martin and has a much smaller cast than in previous seasons, including Kate chastan, Nico Scully and captain Lee rothbach."
On February 10, Bravo's production ship sank in the Caribbean Sea and the actors and crew under the deck were awakened, the sualiga Post reported
"According to Tricia, the captain of the silver queen, no one was injured."
"The waves are rough!"
"On February 10, when their production ship sank in the Caribbean Sea, the actors and crew of Bravo s under the deck suddenly woke up. According to the sualiga post, the actors of the fourth season have been photographed here. The canteen boat of the TV crew has arrived at maligo 3... "
“… A few days ago... "
"On February 9, when it reached the waters of Marina Louisburg, the trouble began."
According to local newspapers, the ship sank around 12 a.m. when its propeller was broken by a cable
"No one was injured, no one was injured. According to Tricia, the captain of the silver queen, the captain of lirothbach, in this picture, everything is normal. The canteen ship of the TV program crew arrived in marigoth three days ago, and the L R Sierra storm, celdixonico..."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Trolls on the Internet — there are all kinds of atrocities they commit on the Internet.””
““I’m not saying it’s anywhere near as bad as what women go through but I, as an actor approaching each job, am insecure — especially when I have to take my top off in it — and so nervous,” he added.”
““I read in an interview recently and I think it’s absolutely true: men have it just as bad,” the actor told The Sunday Morning Herald.”
““Well, not just as bad but they get it bad and it’s never talked about.”
““I remember doing one job when they literally made me pull my shirt up and were grabbing my fat and going ‘you need to lose a bit of weight’.”
“This other time they were slapping me.”
“I felt like a piece of meat,” he said.”
“Also Read Chloe Grace Moretz Is Appalled and Angry Over Her Movie s Body Shaming Poster The actor who will next appear in My Cousin Rachel opposite Rachel Weisz said he continues to stay insecure about his body and sometimes won t eat for weeks to get the body producers...”
“...are looking for...”
““I get really worked up to the point where I spend hours and hours in the gym and not eating for weeks to achieve what I think they’re going for.”The 30-year-old said actors are held to different standards these days.”


"Trolls on the Internet - they committed all kinds of atrocities on the Internet."
"I'm not saying it's as bad as a woman's experience, but as an actor, I don't feel secure in every job - especially when I have to take off my coat - and I'm very nervous," he added
"I read in a recent interview that I think it's absolutely true: men perform just as badly," the actor told the Sunday Morning Herald
"Well, it's not just bad, but they get it bad and never talk about it."
"I remember one time when they really asked me to pull up my shirt, grab my fat and say, 'you need to lose weight.'"
"This time they slapped me in the face."
"I feel like a piece of meat," he said
"Also read that Chloe grace Moretz is shocked and angry about her movie body humiliating poster actor who next appears opposite my cousin Rachel, and Rachel Weitz says he continues to be insecure about his body and sometimes won't eat for a few weeks to get body producers..."
“… Looking for
"I'm really tired, I've spent hours in the gym and weeks without eating to achieve what I think they want to achieve." The 30-year-old actor said the standards of actors are different now



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Markle's style has always been on fleek, it's just a little more polished now that she's royal AF.”
“I Present To You Her Royal Highness The Duchess of SussexChris Jackson/Getty Images Entertainment/Getty ImagesWhat a difference a few years can make (and a royal husband).”
“Her transition into royal life has been rather seamless, and yet a look back at her pre-Harry days reveals a very different persona.”
“Meghan Markle's royal style is world's (or at least an ocean) away from what it used to be, and I've got the photos to prove it.”
“Markle's wedding to Prince Harry not only marked her official entry into a cushy royal life, in which she received her title, the Duchess of Sussex, but also a life full of new rules.”
“The former Suits actress has always had a great sense of fashion, but as she is now legally related to the queen of England, Markle has to dress a little differently.”
“There is a long list of royal fashion rules that Markle is expected to follow, and she's been doing exactly that, but it's remarkable to see how differently she used to dress.”
“One of the biggest changes that Markle has made in her fashion choices is that she dresses much more modestly than she used to.”
“I’ll be the first to say that Markle looks gorgeous no matter what, but take a look at some of her most un-royal looks from the past, and she how her style has evolved.”
“Boho VibesAlberto E. Rodriguez/Getty Images Entertainment/Getty ImagesIn a photo from January 2013, Markle shows off her days of hippie maxi dresses and a generally more casual style.”


"Marcel's style has always been on the fly, and now she's Royal AF, just a little more glamorous."
"I'd like to introduce you to your highness Chris Jackson / Getty Images entertainment / Getty Images, the Duchess of Sussex, what changes (and a royal husband) they can bring in the next few years."
"Her transformation in royal life has been seamless, but looking back on her days before Harry, you'll find a completely different role."
"Megan markel's royal style is a far cry from the past (at least an ocean), and I have photos to prove that."
"The wedding of Marcel and Prince Harry not only marks that she has entered a comfortable royal life and won the title of Duchess of Sussex, but also her life is full of new rules."
"The former star has always been fashionable, but because she is now legally related to the queen of England, Marcel has to dress differently."
"There's a long list of Royal fashion rules that markel should follow, and she's been doing it all the time, but it's amazing to see how different she used to wear."
"One of the biggest changes that markel has made in her fashion choices is that she is much more demure than before."
"I'll be the first to say that Marcel looks beautiful anyway, but if you look at some of her least noble looks in the past, she'll know how her style has evolved."
"Bohemian Alberto E. Rodriguez / Getty Images entertainment / Getty Images in a January 2013 photo, Markle shows the era of her Hippie frock dress, as well as a generally more casual style."



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hall’s character, Major General Greg Pulver, was actually based on the quickly ousted National Security Advisor Michael Flynn.”
“...based on members of the U S military during the war in Afghanistan...”
“Left with the unsavory answer of offing his former Breakfast Club costar Hall said I love you Molly but I d have to kill you Image zoom Credit Universal Pictures The former teen heartthrob is currently starring as Brad Pitt s right hand man in the Netflix dramedy War Machine...”
“On this Brat Pack-themed bit, Cohen prodded Hall about which of his three female contemporaries he would “Shag, Marry, Kill.”FROM PEN: EW’s Top Ten Rom-Com Movie MomentsAmong Ally Sheedy, Demi Moore and Molly Ringwald, Hall quickly decided he would marry Moore and “shag” Sheedy.”
“That wasn’t all Hall had to say about his former castmates during Cohen’s “Plead the Fifth” segment, in which stars can choose to answer risqué questions about their past or invoke their right to silence.”
““I’ll go with Judd Nelson,” he said.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“When Andy Cohen asked Anthony Michael Hall on Watch What Happens Live this week which Brat Pack member was making the most of their fame “back in the day,” Hall didn’t hesitate for long.”
“The answer to which member of the legendary ’80s movie-star posse, The Brat Pack, got “laid” the most might not surprise you: the bad boy.”
“Was it the nerd?”


"Hall's role, major general Greg Pfeiffer, is actually based on Michael Flynn, the national security adviser who quickly stepped down."
“…… According to US military personnel during the war in Afghanistan... "
"On the left is an unpleasant response, he left his former Breakfast Club partner hall and said I love you, Molly, but I have to kill you picture zooming credit Universal Pictures' former teenage sweetheart, who is currently starring Brad Pitt's right hand in Netflix de Ramadi war machine..."
In the film with the theme of "little gangster", Cohen hinted to hall that he would "marry, marry and kill one of the three women of his time". From Pan: EW's top ten ROM com movie moment, hall quickly decided to marry Moore and "little gangster"
"This is not all that hall said about his former teammates on Cohen's fifth defense, where stars can choose to answer sharp questions about their past or invoke their right to silence."
"I'm going with Judd Nelson," he said
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"When Andy Cohen asked Anthony Michael Hall which little gangster was most famous on this week's live show back in the past," Hall said without hesitation
"You may not be surprised to find out which member of the legendary movie star team of the 1980s, the little gangster, got the most out of bed: the bad boy."
"A nerd?"



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kevin Hart’s Alleged Miami Mistress Sends Out Cryptic MessageEniko Parrish Accepts Kevin Hart’s Apology In Alleged Extortion Scandal was originally published on hellobeautiful.com...”
““I made a bad error in judgement and put myself in an environment where only bad things can happen and they did,” he confessed.”
“According to E!”
“News, Parrish —who is pregnant with Hart’s third child—has accepted her husband’s apology and plans to move forward with him as a couple.”
““Eniko is aware of what’s going on and that Kevin is not perfect,” a source told the site.”
““She has accepted his apology and is focused on her pregnancy and what’s to come.”
“She has no plans for divorce.”
“She believes Kevin is a good husband and always comes home to her.”The source added: “She is bothered that these stories find their way into the press and that people are asking her about it.”
“But she does her best to ignore it all and move forward.”
“She listens to her husband and is not going to get stressed out.”


Kevin Hart's alleged Miami mistress sends a mysterious message. Eniko Parrish's apology for accepting Kevin Hart's alleged blackmail scandal was initially published in hellobeautiful.com ...”
"I made a serious mistake in my judgment, putting myself in an environment where only bad things happen, and things do happen," he said
"According to e!"
"News, parish - with Hart's third child, she has accepted her husband's apology and plans to live with him as a couple."
"Eniko knows what happened and Kevin is not perfect," a source told the site
"She has accepted his apology and focused on her pregnancy and future."
"She has no intention of divorce."
"She believes Kevin is a good husband and always comes home to her." "She's upset that these stories are being reported in the media and people are asking her about it," the source added
"But she tried to ignore it and move on."
"She listens to her husband. There's no pressure."



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:'American Idol' Runner-Up Caleb Lee Hutchinson Shares How He Lost Over 60 Pounds‘American Idol’ Runner-Up Caleb Lee Hutchinson ‘Didn’t Want to Exploit’ Relationship With Winner Maddie Poppe'American Idol' Crowns Season 16 WinnerRelated Gallery...”
“I am honored to know you and even more honored to call you mine.”
“The talented lovebirds spoke with ET's Lauren Zima during rehearsals for the upcoming American Idol Live!”
“2018 Tour -- and they gushed over getting to sing with one another while also dating.”
“"It's awesome!"”
“Poppe, 20, marveled.”
“"I mean, it's like we get each other.”
“We're already reading each other's minds, knowing what were gonna do next."”
“"Yeah.”
“It's weird," Hutchinson, 19, chimed in.”


"Embedded code restart related content: 'American Idol' runner up Caleb Lee Hutchinson shares how he lost more than 60 pounds' American Idol 'runner up Caleb Lee Hutchinson' doesn't want to take advantage of 'the relationship with the winner' madipop 'American Idol' crown season 16 winner related gallery..."
"It's a great honor for me to meet you and to call you mine."
"In the rehearsal of the upcoming live american idol show, this brilliant couple talks to Lauren zimar of ET!"
"Tour in 2018 - they talk about singing to each other while dating."
"Great!"
"Pop, 20, is amazing."
"I mean, it's like we know each other."
"We are already reading each other's mind and knowing what to do next."
"Yes."
"It's strange," Hutchinson, 19, interjected



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They’re growing up and it’s really cool to see.””
“He adds, “You really get to see them grow up like you have ever year, but there’s definitely a different dynamic now.”
“Us too!”
“...touch I think that s what really like solidifies an adult friendship and so you kind of get to see Scott and Stiles as adults It s making me emotional talking about it a little bit Tyler confessed...”
“I feel like that really solidifies an adult friendship Cause like when we re kids we re inseparable because we re in a small town and all we have is each other but once we expand and grow up and start to live our adult lives but still keep in...”
“...gone by without seeing each other...”
“He adds that the two characters have one of the truest friendships I think that s like whenever I have a really good friend and we don t see each other for a long time and then when we see each other again it s like not a day has...”
“They really miss each other.”AWWWWW!”
“They’ve had time away from each other now, so they know the importance of one another, the weight of them being separated.”
““They’ve been through a lot with each other.”


"They grow up and it's really cool to see them."
He added: "you can really see them grow as they used to, but now there must be a different motivation."
"So are we!"
“… Touch, I think it's really like solidifying adult friendship, so you kind of see Scott and stiles as adults, which makes me emotional to talk about this, Taylor admits... "
"I think it really consolidates the friendship between adults, just like we were inseparable when we were children, because we were in a small town, everything we had was mutual, but once we expanded and grew up, we began to live our adult life, but still remained in..."
“… It's gone without meeting... "
"He added that the two characters have a most real friendship, and I think it's like whenever I have a real good friend, we don't see each other for a long time, and then when we see each other again, it's like there's no day..."
"They really miss each other." Ah
"They haven't been together for a while now, so they know the importance of each other and the weight of separation."
"They went through a lot with each other."



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““And if I had custody of him now maybe I would have invited her, but I’m not at the moment.”For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“News in which she stated, “Our lawyers are talking today.”
“According to legal documents submitted on September 1 and obtained by RadarOnline, Doris Davidson — the mother of Evans’ ex Nathan Griffith — has filed for emergency temporary custody of Evans’ and Griffith’s 3-year-old son, Kaiser.”
“The documents claim that Evans’ 9-month-old daughter, Ensley Eason, tested positive for marijuana at the time of her birth in January 2017.”
“Davidson claims that DSS investigated and found that both Evans and her fiancé, David Eason — with whom she shares Ensley — had marijuana in their system.”
“Davidson also claimed that she has seen unusual bruises and marks on Kaiser on “several occasions” and alleged that Eason has used “inappropriate and excessive discipline” on her grandson, which included spanking the child with harsh force.”
“In the documents, it was stated that Kaiser told his grandmother, “Nana, David punched me,” making motions of being hit in the face.”
“The documents also allege that Evans, 25, has harassed Davidson with nasty text messages and the reality TV star has “sporadic mood swings where she screams and curses.”Evans — who has bitterly battled with her mom, Barbara, over custody of her oldest son, Jace — released a statement to E!”
“Doris made accusations but I can tell you that Barbara has a lot to do with them … Doris threw her own son under the bus by admitting that he has pending felonies and possibly on drugs.”
“It hasn’t been resolved,” she told Us in August.”


"If I had custody of him now, maybe I would invite her, but I haven't yet." For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to us weekly's YouTube page
"Our lawyers are talking today," she said in the news
"According to legal documents filed on September 1 and obtained by radaronline, Doris Davidson, the mother of Evans's former Nathan Griffith, has applied for emergency temporary custody of Evans and Griffith's 3-year-old son Caesar."
"Evans's 9-month-old daughter, ensley Ethan, was born in January 2017 and tested positive for marijuana," the document said
Davidson claimed that the DSS investigation found that both Evans and her fiance, David Ethan (who shared ensley with Ethan), had marijuana in their bodies
Davidson also said she had seen unusual bruises and scars on Caesar "many times" and alleged that Eason had used "improper and excessive discipline" against his grandson, including beating the child with severe force
"The document says Caesar told his grandmother," Nana, David punched me, "to make the action of being hit in the face."
The documents also allege that Evans, 25, harassed Davidson with vicious text messages, while the reality TV star "occasionally had mood swings, screams and curses." Evans and her mother, Barbara, had a heated argument over the custody of her eldest son, Jess. She made a statement to Davidson
"Doris has made charges, but I can tell you Barbara has a lot to do with them Doris admitted that her son had a pending felony, possibly drug abuse, and threw him under the car
"It's not solved yet," she told us in August



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This story first appeared on Billboard.com.”
“Tickets for her final stint can be purchased here.”
“Spoiler alert: a Swarovski crystal staircase and a replica of the infamous 6 train to the Bronx make for a rousing set.”
“Fans who have yet to see the veteran performer in action and are considering purchasing seats to her dazzling one-of-a-kind spectacle can expect for Lopez to sport seven different outfits, while singing and dancing for over 90 minutes.”
“Thank you to all my fans who traveled far and wide to experience the show with me,” said Lopez in a statement.”
“Some of the best memories on stage from my career will forever be equated with this city.”
““Performing ‘All I Have’ in Vegas over the last few years has been an incredible and rewarding experience that I won’t soon forget.”
“The legendary entertainer today announced the final shows of her record-setting residency at The AXIS at Planet Hollywood Resort & Casino, which will take place from June 13 through Sept. 29, 2018.”
“It was the highest gross in Planet Hollywood history.”
“On Aug. 13, 2016, Jennifer Lopez's "All I Have" residency at Planet Hollywood in Las Vegas hit a milestone, having notched over $1 million in ticket sales.”


"This story first appeared in Billboard.com Website. "
"Tickets for her last performance can be bought here."
"Spoiler Alert: a copy of the Swarovski crystal staircase and a notorious train 6 to the Bronx makes an exciting setting."
"Fans who have not yet seen the old performer are considering buying seats for her dazzling and unique spectacle. They can expect Lopez to wear seven different costumes and sing and dance for more than 90 minutes at the same time."
"Thank you to all the fans who have come all the way to experience the show with me," Lopez said in a statement
"Some of the great memories of my career on the stage will always equate with this city."
"In the past few years, performing 'all I have' in Vegas has been an incredible and meaningful experience that I won't forget very soon."
"The legendary artist today announced her final performance at axis's record breaking Hollywood planet Resort and Casino, which will be held from June 13 to September 29, 2018."
"It's the highest gross in Hollywood history."
"On August 13, 2016, Jennifer Lopez's" all I have "performance on the Planet Hollywood in Las Vegas ushered in a milestone, breaking through $1 million at the box office."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};”
“Vox dug deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok.”
“But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance.”
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First is known for viral videos and life hacks galore.”
“...const FP = tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”


"Here are the good, the bad, the ugly", "reading time: 11}]}
"Vox delves into this phenomenon, and the card proposal spreads on tiktok."
"However, although you may find many tips very useful, tortilla trend has a lot of bad suggestions, especially a topic we are very concerned about: Personal Finance on next advisor."
"Here's what I'd like to know. What I'd like to know before I buy my first book is that it's famous for virus videos and a lot of life hackers."
“… Const FP = tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Experts who have learned a lot from the whole process of purchasing my first house have acquired the skill of starting a side push. "



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So, what name do you think Duff should pick?”
“"Guys.”
“The "Younger" star took to Instagram to share pics of her new rescue pup, a sweet black Labrador mix, and asked fans for help with the pooch's name.”
“But, of course, you've got to see what the little guy looks first, right?”
“Better brace yourself because he's downright adorable.”
“Awww!”
“What a cutie!”
“At first, avid dog lover Duff, 29, introduced the lil' sweetie pie as Momo.”
“But later the former Lizzie McGuire star who has a 5 year old son named Luca with ex husband Mike Comrie followed up with an even cuter pic of the pup and revealed or rather she let her pup reveal...”
“...she was now juggling two names...”


"So, what do you think Duff should be called?"
"Guys."
The "young" star shared a photo of her new rescue dog, a cute black Labrador, on instagram and asked her fans for its name
"But, of course, you have to see what this little guy looks like first, right?"
"You'd better cheer up, because he's very cute."
"Ah
"How lovely
"At first, Duff, a 29 year old dog, called the cookie Momo."
"But then the former Lizzie McGuire star and ex husband Mike comry had a five-year-old son named Luca. She took a more lovely picture of the dog and revealed, or rather, she let the dog reveal..."
“… She's playing with two names now... "



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“TMZ was first to report the news of Craig’s tragic death.”
“Craig was adopted by Ike after he and Tina married in 1962.”
“He was 59Tina Turner’s oldest son, Craig Turner, has died by suicide, PEOPLE confirms.”
“He was 59.”
“A spokesperson for the Los Angeles County Department of Medical Examiner-Coroner tells PEOPLE Craig was pronounced dead at 12:38 p.m. after being found dead in his Studio City, California, home from a self-inflicted gunshot wound on Tuesday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“His autopsy is pending.”
“A rep for Tina did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“Craig is the son of Tina — who was just 18 when she gave birth to him — and saxophonist Raymond Hill, who performed with Ike Turner’s band Kings of Rhythm.”
“Craig worked as a real estate agent in California, according to The Hollywood Reporter.”


"TMZ was the first to report Craig's tragic death."
"Craig was adopted by Ike after he married Tina in 1962."
"He's Tina Turner's eldest son, Craig Turner, who has committed suicide, people have confirmed."
"He was 59."
Craig was pronounced dead at 12:38 p.m. after he was found dead from a gunshot wound in the studio city of California on Tuesday, a spokesman for the Los Angeles County coroner's Department told people
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"His autopsy is in progress."
"A representative of Tina didn't immediately respond to requests for comment."
Craig is Tina's son, who was 18 when she gave birth to him. Saxophone player Raymond Hill played with Ike Turner's "king of rhythm"
According to the Hollywood Reporter, Craig worked as a real estate agent in California



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As for the new 24, despite disappointing ratings, Fox is planning to talk to co-creator Howard Gordon over the summer, before making any official verdict on the show’s fate.”
“While the latter revival won’t be back next season, Fox says another round of Prison could be green-lit in the future.”
“Case in point: Fox says it’s not yet ready to say 24: Legacy or Prison Break are done for.”
“In TV these days, just as in most horror movies, nothing is ever really dead.”
“What’s more, even if Scream Queens is now dead at Fox, the anthology nature of the series means it would be very easy for Murphy to resurrect the concept down the road, either at Fox or another network.”
“It’s expected to premiere in early 2018.”
“Fox will still be in business with Murphy, however: The prolific producer is working on a new first-responder drama, 9-1-1, starring Angela Bassett.”
“Scream Queens didn’t do very well in the Nielsen ratings during its first season, and collapsed even further last fall, losing about half of its already small audience.”
“Despite a small, passionate core audience of viewers under 34, the series’ overall ratings were simply too low to justify renewal.”
“The scrawled-in-pig’s-blood handwriting had been on the wall for the series since last fall.”


"As for the new 24 hours, despite disappointing ratings, fox plans to talk to co creator Howard Gordon in the summer and then make any official judgment on the fate of the show."
"Although the latter" Resurrection "will not be replayed in the next season, fox said that another round of prison in the future may be the green light."
"A good example: fox says it's not ready to say 24 hours: Legacy or escape is over."
"Today's TV shows, like most horror movies, have nothing to do with real death."
"More importantly, even if the Scream Queen now dies at Fox, the anthology nature of the series means that Murphy will be easily resurrected on the road, whether in fox or other network concepts."
"It's expected to premiere in early 2018."
"Fox will still work with Murphy, though: the prolific producer is working on a new emergency show, 9-1-1, starring Angela Bassett."
"Scream Queen" didn't perform well in the first season of Nielsen's ratings. Last fall, it plummeted and lost half of its audience
"Although there are not many core audiences under the age of 34, the overall ratings of the TV series are too low to justify the renewal of the contract."
"Since last autumn, pig blood has appeared on the wall of this series."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They can’t wait to meet their new baby sister.””
“Adrienne’s grandfather, King Carl XVI Gustaf, announced the newborn princess’s name and title at a specially convened cabinet meeting on Monday.”
“Introducing, Princess Adrienne!”
“Proud mom Princess Madeleine has revealed the name she and husband Chris O’Neill have chosen for their new baby girl: Adrienne Josephine Alice, Princess of Sweden and Duchess of Blekinge.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The royal baby was born on Friday at Stockholm’s Danderyd Hospital.”
“Madeleine revealed the name on her new Instagram account, along with an adorable new photo of the newborn royal with her older siblings, Princess Leonore, 4, and Prince Nicolas, 2.”
““Leonore and Nicolas welcoming their little sister home,” she captioned the sweet snap.”
“At noon, artillery troops celebrated Princess Adrienne’s birth at five locations around Sweden as they fired 21-gun salutesFor now, the royals are settling into life as a family of five in their home in Stockholm, although they are based full-time in London.”
“Image zoom Credit: Mr Christopher O'Neill“Leonore and Nicolas have their long-awaited sibling,” he said in a statement released by the palace.”


"They can't wait to see their new sister."
Adrian's grandfather, King Gustav of Carl XVI, announced the name and title of the newborn princess at a special cabinet meeting on Monday
"Introduction, Princess Adrian!"
"Proud mother Princess Madeleine has revealed the names she and her husband Chris O'Neill have chosen for their new baby girl: Adrian Josephine Alice, Princess of Sweden and Duchess of Bracking."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The Royal baby was born last Friday at Stockholm's dandry hospital."
"Madeleine revealed the name on her new instagram account, along with a lovely new photo of the newborn Royal with her brother and sister, 4-year-old Princess Lionel and 2-year-old Prince Nicholas."
"Lionel and Nicholas welcome their little sister home," she wrote in a sweet snapshot
At noon, the artillery held the birthday celebration of Princess Adrian in five places in Sweden, and fired 21 salutes. At present, the royal family has settled down in their home in Stockholm, a family of five, even though they work full-time in London
"Credit for image zooming: Mr. Christopher O'Neill," Lionel and Nicholas have long-awaited siblings, "he said in a statement released by the palace



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign Up Now An unexpected error has occurred with your sign up.”
“Please attempt to sign up again.”
““He told me he was going to do a checkup on me and that was the first day I was abused,” Maroney said during the interview.”
“An osteopath, he told the girls that the procedures would ease whatever pain they were sent to him to relieve, and would help them to continue training.”
“Nassar abused the gymnasts under the pretext of medical care.”
“Raisman and Wieber are suing USA Gymnastics, the U.S. Olympic Committee, and Michigan State University, where Nassar was on the faculty, for failing to protect them from Nassar’s behavior.”
“Her teammates Aly Raisman, Gabby Douglas, and Jordyn Wieber have also accused Nassar of sexual abuse.”
“She said Nassar started to abuse her when she was 13 and continued, even during the 2012 Olympic Games until she left gymnastics in 2016.”
“Maroney was the first to publicly reveal the abuse, in a tweet in October 2017.”
“At the world championships in Tokyo in 2011, she said Nassar “went overboard.” She told NBC that she was naked with Nassar on top of her, and “I thought I was going to die.”Four of Maroney’s “Fierce Five” teammates have reported that they were abused by Nassar.”


"Register now. There was an unexpected error in your registration."
"Please try to register again."
"He told me he was going to examine me, it was the first day I was abused," Maroni said in an interview
"As an orthopedic surgeon, he told the girls that these surgeries could relieve any pain they sent him to relieve and help them continue to train."
"Nasar abused gymnasts on the pretext of medical treatment."
Reisman and Webb are suing the American Gymnastics Association, the American Olympic Committee and Michigan State University for failing to protect themselves from Nasar's actions
Her teammates Ellie Reisman, Gaby Douglas and Jordan Webb also accused Nasar of sexual abuse
"She said that Nasar began abusing her when she was 13 years old and has been abusing her, even during the 2012 Olympic Games, until she left Gymnastics in 2016."
"Maroni was the first person to publicly disclose abuse, in a tweet in October 2017."
"At the 2011 Tokyo World Championships, she said Nasar" went too far. ". She told NBC that she was naked and had Nasar on her body. "I thought I was going to die." Four of Maroni's "five ferocious" teammates reported that they had been abused by Nasar



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Though they are still healing from the last year, the star says her family is out of “lockdown” and ready for new adventures.”
““I wanted Maddox to see how extraordinary his country is,” she says of the movie.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“We all have our difficult times but as a mother you also have a responsibility first and foremost towards the kids Angelina Jolie tells PEOPLE exclusively in a new cover story Much has changed over the last year in Angelina Jolie s life but one thing has remained constant her...”
“...dedication to her children...”
“After filing for divorce from Brad Pitt on September 19, 2016, Jolie retreated from the spotlight to focus on her family as they work to heal from the traumatic split.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I have had my ups and downs.”
“I guess I am a little bit stronger,” the actress, director and philanthropist tells PEOPLE exclusively in an interview for the magazine’s new cover story.”
““We all have our difficult times, but as a mother you also have a responsibility first and foremost towards the kids.”


"Although they are still recovering from last year, the star said her family is out of the" blockade "and ready for a new adventure."
"I want Maddox to see how extraordinary his country is," she said of the film
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"We all have our own difficult times, but as a mother, you also have the responsibility to first tell people about Angelina Jolie's children in a new cover story. Great changes have taken place in Angelina Jolie's life in the past year, but one thing has remained unchanged, she..."
“… To her children... "
"After Julie and Brad Pitt filed for divorce on September 19, 2016, she stepped out of the spotlight and focused on her family as they struggled to recover from the traumatic division."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I've been through ups and downs."
"I think I'm a little stronger," the actress, director and philanthropist told people in an exclusive interview with people's new cover story
"We all have difficult times, but as a mother, you have to be responsible for the children first."



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I have no idea what they’d do necessarily with the storyline, but yeah, sure.”Aly & AJ’s four-song EP is scheduled to be released before a full album in 2018.”
““Now that I’m married, and we’ve each had many relationships and heartbreaks, we’re coming at songwriting at a much different way.”AJ also talked about what it was like to be a child star.”
“They briefly released songs after that under the name 78Violet, but it’s been long ten years since the duo released a song as Aly & AJ.”
“Last Friday, the two sisters debuted a new single, “Take Me,” according to E!”
“News.”
“Over the last decade, the former child stars went for acting.”
“Aly, 28, is married to Stephen Ringer and stars on iZombie.”
“While AJ, 26, is a series regular on the sitcom The Goldbergs.”
“In a recent interview with Elle, the Michalka sisters opened up about what happened, where they’ve been and what brought them back to their music career.”
““My husband encouraged us to come back to music,” Aly explained.”


"I don't know what they're going to do with the plot, but yes, of course." Ali and Ajie's four EP songs are scheduled to be released before a full album is released in 2018
"Now that I'm married, we've all had a lot of feelings and heartbreaks, and we write songs in a very different way." AJ also talked about the feeling of being a child star
"Then they released a couple of songs under the name of 78 violet, but it's been ten years since the pair released a song called aly & AJ."
According to e! "
"News."
"In the past decade, former child stars have been keen on acting."
"Ellie, 28, married Stephen ringer and played in" ethanby. "
AJ, 26, is a regular on the sitcom kimberg
"In a recent interview with Elle, the Michalka sisters opened up and talked about what happened, where they went and what brought them back to their music career."
"My husband encouraged us to go back to music," Ellie explained



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The unitard additionally got here with a masks, which the King of Pop’s son opted to not put on on the pink carpet.”
“The get-up consisted of a black-and-white unitard with spooky sample on it.”
“In the meantime, her 20-yr-previous brother wore a fancy dress, which was additionally a onesie, which wasn’t really easy to acknowledge.”
“Michael Jackson‘s solely daughter obtained into the spirit of issues by including some festive face paint to the cute outfit.”
“As an alternative of rocking a horny Halloween costume, the 19-yr-previous “It” woman opted for a for an opulent purple dragon onesie (with magical matching purple slippers).”
“Apparently sufficient, the siblings each opted for onesies for the festive night time.”
“Calif...”
“Paris Jackson had some enjoyable together with her older brother Prince Jackson on the Heal LA and TLK Fusion Current the 2nd Annual Costume for a Trigger which was on the Jackson Household Property on Friday night time in Encino...”


"Unitard also came here with a mask, and the son of pop king chose not to wear it on the pink carpet."
"It's a black-and-white all-in-one machine with terrible samples on it."
"At the same time, her 20-year-old ex brother wore a make-up, which is another one, which is really hard to admit."
"Michael Jackson's only daughter has integrated the spirit of the problem by painting some holiday facial paintings on her lovely clothes."
As an alternative to Halloween costume, the 19-year-old "it" girl chose a gorgeous Purple Dragon shirt (paired with magic purple slippers)
"Obviously enough, brothers and sisters, everyone chooses to have a meal on holiday night."
"California..."
"Paris Jackson and her brother Prince Jackson had a good time together at the Los Angeles Tlk fusion pop contest, Jackson's second annual fashion show in Encino, which was held at Jackson's home on Friday night..."



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Yup, he’s in love.””
“She didn’t notice.”
“It lasted a good 10 seconds.”
“Treble noted, “He took advantage of a rare moment out of the spotlight.”
“...his head and looked at Meghan Markle from across the section between them in the crowd...”
“Though that does not mean they aren t able to carve out moments of romance when out together royal reporter Patricia Treble noted that on Saturday at the opening ceremony when everyone in the audience had their eyes on the stage for the rendition of O Canada Prince Harry turned...”
“Harry will remain in Toronto until Saturday, so it’s very possible we are in for additional sightings and appearances for the couple, though they are also quite well-practiced at this point in doing so without being caught by photographers or otherwise creating any commotion.”
“(We very much want to believe Harry filmed a cameo for an upcoming Suits episode, as well, as a British lawyer on a transfer or the posh cousin of a client, or such.)”
““He’s incredibly supportive of her work.” Markle reportedly gave Harry a tour of the set, as well.”
““He was super low-key, met some crew, and was so happy to watch his lady,” the source said.”


"Yes, he is in love."
"She didn't notice."
"It lasted 10 seconds."
"Trebo noticed," he took advantage of a rare moment to get out of the spotlight
“…… His head, from the section between them in the crowd, Megan markel... "
"It doesn't mean they can't create romantic moments together, but royal correspondent Patricia treble noticed that at the opening ceremony on Saturday, everyone in the audience turned their attention to the stage where they played King Harry of Canada..."
"Harry will be in Toronto until Saturday, so it's very likely that we will arrange more sightings and appearances for the couple, but they are also doing a good job at this, they won't be caught by photographers, and they won't cause any disturbance."
"We would love to believe that Harry filmed a cameo for the upcoming litigation episode, as well as a client as a transfer or luxurious cousin of a British lawyer, or something like that."
"He was very supportive of her work." According to reports, Marcel also showed Harry around the set
"He was super low-key, met some of the crew and was happy to see his wife," the source said



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For everything from cute tops to wear with your favorite jeans to easy floral dresses you can throw on with black ankle boots, shop all the boho clothes you need to freshen up your style this fall.”
“To add another layer of cool factor, each item is already trending on sites like Topshop, Zara, and more of our favorite affordable site.”
“To ensure you’re set with the coolest new wave of boho items without making a splurge purchase, we’re sharing the items you can score for under $100.”
“As the trend guide in our Fall Issue pointed out, Prairie Me is one of the biggest trends to add to your wardrobe this season.”
“This season, the boho trend received a fresh update and now lends cooler, more country prairie-girl vibes than the early 2000s boho looks that celebs like Nicole Richie and Rachel Bilson made popular.”
“If you only envision ’70s vibes when you picture bohemian style, today we’re here to refresh the way you think of the throwback trend that’s relevant again.”


"From a cute top to your favorite jeans to a simple floral skirt with Black Ankle Boots, you can buy all the Bohemian style clothes this fall to make your style look brand new."
"In order to add another layer of cool factor, every product has become popular on Topshop, Zara and other websites, and more of them are our favorite affordable websites."
"To make sure you have the coolest new Bohemian product without splurging, we'll offer you products for less than $100."
"As our fall magazine trend guide points out, prairie me is one of the most popular trends in your wardrobe this season."
"This season, the Bohemian style has been renewed, and now it's cooler and more rustic than the Bohemian style popular in the early 21st century by celebrities like Nicole Ritchie and Rachel Bilson."
"If you're only imagining the atmosphere of the 1970s when you're describing Bohemian style, we're here today to refresh your view of this return to fashion, which is relevant again."



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was a huge weight off my shoulders to not have to worry about the cost of an expensive dress, and crazily enough, I’ve actually been able to rewear it.” -Abbe, 31”
“It was perfect for sipping mimosas on the morning of the wedding as we got ready, and it came in handy for champagne toasts later in the evening, too.”
“I even ordered the same flannels for the bridesmaids at my own wedding!” -Meredith, 253.”
“Having something comfortable to lounge around in as we got ready was a big perk, and now I have a cute, cozy, and personalized flannel to stay warm [in] during colder months.”
“Monogrammed Flannels“I got a monogrammed, button-down flannel shirt to wear the morning of the wedding as we got our hair and makeup done.”
“Every time I wear the lipstick, I think of that fun day!” —Sarah, 312.”
“We were able to use them on the day of the wedding and take them home with us.”
“Makeup Palettes“The best gift I ever received as a bridesmaid was a really nice makeup and lipstick palette.”
“1.”
“These tokens of appreciation come in handy long after the actual wedding day.”


"Don't worry about the price of expensive clothes. It's a huge burden off my shoulders, and it's crazy that I can put them on again." Abe, 31
"It's perfect for sipping Mimosa when we're ready in the morning of the wedding, and it comes in handy for the Champagne Toast in the evening."
"I even ordered the same flannel for my Bridesmaid at my wedding! "Meredith, 253."
"When we are ready, there are some comfortable things to hang out in, which is a great advantage. Now I have a lovely, comfortable and personalized flannel to keep warm in the cold months."
I bought a button flannel shirt for our hair and makeup on the morning of our wedding
"Every time I put on lipstick, I think of that interesting day! "Sarah, 312."
"We can use them on the wedding day and take them home."
"Make up palette" is the best gift I've ever received as a bridesmaid. It's a very beautiful make-up and lipstick palette.
“1.”
"These tokens of thanks come in handy long after the wedding."



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[h/t: WCVB]”
“Because of you, you’ve made tonight the very 1st time a female artist has played 3 nights at Gillette Stadium.” –@taylorswift13 — Gillette Stadium (@GilletteStadium) July 29, 2018Congrats T-Swift.”
“...just lost her fan girl mind...”
“But there were hundreds of other fans in the stadium over the weekend who didn’t get the same attention but probably should have.”
“So, Swift gave hundreds of free tickets to local police officers and firefighters following the tragic death of Weymouth Sgt.”
“Michael Chesna, who was shot and killed on July 15.”
“The Patriot Ledger reported that Swift sent the town “a significant number of tickets” to her concert.”
“And it was a hard ticket to get.”
““The gesture was absolutely generous, significant and appreciated,” Weymouth Mayor Robert Hedlund told the Ledger, adding that Swift didn’t do it for the press.”
“Sure enough, Swift’s camp hasn’t said anything about the gesture when asked by the local media.”


“[h/t:WCVB]”
"Because of you, you make tonight the first time that a female artist has performed three nights at Gillette stadium." ——@Taylor swift13 - Gillette Stadium on July 29, 2018 congratulations to t-swift. "
“… Just lost her fans, girl's mind... "
"But there are still hundreds of fans on the pitch at the weekend who don't get the same attention, but they probably deserve it."
So after Sergeant Weymouth died, swift presented hundreds of free tickets to local police and firefighters
"Michael chesner, shot on July 15."
Patriot magazine reported that swift sent "quite a lot of tickets" to the town for her concert
"It's a hard ticket to get."
Weymouth mayor Robert hurdlund told the ledger, adding that swift didn't do it for the press
"Sure enough, Swift's camp did not disclose any information when asked about the move by the local media."



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A post shared by ROBERT KARDASHIAN robkardashian on Jul 4 2017 at 1 22pm PDT”
“LOVE A post shared by ROBERT KARDASHIAN robkardashian on Jul 4 2017 at 1 35pm PDT A post shared by ROBERT KARDASHIAN robkardashian on Jul 4 2017 at 1 33pm PDT Babbbby girl A post shared by ROBERT KARDASHIAN robkardashian on Jul 4 2017 at 1 32pm PDT Happy 4th...”
“And this year, the family went all-out at Khloe Kardashian's home.”
“Naturally, the Revenge Body host, 33, started the day with an intensive workout, stopping to snap a selfie with her shirtless man, Tristan Thompson, afterwards.”
“It wouldn't be a holiday without a Kardashian blowout!”
“She then cooled off by riding down her large waterslide in the backyard, while Thompson shouted, "Alright, come down, let's go!"”
“Khloe then changed into a red one-piece with denim shortie shorts, posing next to her momager, Kris Jenner.”
“A post shared by Khloe Kardashian Snapchats❕ (@khloesnapchats) on Jul 4, 2017 at 10:32pm PDT The pair shouted, "Happy Fourth of July!"”
“...and threw up some peace signs.”


"A post shared by Robert Kardashian at 1:22 pm on July 4, 2017"
"Love Robert Kardashian post shared by Robert Kardashian at 1:35 pm on July 4, 2017 post shared by Robert Kardashian at 1:33 pm on July 4, 2017 post shared by Barbie girl Robert Kardashian at 1:32 pm on July 4, 2017 happy fourth..."
"This year, the family is doing their best at Khloe Kardashian's home."
"Naturally, the 33 year old vindictive host started a day of intense training, then stopped to take a selfie with the shirtless man Tristan Thompson."
"It wouldn't have been a holiday without a Kardashian blowout!"
She rode down the big slide in the backyard, calmed down, and Thompson yelled, "all right, come down, let's go!"
"Then Khloe put on a pair of red denim shorts next to her mother, Kris Jenner."
Post shared by Kardashian ❕  (@ khloesnapchats) on July 4, 2017, at 10:32 p.m. Pacific time, they yelled: "happy July 4!"
“… And throw out some signs of peace. "



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Shay Mitchell Posts Her 'Pretty Little Liars' Audition Tape and Shares How She Got the Role'Pretty Little Liars' Stars Ashley Benson and Shay Mitchell Reunite For Girls Night...”
“RELATED CONTENT:EXCLUSIVE: Shay Mitchell on How New Series ‘You’ Compares to ‘Pretty Little Liars' -- Plus, a Spinoff Update!”
“The Pretty Little Liars star covers the March issue of SHAPE, and inside the magazine, reveals that she's never weighed herself.”
“"For me, exercise is all about getting stronger.”
“It's not about weight," she shares.”
“"I've never even weighed myself.”
“I don't think you can trust the scale."”
“"Exercise is about how I feel.”
“I have more energy when I work out.”
“It makes me amped for the rest of the day, and I feel strong," she added.”


"Shea Mitchell released her" little liar "audition video and shared how she got" little liar "stars Ashley Benson and Shea Mitchell reunited on girls' night..."
"Related content: exclusive: Shay Mitchell about how the new series" you "compares with" pretty little liar "- another derivative update!"
"The beautiful little cheater star appeared on the cover of the March issue of shape magazine, and inside the magazine, she revealed that she had never weighed herself."
"For me, exercise is about being stronger."
"It's not about weight," she said
"I haven't even weighed myself."
"I don't think you can believe that scale."
"Exercise is what I feel."
"I'm more energetic when I exercise."
She added: "it makes me feel energetic and strong for the next day."



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maluma's only comment on the matter has been a simple: 'You wish your aunt was a mamacita [slang for attractive female]'”
“Speaking of the pair's new YouTube show, she added: 'It's between Maluma and I, how we live our life with our family, his concerts, my home, everything.”
“'We both love each other, that's why we take a lot of romantic photos.'”
“In response to online rumours, Ms Arias wrote on her socal media channels: 'I love him with all my soul.”
“...a former model and TV presenter turned professional yoga instructor...”
“...both love each other that s why we take a lot of romantic photos More fame Maluma and his aunt are also starring in a YouTube show about their lives Ms Arias who is married to Maluma s manager is...”
“Close knit The pictures of Maluma real name Juan Luis Londono Arias and his aunt have sparked online rumours regarding the nature of their relationship Family first Ms Arias has defended the photos of her and her nephew saying we...”
“Maluma, who released his latest album, 'Pretty Boy, Dirty Boy, earlier this year, is also the subject of a reality-TV show produced by his aunt.”
“'I am confused - but perhaps he is too,' added another.”
“'They seem to spend time together like boy and girlfriend, not aunt and nephew,' said one online critic quoted in local media.”


"Maruma's only comment on this is simple:" you want your aunt to be mamacita. "
Referring to their new show on youtube, she added: "it's between maruma and me, how we live with our family, his concerts, my home, everything."
"We all love each other, so we took a lot of romantic pictures."
"In response to online rumors, Arias wrote on her socal media channel:" I love him with all my heart. "
“… Former models and TV presenters have become professional yoga instructors. "
“… They both love each other. That's why we took a lot of romantic photos. More famous is that maruma and his aunt also starred in a show about their lives on YouTube. Ms. Arias married maruma's manager, who was... "
"Close photos of maruma, whose real name is Juan Luis Londono arias, and his aunt sparked rumors online about the nature of their relationship. First of all, Ms. Arias defended the photos of her and her nephew and said, "we..."
Maruma, who released his latest album "pretty boy, dirty boy" earlier this year, is also the protagonist of a reality show produced by his aunt
"I'm confused - but maybe he's confused too," another added
Local media quoted an Internet critic as saying that they seem to be together like boys and girlfriends, rather than aunts and nephews



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I'm like, 'This isn't really my aesthetic, but I'll wear it because you love me.'"”
“She continued, in the way only Miley can, "Sometimes I replace it with an actual unicorn or a Looney Tune, and he's kind of like, What's going on?'”
“They don't look that good together because they kind of mix up."”
“The talk-show host congratulated the 23-year-old, to which Cyrus replied, "It's very weird because this is, like, real jewelry, and most of my jewelry is made out of gummy bears and cotton candy.”
“...engaged...”
“A photo posted by Miley Cyrus mileycyrus on Jan 18 2016 at 7 07am PST However during an interview on The Ellen DeGeneres Show on Thursday afternoon an overall wearing Cyrus confirmed to DeGeneres that the pair are once again...”
“...strawberry inspired outfit of the day...”
“Given her history of provocative social media posts no one could quite be sure if the return of the ring was an indication of their on again engagement or if she just happened to think the accessory worked with her...”
“After quietly resuming their relationship earlier this year, Cyrus raised a few eyebrows when she posted a photo to Instagram in which she's wearing her old engagement ring.”
“The pair became engaged in 2012 before calling off the engagement in 2013.”


"I said," it's not my aesthetic, but I'll wear it because you love me. "
"She went on, in a way that only Miley could do," and sometimes I replace it with a real Unicorn or a madman's song, and he's kind of like, what's going on? "
"They don't look good together because they're a little confused."
The host of the talk show congratulated the 23-year-old girl and Cyrus replied, "it's strange because it's like real jewelry. Most of my jewelry is made of bear glue and marshmallow."
“… Engagement... "
"On January 18, 2016, at 7:07 a.m. PST, Miley Cyrus released a photo. However, in an interview at the Ellen DeGeneres Show on Thursday afternoon, Cyrus, who was wearing a full suit, confirmed to DeGeneres that they were again.... "
“… Strawberry inspired clothing of the day... "
"Given that she has published provocative posts on social media, no one can be completely sure whether the return of the ring is a sign of their re engagement, or whether she just happens to think that the accomplice works with her..."
Earlier this year, Cyrus quietly resumed their relationship by posting a photo on instagram showing her wearing an old engagement ring, which attracted some attention
"The two were engaged in 2012 and cancelled in 2013."



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In a weird way, it wasn’t only for the story and plot lines, but was to show that Terence really does love Kyle.”
“I talked to Jonathan about it and he explained to me the reason for that scene.”
“I’ve always heard playing the bad guy is so much more fun and, in my career, I’ve never really had a chance to do so, so I was very happy with the direction of Season 2.”
“As an actor, it’s certainly more fun to play dark stuff.”
“Now, of course, the stakes are much higher and people’s boundaries are being pushed to the limits of their ability to deal with.”
“Whereas in Season 2, they are enmeshed and entangled together in a way that to get out of that situation would be very complicated for both of them.”
“It was the story of Kyle and Megan and if their relationship will survive in spite of all the forces at play.”
“But at the core, you’re absolutely right.”
“Last year when we were doing prep, the basic storyline was The Arrangement is a love story with Hollywood as a backdrop and, obviously, there are a lot of nefarious characters behind the scenes doing a lot of bad things.”
“Season 1 was, as you said, very much about establishing the characters.”


"Strangely, it's not just for the story and the plot, but to show that Terence really loves Kyle."
"I talked to Jonathan about it and he explained to me the reason for the scene."
"I've always heard that it's more fun to play bad guys, I've never had a real chance to do that in my career, so I'm very happy with the direction of the second season."
"As an actor, it must be more interesting to play something dark."
"Of course, the stakes are much higher now, and people's boundaries are pushed to the limit of their ability to deal with problems."
"In the second season, they were entangled together, and it was very complicated for them to get out of this situation."
"It's about Kyle and Megan, if their relationship can continue under the influence of various forces."
"But on the core issue, you are absolutely right."
"When we prepared last year, the basic plot was a love story set in Hollywood. Obviously, there are many evil characters behind the scenes who do a lot of bad things."
"As you said, season one is very character oriented."



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Until then, though, she'll keep sweating before the wedding!”
“While speaking to E!, her partner, Artem Chigvintsev, agreed to teach her a waltz for her upcoming nuptials.”
“Although the ABC show only premiered this week, the WWE star revealed she's already dropped weight, thanks to the vigorous practicing and workouts.”
“Getty Images"I've already lost five pounds!"”
“...the "Total Bellas" star told E!”
“News.”
“"I'm like, 'I need to keep this off!'”
“I kinda wanna lose five more but actually keep the butt really big."”
“After coming off a fairly well-received dance, she spoke about her diet, as well as the physical aspects of competing on the show.”
“"I'm eating more carbs than ever, which is crazy," she said.”


"But before that, she'll be sweating before the wedding!"
"When talking to e! Her partner, Artem chigvintsev, agreed to teach her to waltz at her upcoming wedding
"Although ABC's show only premiered this week, the WWE star revealed that she has lost weight due to hard practice and exercise."
"I've lost five pounds!"
“… The star of "total Bellas" tells e
"News."
"I thought," I have to turn this off! "
"I kind of want to lose five more, but actually it's really big to keep my ass up."
"After a popular dance, she talked about her diet and the physical aspects of her performance."
"I eat more carbohydrates than ever before, which is crazy," she said



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Chris Kelly (@imchriskelly) September 19, 2016Related Gallery...”
“WATCH: Amy Schumer Shares Hilarious Video of the Moment She Learned of Emmy NominationsThis is McKinnon's third year in a row being nominated in the category and first win.”
“Following McKinnon's win, both Clinton and DeGeneres took to Twitter to congratulate her, as did SNL head writer and frequent collaborator, Chris Kelly, and co-stars Aidy Bryant and Leslie Jones.”
“Thank you, and I miss you, pop."”
“"He made me start watching SNL when I was 12.”
“"On a personal note, thank you to my mother and sister and father," McKinnon said of her late father.”
“...she admitted, as she held her award -- she ended with a touching dedication.”
“Though the Ghostbusters actress was clearly verklempt -- "I'm shaking, guys!"”
“Thank you, Hillary Clinton."”
“THIS IS SO DESERVED!”


"- Chris Kelly (@ imchristkelly) September 19, 2016 related gallery..."
"Watch: Amy Schumer shares a funny video of the moment she learned about the Emmy nomination. This is McKinnon's third consecutive year of being nominated for the Emmy Award and winning it for the first time."
"After McKinnon won, Clinton and DeGeneres congratulated her on twitter. SNL's lead author and frequent collaborator Chris Kelly and co stars Eddie Bryant and Leslie Jones also congratulated her on twitter."
"Thank you. I miss you, Dad."
"He told me to watch SNL when I was 12 years old."
"Personally, thank you to my mother, my sister and my father," McKinnon said of his late father
“…… She admitted that when she took her prize - she ended up with a touching dedication. "
"Although this ghost girl is obviously crazy -" I'm shaking, guys. "
"Thank you, Hillary Clinton."
"This is worthy of it!"



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That’s the end.””
“I can’t take it anymore.” Then there’s the other version of Melania, painted by conservative media as confident, fashion forward, graceful and adored.”
“This Melania has shown up on late-night TV and in tabloids.”
“She may even be mulling a divorce.”
“She dislikes her husband and disagrees with his policies.”
“In one version of the public imagination, Melania is unhappy.”
“I can handle everything.” But as Donald Trump’s presidency has progressed, the first lady has become a versatile avatar, her image split sharply down political lines.”
“Don’t feel sorry for me.”
“Oh, poor Melania.’ Don’t feel sorry for me.”
“People think and talk about me like, ‘Oh, Melania.”


"That's it."
"I can't stand it any more." There is another version of Melania, portrayed by conservative media as confident, fashionable, elegant and adored
"This Melania appeared on late night TV and tabloids."
"She might even be thinking about divorce."
"She doesn't like her husband and doesn't agree with his policy."
"In a version of the public imagination, Melania is unhappy."
"I can handle everything." But with the progress of Donald Trump's presidency, the first lady has become a versatile incarnation, and her image has split sharply on the political line
"Don't feel sorry for me."
"Oh, poor Melania. Don't feel sorry for me
"People always think and talk about me like, 'Oh, Melania.'"



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Baggy white athletic pants belie her gorgeous gams as they balloon out around her enviable shape.”
“Daring to impress, a translucent raincoat provides layers around her lithe waist as she frames her face with her hands.”
“The Black-ish star looks fashion forward chic as she opens up about the future, sexuality, and her famous mother Diana Ross for the magazine's interview.”
“'I have to take some time to dream some new dreams.”
“I feel like there’s a treasure hunt in front of me,' said the 45-year-old.”
“Cover girl: Tracee Ellis Ross is on the cover of the February issue of GlamourIn 2017, Tracee won a Golden Globe for her performance as Rainbow Johnson in the hit ABC sitcom Black-ish.”
“She became the first black woman in thirty years to do so while collecting an Emmy nomination along the way.”
“And after a 2018 NAACP Image Award nod, Tracee opened up about all the recent accolades to Glamour.”
“'I have dreamt of moments like these since I was a little girl, accepting my Oscar in the mirror.”
“So it’s a dream come true.”


"Loose white sweatpants mask her gorgeous masculinity as they swell around her enviable figure."
To impress, a translucent raincoat provides layers around her soft waist, and she outlines her face with her hands
In an interview with the magazine, the black star revealed her future, sexual orientation and her famous mother, Diana Rose, who looks fashionable and avant-garde
"I need to spend some time dreaming new dreams."
"I think there's a treasure hunt in front of me," the 45 year old said
"Cover girl: Tracy Ellis Ross is on the cover of the February 2017 issue of glamour, and Tracy won the Golden Globe for her role as rainbow Johnson in ABC's hit sitcom black ISH."
"She became the first black woman to receive an Emmy nomination in 30 years."
"After being nominated for the NAACP Image Award in 2018, Tracy made public all the recent accolades for glamour."
"I've dreamed of such a moment since I was a child, accepting my Oscar in the mirror."
"So it's a dream come true."



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We do our best,” she said, quipping of her kids: “They’ll probably end up in therapy at some point.””
““Any working mom’s struggle — any working parent’s struggle —is to balance it all.”
“She and husband Brandon Blackstock have four kids: River and 19-month-old son Remington, as well as Savannah and son Seth, 10, from Blackstock’s first marriage.”
“...balancing her career with an equally busy family life...”
“Image zoom Kelly Clarkson River Keith Urban and Nicole Kidman Credit ABC Image zoom Pink Savannah Kelly Clarkson and River Credit Chris Polk AMA2017 Getty RELATED VIDEO Kelly Clarkson Dishes on Life as a Mom You Don t Want to Suck at It The American Idol alum opened up about...”
“Image zoom Savannah, River and Kelly Clarkson | Credit: Rob Latour/REX/ShutterstockAs the family settled into their seats, an adorable River made fast friends with her neighbors, including Pink and Nicole Kidman.”
“In addition to promoting the new LP, Clarkson will join the season 14 cast of The Voice — then hit the road for a world tour in 2018.”
“They’re color-coordinated … They’re beautiful, and they love this kind of stuff — more than their mom!”The “Love So Soft” singer is set to open the AMAs with Pink and will also perform a cut from her latest album, Meaning of Life.”
““They look beautiful.”
“News ahead of the awards show.”


"We did our best," she said, teasing her children, "and they might end the treatment at some point."
"The struggle of any working mother - the struggle of any working parent - is to balance all this."
"She and her husband Brandon Blackstock have four children: River and his 19-month-old son, Remington, and Savannah's 10-year-old son, Seth, who married Blackstock for the first time."
“… Balancing her career with her equally busy family life... "
"Picture zooming kailik lakson River Keith city and Nicole Kidman credit ABC picture zooming pink Savannah kailik lakson and river credit Chris Polk amageti Related videos kailik lakson dishes as a mother's life, you don't want to suck it, American Idol alumni open about..."
"Picture zooming Savannah, river and kailick lakson | credit: roblatour / Rex / shutterstock when a family settles in their seats, a lovely river soon connects with her neighbors, including pink and Nicole Kidman's friends."
"In addition to publicizing the new LP, Clarkson will join the voice group in Season 14 and then go on the road to the world tour in 2018."
"Their color harmony They're beautiful, they like this stuff - better than their mom! The "so soft in love" singer will start in pink and will sing a clip from her latest album "the meaning of life."
"They look beautiful."
"The news before the award ceremony."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"She wants like 100 babies, but I don't know if I can do that," he admitted.”
“She liked that just fine, and when she tried to confirm it, he promised it would at least be "a collaborative effort."”
“The Maroon 5 frontman and "Voice" coach has opened up about the baby on the way and revealed whether 1-year-old daughter Dusty Rose will soon have a little brother or sister.”
“"It's a girl," he told Ellen DeGeneres Tuesday.”
“"We're having another girl!"”
“The proud father was happy to share the news with the host and happy to get some help from her — again.”
“When Prinsloo was pregnant with their first daughter, it was DeGeneres who came up with the baby's name.”
“"So obviously now, whether you like it or not, you're going to be involved with this next one, too," Levine told her.”
“DeGeneres really wanted to lock that down because naming two of kids would make for a "big story."”
“And Prinsloo is on board with a big family, too — maybe even bigger than he envisions.”


"She wants 100 children, but I don't know if I can," he admits
"She loved it, and when she tried to prove it, he promised that it was at least a 'cooperative effort.'
"The team leader and voice coach of chestnut 5 disclosed the baby's condition on the way, and revealed whether 1-year-old daughter dusty rose would soon have a younger brother or sister."
"It's a girl," he told Alan DeGeneres on Tuesday
"We have another girl!"
"The proud father is very happy to share the news with the host and to get some help from her - again."
"When princlow was pregnant with his first daughter, it was DeGeneres who came up with the child's name."
"So obviously, whether you like it or not, you're going to be involved in the next one," Levin told her
"DeGeneres really wants to lock this in, because naming two children would be a big story."
"Princelow was with a big family - maybe bigger than he thought."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m just a nice Jewish kid ... who loves movies and pretty girls.”Jaime Ray Newman in 2014.”
“Sometimes, in enumerating his lack of vices, Ratner also points out his love of beautiful women, saying, for example, in a 2008 Jewish Journal story: “I’m not into dark stuff.”
““Furthermore, no woman has ever requested or received any financial settlement from my client.”It feels as if I keep going up against the same bully at school who just won’t quit.”
““I have represented Mr. Ratner for two decades, and no woman has ever made a claim against him for sexual misconduct or sexual harassment,” Singer said in a 10-page letter to The Times.”
“On Ratner’s behalf, Singer “categorically” disputed their accounts.”
“As is often the case, none of the women reported the allegations to the police.”
“In interviews with the Los Angeles Times, Henstridge and five other women accused Ratner of a range of sexual harassment and misconduct that allegedly took place in private homes, on movie sets or at industry events.”
“...sexual misconduct at the hands of producer Harvey Weinstein director James Toback and numerous other powerful men Henstridge decided she would no longer remain silent...”
“...powerful players directing producing or financing dozens of today s biggest box office hits including Rush Hour X Men The Last Stand The Revenant and Horrible Bosses ALSO Warner Bros cuts ties with Brett Ratner s company As hundreds of women have come forward in recent weeks with allegations of...”
“Since that incident in the early 1990s Henstridge has found success as an actress starring in the films Species and The Whole Nine Yards But she said she has carried the memory of the run in with her and watched from afar as Ratner became one of Hollywood s most...”


"I'm just a good Jewish child... People who like movies and beautiful girls
Sometimes, when citing his lack of bad habits, Ratner also points out his love for beautiful women. For example, in a 2008 Jewish Journal article, he said, "I don't like dark things."
"Moreover, no woman has ever asked or received any financial compensation from my client." It felt like I was constantly meeting the same bully at school, and she just refused to quit
In a 10 page letter to the times, Singh said: "it has been 20 years since I represented Mr. Ratner, and no woman has ever filed a claim against him for sexual misconduct or harassment."
Singh on behalf of Ratner "categorically" refuted their claims
"As usual, none of the women reported the charges to the police."
In an interview with the Los Angeles Times, henstridge and five other women accused Ratner of a series of sexual harassment and misconduct in private homes, film sets or industry activities
“…… The sexual misconduct of producer Harvey Weinstein, director James Toback and many other powerful men, henstridge decided that she would not keep silent any more... "
“…… Powerful actors and directors have produced or funded dozens of today's most popular movies, including the last stop of "rush hour X-Men," the avenger, and "the terrible boss." Warner Bros. has also cut off contact with Brett Ratner because hundreds of women have come forward to accuse in recent weeks. "
"Since the incident in the early 1990s, henstridge has played a successful actress in species and size nine, but she said that she has been watching Ratner become one of the most influential actors in Hollywood from a distance with the memory of running in..."



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They divorced in 2016.”
“It was just us two, exchanging our vows, and that was the most special moment.”The investor and Shark Tank personality was previously married to Diane Plese, with whom he shares three children.”
“Kym Johnson gave birth to her twins with husband Robert Herjavec on Monday, April 23.”
“The first-time mom shared a photo of her beau holding the newborns via Instagram.”
““I never thought my heart could feel so full.”
“We’re so in love with our little angels.”
“Born at 7.44am and 7.45am 4/23/18,” she wrote.”
“The dancer told Us Weekly in January that Herjavec, 55, had put together a baby shower in Australia for her ahead of the twins’ arrival.”
““[Robert] is the best.”
“He spoiled me with a trip back home to Australia to see all my girlfriends,” she gushed to Us and a group of reporters.”


"They divorced in 2016."
"Only the two of us exchanged vows. It was the most special moment." The investor and celebrity had previously married Diane price and had three children
Kim Johnson and her husband Robert hehavik gave birth to twins on Monday, April 23
"The fledgling mother shared a picture of her boyfriend holding her newborn through instagram."
"I never thought my heart would be so full."
"We love our little angel so much."
"Born on April 23, 2018 at 7:44 a.m. and 7:45 a.m.," she wrote
"The dancer told us weekly in January that hehavek, 55, had prepared a baby shower for her in Australia before the twins arrived."
"(Robert) is the best."
"He spoiled me and let me go home to Australia to see all my girlfriends," she told us and a group of reporters



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“April Fools!”
“Are you excited the Gladiators are not hanging up their white hats just yet?”
“When news broke that Jessica Capshaw and Sarah Drew were being let go from Grey’s Anatomy, fans were rightly upset.”
“Luckily for those diehard Arizona Robbins fans, ShondaLand has revealed that the character will be getting her very own spinoff!”
“Like Private Practice, the new series (which is still untitled) will follow Arizona as she sets off on a new adventure.”
“This time, Arizona will be moving to New York to be closer to her daughter who had moved there with Callie.”
“As seen on Grey’s Anatomy, Sofia was having a hard time returning to Seattle to visit Arizona.”
“It clearly made things harder for both mother and daughter.”
“This will lead to Arizona deciding to move to New York.”
“It’s not yet clear if this means that Arizona will also try to rekindle things with her ex-wife, given that Sara Ramirez has seemingly moved on from her character of Callie.”


"April Fool's Day!"
"Are you excited that the gladiators haven't hung up their white hats yet?"
"When the news came out that Jessica Capshaw and Sarah drew had been fired by gray, fans were naturally upset."
"Fortunately, for those stubborn Arizona robins fans, Sunderland revealed that the character will get her own derivative products!"
"As with private practice, the new series (currently unnamed) will follow Arizona on a new adventure."
"This time, Arizona will move to New York and be closer to her daughter who moved there with her and Kelly."
"As Gray's anatomy shows, it's hard for Sophia to go back to Seattle to Arizona."
"It obviously makes it harder for both mother and daughter."
"It will lead to Arizona's decision to move to New York."
"It's not clear whether that means Arizona will try to rekindle the relationship with her ex-wife, because Sarah Ramirez seems to have left her role as Carly."



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"Yes!"”
“He and Ashley Ashley for several months earlier this year after they connected onBachelor Winter Games.”
“Embed Code Restart Why Ashley Iaconetti and Jared Haibon Say They're Different From Every Other Bachelor Couple (Exclusive)Watching it all go down was Kevin, who called it a "slap in the face" after their breakup in March.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Why Ashley Iaconetti and Jared Haibon Say They're Different From Every Other Bachelor Couple (Exclusive) This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“"You're my soulmate and I love you."”
“...she screamed, calling the stunning sparkler "perfect."”
“"So, Ashley, will you marry me?"”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Yes!"
"Earlier this year, he was in touch with Ashley Ashley at the winter games for months."
"Why do Ashley iaconetti and Jared haibon say they're different from other single couples (exclusive) it's Kevin who watched all this fail, calling it a slap in the face after he broke up in March."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Why Ashley iaconetti and Jared haibon say they are different from other single couples (exclusive) this video is not available because we can't load sponsor information."
"You are my soul mate, and I love you."
“…… She screamed, calling the amazing spark "perfect."
"So, Ashley, will you marry me?"



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The reputation Secret Sessions...”
“Some of Taylor‘s celeb friends who are seen in the video include Jack Antonoff, Ruby Rose, Haim, and her BFF Abigail Anderson.”
“The video gives a look at fans arriving at Taylor‘s homes in Rhode Island, Nashville, and London, where they danced along to the music with their idol and got sneak peeks at music videos and more.”
““Over the course of a year, Taylor hand-picked 500 fans from all over the world to secretly play them her new album, reputation, a month before its worldwide release on November 10, 2017,” the video intro reads.”
“The 27-year-old singer hand-picked all of the fans who attended by scouring social media to find the most devoted fans.”
“Taylor Swift has welcomed hundreds of fans into her homes around the world for the “Reputation Secret Sessions” and now she’s sharing an inside look at the special events!”


"Reputation secret meeting..."
"Some of Taylor's celebrity friends seen in the video include Jack Antonov, ruby Ross, Haim and her boyfriend Abigail Anderson."
"This video shows the fans who arrive at Taylor's homes in Rhode Island, Nashville and London, where they dance to music with their idols, peek at music videos and so on."
"In one year, Taylor selected 500 fans from all over the world to secretly play her new album reputation for them one month before its global release on November 10, 2017," the video said
"The 27 year old singer personally selected all the fans who participated in social media to find the most loyal fans."
Taylor Swift has welcomed hundreds of fans to the reputation secret conference at home around the world, and now she's sharing the inside story of the special event



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News:”
“Ariana Grande Was ’’So Shaken Up’’ After Manchester Bombing, Camila Cabello Says | E!”
“...show is being held at the Emirates Old Trafford Cricket Ground and will feature the likes of Justin Bieber Coldplay and Miley Cyrus among others...”
“I m so sorry I can t even imagine Cabello went on to say that she is so proud of Grande s decision to return to Manchester to play a benefit show on June 4 adding Ariana is one person who has always been so supportive of me The benefit...”
“Camila Cabello revealed this week that she spoke to friend Ariana Grande shortly after the tragedy at her Manchester concert–and confirmed that the singer was “so shaken up.” “Yeah, I spoke to her after that happened,“ Cabello said on Britain’s This Morning Wednesday.”


News:
Camilla Cabello said: "Ariane Grande was" very shocked "after the Manchester bombings!"
“… The performance is being held at the Old Trafford cricket stadium at the Emirates Stadium, and will be attended by Justin Bieber cordpura, Millie Cyrus and others... "
"I'm sorry, I can't even imagine cabrero going on, she's proud of the decision to go back to Manchester on June 4th for a charity show, and Ariana has always been a very supportive person..."
Camilla Cabello revealed this week that shortly after the tragedy at the Manchester concert, she had a conversation with her friend Ariana Grande and confirmed the singer was "very shocked." "Yes, I talked to her after that," Cabello said on Wednesday's UK show this morning



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Though the singer did reveal that she had breast implants and a nose job, she shot down a Wild ‘N Out star who questioned her rear end’s authenticity.”
“To Work To Make As Much Money As Rihanna s Hit Work And as Azalea has said before the butt you see is all natural...”
“I never realized how flexible you have to be to do that stuff My teacher was like I really suggest you take yoga and I didn t know you had to take yoga to be a twerker but apparently you do From Coinage This Is How Long You ll Have...”
“I do have someone who is very, very good at twerking, and she helped me,” she says.”
““I did take classes.”
“Discover the latest music videos by Iggy Azalea on Vevo.”
“Watch Mo Bounce by Iggy Azalea online at vevo.com.”
““I did a lot of rehearsals actually, and man I lost 15 pounds in a week dancing to that song!”While Azalea is a twerking pro now, she admits that she needed some tutorials to nail down the dance move.”
““It’s a lot — I went on a meal plan before the video because I knew I would have to be dancing fairly skimpily dressed,” Azalea, 26, told New Zealand radio station Nova 96.9.”
“...in just one week from rehearsing and filming all the twerking in her new music video, “Mo Bounce.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Although the singer did disclose that she had breast and nose implants, she shot down a wild star who questioned the authenticity of her butt."
"Make money like Rihanna's hit drama work, just like the cuckoo said before, you see the butt is very natural..."
"I never realized how much flexibility you have to have to do those things. My teacher said that I really recommend you to practice yoga. I don't know you have to practice yoga to be a fool, but it's obvious that you've been practicing since the mint. That's how long you have to practice..."
"I do have a very, very sociable person who helped me," she said
"I did have class."
"Found the latest music video of Iggy azalea on VEVO."
"Watch Moji Rhododendron online" vevo.com Website. "
"Actually I rehearsed many times, man, dancing with that song, I lost 15 pounds a week! "While Rhododendron is now a professional twirking, she admits she needs some tutorials to determine the dance moves."
"It's too much - I made a meal plan before the video was shown, because I knew I had to dance quite simply," Azaria, 26, told Radio Nova 96.9 in New Zealand
“… Within a week of rehearsing and filming all the tweeting in her new music video "Mo bounce", get news, feature and other push notifications. "



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Following the proposal, which happened on the rooftop of the Parkside Lounge, the couple’s friends and family joined them for a fun-filled engagement party.”
“As previously reported, the pair got engaged in New York City in July 2016 after six years of dating.”
““He loves me so much he even smells my cowboy boots lol,” she captioned a silly shot of the happy couple.”
“The Total Me-Tox: How to Ditch Your Diet, Move Your Body & Love Your Life author also shared photos on her Instagram Story playing an “intense” game with her future husband, where they found themselves taking off their shoes.”
“— Kat Dennings and Mad Men’s Christina Hendricks, sipped on champagne and snacked on cookies in the shape of diamond rings and the letter B.”
“A cute collage of photos of Behrs and the Mad Men actor, 40, hung above a fireplace with a sign that read, “Bride to Be.” Guests, including her former 2 Broke Girls costar —and bridesmaid!”
“The bridal shower, hosted by her sister and mother, was decorated with wildflowers in jars and featured an array of china teacups.”
“I love you all so much!” The bride to be wore a lace dress with cowboy boots, and had her blonde hair set in a pretty braid.”
“Thank you @emilybehrs @maureenbehrs and all the amazing women in my life for the most gorgeous shower and most special day!”
“The 2 Broke Girls star, 32, took to Instagram to share photos of the sweet celebration, captioning them, “Man, I really felt the love today.”


After the proposal took place on the roof of the park lounge, the couple's friends and family went to a fun engagement party
"As mentioned earlier, they were engaged in New York in July 2016 after six years of love."
"He loves me so much that he can smell my cowboy boots, ha ha," she describes the happy couple with a stupid lens
"My total toxins: how to get rid of your diet, move your body and love your life." the author also shared photos from her instagram story, playing a "fierce" game with her future husband, who found themselves taking off their shoes. "
"Kate Dennis and Christina Hendrix are drinking champagne, eating diamond shaped biscuits and the letter B
A cute photo collage of 40 year old bear and mad man actor hangs above the fireplace with the "bride to be" sign on it. Guests, including her two former partners and bridesmaids in "the bankrupt girl!"
The bride's party, hosted by her sister and mother, is decorated with wild flowers blooming in pots and a series of porcelain teacups
"I love you so much! The bride to be wore a lace dress with denim boots and a beautiful braid of golden hair
"Thank you@ emilybehrs@maureenbehrs And all the amazing women in my life, let me spend the most gorgeous shower and the most special day
The 32 year old "two bad girls" star shared a photo of the sweet celebration on instagram and wrote under the title of the photo: "man, I really feel love today."



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The couple wed in $1.5 million ceremony in 2009.”
“And all I could say was, ‘You’re hot.’”The two simple words seemed to do the trick.”
““It was a big build to the moment that I could finally talk to her.”
“I laid out my outfit the night before,” Duhamel told Us Weekly with a laugh.”
““I was really nervous and that was my moment of truth.”
“The actor was so taken by her that he asked producers if the band could be featured on his former show “Las Vegas.” When Fergie showed up on set, Duhamel was a mess.”
“...watching a Black Eyed Peas music video back in 2004 and was immediately smitten...”
“A post shared by Fergie fergie on Jan 10 2017 at 4 13pm PST From the looks of the photos one would never wonder where is the love A post shared by Josh Duhamel joshduhamel on Jan 10 2017 at 3 48pm PST Duhamel first laid eyes on Fergie while...”
“...other with affection over social media...”
“Duhamel told People in May that he and Fergie share a lot of love for our son and have a good time together A post shared by Josh Duhamel joshduhamel on Jan 10 2017 at 4 04pm PST The couple celebrated their eight year anniversary in January and showered each...”


"The couple had a $1.5 million wedding in 2009."
"I can only say, 'you're sexy.'" These two simple words seem to work
"By the time I can finally talk to her, it's really big."
"I had my clothes laid out the night before," Duhamel told us with a smile
"I was really nervous. It was a critical moment for me."
The actor was fascinated by her, so he asked the producer if the band could appear on his previous show, Las Vegas. When Fergie appeared on the set, Duhamel was in a mess
“… After watching a Black Eyed Pea music video, I went back to 2004 and was immediately fascinated. "
"Fergie Fergie shared a post at 4:13 PM PST on January 10, 2017. From the appearance of the photo, people will never doubt that Josh Duhamel saw Fergie for the first time in a post shared at 3:48 PM PST on January 10, 2017, and..."
“… Others are passionate about social media... "
"Duhamel told people in May that he and Fergie had a great love for our son and had a great time together. Josh Duhamel posted a post on January 10, 2017 at 4:04 p.m. in Pacific standard time. The couple celebrated their eighth anniversary in January and showered each of them..."



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Beyonce.comImage zoom Credit: Beyonce.comRELATED VIDEO: Jay-Z & Beyonce: All the Ways J and Bey Get PaidThe 22-time Grammy winner also has your Christmas tree in mind.”
“Other sweaters include a $45 bright red sweater printed with the lyrics of Beyoncé and husband JAY-Z’s lyrics — “Shinin’ Shinin’ Shinin’ Shinin’” — and a “Sis the Season” black sweater for $40.”
“Of course, fans will remember this was one of the hidden clues she gave months before she publicly announced she was pregnant with twins Rumi and Sir.”
“(On the back the phrase “Holidayoncé” is screenprinted!)”
“For $40, you can forever wear the December 2016 portrait of Beyoncé throwing up a peace sign and wearing reindeer ears.”
“Image zoom Credit: Beyonce.comImage zoom Credit: Beyonce.comWhile last year was all Lemonade-themed clothing, Santa Bey’s 2017 line contains much more subtle, but still stylish expressions instead of those traditional Christmastime phrases.”
“The festive merchandise is part of Bey’s brand new holiday capsule collection, which was released just in time for Black Friday.”
“...a Thicc Holiday sweatshirt from the singer s website for 55”
“...adjustment instead of the turtleneck she wore a sweatshirt which read Have a Thicc Holiday Image zoom Credit Beyonce Instagram Image zoom Credit Beyonce Instagram Image zoom Credit Beyonce Instagram And if you want to be just like Beyoncé and who doesn t you can purchase your very own Have...”
“While the Queen Bey did not choose to caption these photos on social media on her website she shared them alongside the message Happy Thiccsgiving And Beyoncé clearly took her own advice because on her website she also shared a photo of herself in the same outfit with one minor...”


"Image zooming: Beyonce comig zooming credit: Beyonce Video: Jay-Z& Beyonce:J All the ways to win the 22nd annual Grammy Awards with bey, you have a Christmas tree in your heart
"Other sweaters include a $45 bright red sweater with Beyonce and her husband Jay-Z lyrics -" shinin'shinin'shinin '", and a $40 black sweater with" is the season. "
"Of course, fans will remember that this is one of the secret clues that she publicly announced a few months ago that she was pregnant with twins Rumi and her husband."
"(the phrase" holiday NC é "on the back is screen printed!)"
"For $40, you can always wear the December 2016 portrait of Beyonce throwing out a peace slogan and wearing reindeer ears."
"Image zooming: Beyonce comig zooming credit: beyonce.com last year was full of lemonade themed clothes, and Santa bee's 2017 collection contains more subtle but still fashionable expressions than traditional Christmas phrases."
"These holiday products are part of bey's brand new holiday capsule series, which was just released on Black Friday."
“… A 55 pound holiday Sweatshirt from singer's website
“… Instead of a turtleneck, she wears a sweatshirt that says there's a HICC holiday image zoom credit Beyonce instagram image zoom credit Beyonce instagram image zoom credit Beyonce instagram, if you imagine Beyonce and who don't you can buy your own have... "
"Although Queen bey did not choose to add titles to these photos on her website on social media, she also shared these photos with the information of" happy thinking ". Beyonce obviously adopted her own suggestion, because on her website, she also shared a photo of herself and a minor wearing the same clothes..."



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s kind of like, ‘There’s no saving me.’ “”
““And there’s an emphasis on two factors playing on someone’s mental state.”
“In honor of Michael Cavallari’s life, Kristin, 31, shared a throwback photo of the siblings to Instagram Tuesday, which marks the three-year anniversary of his death.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Home from a busy morning and thinking of my brother.”
“Today is the 3 year anniversary of his passing and I think this year is one of the hardest- as it’s real now,” wrote the mother of three.”
““He’s not coming back and the shock is finally gone,” she continued.”
““Today and every single day, Mikey, we miss you.”In December 2015, nearly two weeks after he went missing, Michael was found dead.”
“He was 30.”
“Utah police had been searching for Michael since Nov. 27, 2015, after his 2014 Honda Civic was discovered abandoned on I-70 in the state.”


"It's a bit like 'can't save me'," he said
"Another point is that there are two factors that affect a person's mental state."
"To commemorate Michael Cavallari's life, Christine, 31, shared a retrospective photo of his siblings on instagram on Tuesday, the third anniversary of his death."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I came home in the morning, thinking about my brother."
"Today is the third anniversary of his death, and I think this is the most difficult year - because it's true," the mother of Three wrote
"He didn't come back, and the shock finally disappeared," she continued
"Today and every day, Mickey, we miss you." In December 2015, Michael was found dead nearly two weeks after his disappearance
"He was 30."
"Utah police have been searching for Michael after he was found abandoned on Interstate 70 in Utah on November 27, 2015."



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Michael Buckner/Getty Images]”
“Next up for Lea Michele, she will be starring in Dimension 404, alongside Robert Buckley and Sarah Hyland.”
“Lea again shared a memory of Corey with her Instagram followers, posting a dated picture of Corey and herself.”
“While that photo was shared without a word to mark the memory, Michele recently took to the stage to share a few songs that seemed to have given even greater tribute to Monteith and Lea’s relationship with the late actor.”
“Glee Alum Lea Michele Shares Another Photo Of Corey Monteith And HerselfBillboard shares that Corey Monteith was on Lea’s mind even more so than usual this past week, as the Glee and Scream Queens star took an opportunity to share another photo from her collection.”
“This time, the picture looked more candid and spur of the moment, taken long before Instagram.”
“The image of Michele and Monteith was seems to be an older picture, taken in the days of the Polaroid Instant Camera, though, considering Lea posted many similar images, it may be possible that she was making use of a new app or filter.”
“The picture of Lea and Corey shows Ms. Michele snuggling close to her Glee co-star, as Monteith wraps his arms around her in a protective embrace.”
“While the Glee actress didn’t caption this image, the photo seems to speak for itself, alluding to their relationship as it was then.”
“It also speaks to Michele’s state of heart now, remembering Corey after his passing.”


"[Michael Buckner / Getty pictures]
"Next, Leah Michelle will play in 404 dimensions, along with Robert Barkley and Sarah Helan."
"Leah once again shared her memories of Corey with her instagram fans and posted an expired photo of Corey and herself."
"Although the photo was shared without any words to commemorate, Michelle recently came on stage to share several songs, which seem to give more praise to the relationship between Monteith and Leah and the late actor."
Glee alumni lea Michele shared another photo of Corey Monteith and herself, and billboard shared the impression of Corey Monteith in Lea's mind, which is more profound than the past week, because the stars of glee and Scream Queen will take this opportunity to share another photo of her collection
"This time, it looks more candid and impulsive, and it was taken earlier than instagram."
"The photo of Michele and Monteith seems to be an old photo taken in the era of Polaroid instant cameras, but considering lea has released many similar photos, she may be using a new app or filter."
"The photos of Leia and Corey show Michelle nestling next to her glee partner, with montith holding her and protecting her."
"Although the glee actresses didn't explain the photo, it seems to explain the problem, implying their relationship at the time."
"It also shows Michelle's current state of mind, thinking of Corey after his death."



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO Dwayne The Rock Johnson s Daughter Simone honored as first Golden Globe Ambassador It Makes Me So Happy...”
“Going into it our focus is far more on the worlds that make these films and less on anything that s happening in Washington Image zoom Dwayne The Rock Johnson and Simone Alexandra Johnson at the 2016 Golden Globes Credit Alberto Rodriguez NBC NBCU Photo Bank via Getty Images RELATED”
“...of sexual misconduct...”
“With the monologue as far as talking about anything in the news right now it seems like this year more than ever Hollywood has its own internal politics that obviously deserve to be talked about he said referencing the headlines made by Harvey Weinstein and other major entertainment figures accused...”
“Be sure to check out PEOPLE’s full Golden Globes coverage to get the latest news on Hollywood’s big night.”
“The 44-year-old host of Late Night with Seth Meyers recently told PEOPLE how he planned to handle the hosting gig in the wake of the sexual harassment scandals that have rocked Hollywood in recent months.”
“Seth Meyers will take the stage as host of the 2018 Golden Globe Awards.”
“ET — the Globes, awarded by the Hollywood Foreign Press Association, will honor nominees in film and TV.”
“ET while NBC’s begins at 7 p.m.”
“Red Carpet starts 6 p.m.”


"Simone, daughter of rock star Dwayne, was awarded the first Golden Globe Award ambassador, which made me very happy..."
"Into it, our focus is more on the world, making these movies, rather than anything that happens in Washington, D.C., at the 2016 Golden Globe credit Alberto Rodriguez NBC through Getty pictures related to NBC pictures of kudwayne's rock Johnson and Simon Alexandra Johnson."
“… Sexual misconduct... "
"As far as anything in the news is being talked about right now, Hollywood seems to have more internal politics of its own this year than ever before, which is clearly worth talking about," he said. Referring to the headlines of Harvey Weinstein and other major entertainers, he said
"Be sure to check out people's full coverage of the Golden Globes and get the latest news on Hollywood night."
"The 44 year old host of" late at night with Seth Meyers "recently told people how he plans to handle the hosting concert after the sexual harassment scandal that has rocked Hollywood in recent months."
"Seth Meyers will be the host of the 2018 Golden Globe Awards."
The global award, presented by the Hollywood Association of foreign journalists, will go to nominees in the field of film and television
"Eastern time, NBC starts at 7 pm."
"The red carpet starts at 6pm."



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A source recently told Us: “Jesse and Minka took a few steps back because of the publicity, but they are still seeing each other.””
“...in the trash because a girl I work with is cute Despite the public attention surrounding both Williams divorce and his relationship with Kelly the new couple are still happily dating...”
“And all of a sudden motherf kers are writing think pieces that I somehow threw a 13 year relationship like the most painful experience I ve had in my life like with a person I ve loved with all of my heart that I threw a person and my family...”
““I was in a relationship 13 years, 13 real years, not five years, not seven years, 13 years,” he said in the video released on July 10.”
“Anyone and their assumptions about my personal life can do the same.”Williams addressed his divorce, as well as the cheating rumors, while appearing in Jay-Z’s Footnotes for 4:44 video.”
““I don’t know where your f—k off comment went but it was pretty awesome,” the person wrote, to which Kelly replied, “I didn’t delete it and I stand by it.”
“Now f–k off.”Later that day, another user chimed in to commend Kelly on her response while also noting that the original commenter’s post had been deleted.”
“Glad I could clear that up for you.”
“Hate for you to be disappointed.”
“It would be disappointing.”Kelly fired back: “They’re not.”


A source recently told us: "Jesse and Minka have stepped back a few steps because of the public attention, but they are still meeting."
“… In the trash can, because a girl I work with is very cute, despite the public concern about Williams' divorce and his relationship with Kelly, the couple are still happily dating... "
"All of a sudden, my mothers began to write some thinking articles. In some way, I abandoned a 13 year relationship, just like the most painful experience in my life, just like being with someone I love with all my heart, I abandoned a person and my family..."
"I've been in love for 13 years, real 13 years, not five years, not seven years, 13 years," he said in a video released on July 10
"Anyone and their assumptions about my personal life can do that." Williams appeared in the footnotes of Jay-Z in the 4:44 video, talking about his divorce and rumors of cheating
"I don't know where your f-k-off comment went, but it was great," the person wrote, and Kelly replied, "I didn't delete it, I support it."
Later in the day, another user chimed in to praise Kelly's reply, noting that the original comment had been deleted
"I'm glad I can help you clarify this."
"I hate your disappointment."
"That's disappointing." Kelly hit back: "they're not."



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I go back and forth.” She also spilled the beans on her romantic life, saying she isn’t dating right now, but is interested in doing so.”
“While speaking on Hot 97, Justine mentioned that she lives in NYC, but splits her time between LA and the Big Apple.”
“Three years later, she switched over to Roc Nation and Republic Records.”
“She Was Signed to Roc Nation in 2016In 2013, Justine signed with Atlantic Records.”
“2.”
“And while pushing your boundaries may be uncomfortable, Skye believes it’s also necessary if you want to become an It Girl.”
““Sometimes I’ll listen to my own music to get me motivated,” Skye shares.”
“Skye says self-motivation is key.”
““I do 45 minutes of cardio, then we do dynamics and end with some weight training and abs work outs.”Another thing you need to be an It Girl?”
““I work out with my trainer like 4 to 5 times a week,” she tells E!.”


"I come and go." She also revealed her romantic life, saying she doesn't have a date now but is interested in doing so
"Justin said on Hot 97 that she lives in New York, but she divides her time between Los Angeles and New York."
Three years later, she switched to the Republic of China record company
"She signed with the Republic of China in 2016, and Justin signed with Atlantic Records in 2013."
“2.”
"While it may be uncomfortable to break your own boundaries, Skye thinks it's also necessary if you want to be an it girl."
"Sometimes I listen to my own music to motivate myself," Skye said
"Skye says self motivation is the key."
"I do 45 minutes of aerobic exercise, then we do exercise, and finally we do some weight lifting and abdominal exercises." Do you still need to be an it girl? "
"My coach and I work out four to five times a week," she told e. "



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“❤️ @gigihadid."”
“I love you with all of my heart Squeegee.”
“You are my other half & I don't know what I would ever do without you.”
“✨✨Thank you for always being yourself, nothing more and nothing less.”
“Every one that knows you, immediately feels the incredible energy that radiates throughout you.”
“You make me laugh until I pee and even when I don't want to smile, you are just about the only person that can make me.”
“I didn't know anyone could be so generous, smart, funny, talented, hard working, artistic, loving, respectful AND beautiful all at the same damn time!!!”
“I feel so lucky every day to call you my sister.”
“My person.”
“❤️❤️My role model!”


“ ❤️  @Jihad
"I love you with all my heart."
"You are my other half. I don't know what to do without you."
“ ✨✨ Thank you for being yourself all the time, no more, no less. "
"Everyone who knows you will immediately feel the incredible energy emanating from your whole body."
"You make me laugh until I pee. Even if I don't want to laugh, you're the only one who can make me laugh."
"I didn't know anyone could be so generous, smart, funny, talented, hardworking, artistic, loving, respectful and beautiful all at the same damn time!"
"I'm lucky to call you my sister every day."
"My people."
“ ❤️❤️ My role model



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Leading up to the wedding, Nilsson teased the kind of nuptials she was planning on having.”
““Really big news!”
“Nilsson, who appeared on Chris Soules‘ season of The Bachelor in 2015 and later faced-off against Kaitlyn Bristowe for the lead of season 11 of The Bachelorette, married Jeremy Byrne on Saturday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The bride wore a strapless gown and long veil for their outdoor ceremony in southern California, according to photos shared on social media by friends and family with the hashtag #HeartByrne.”
“She also got creative with her footwear, enlisting a pal to bedazzle a pair of white Converse sneakers rather than donning heels.”
““I have the best roomie everrr!” Nilsson captioned a photo of the one-of-a-kind accessory.”
““Look at the shoes she made for me to wear today!!!”
“@juliasobo you are a wizard!!!”
“I mean, come on!!!!”


"Before the wedding, Nelson made fun of the kind of wedding she was going to have."
"Big news!"
"Nelson, who starred in Chris sules's Bachelor season in 2015, later competed with Caitlin Bristol for the lead role in singles Season 11 and married Jeremy Bourne on Saturday."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"According to photos shared by friends and family on social media, the bride wore a strapless robe and a long veil to an outdoor wedding in Southern California, labeled" heart Byrne. "
"Her shoes are also very creative. She found a friend to add color to a pair of white converse sneakers instead of wearing high heels."
"I have the best roommate ever! "Nelson made the title on a unique accessory photo."
"Look at the shoes she made for me today!"
"@ juliasobo, you are a wizard!!"
"I mean, come on!!"



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“According to TMZ, the couple welcomed a boy and a girl named Nicholas and Lucy.”
“2017Sixteen years after they first met, Iglesias and Kournikova reportedly became parents over the weekend.”
“In December, they jetted to London and once again fueled wedding rumors when Kournikova was snapped with yet another plain band on her ring finger.”
“Image zoom Enrique Iglesias and Anna Kournikova | Credit: Issac Baldizon/NBAE/GettyAnd the next year, Kournikova was photographed goofing around in a bikini with Iglesias while they prepared to board a boat in Miami.”
“In 2006, they sat front and center at the Cleveland Cavaliers vs. Miami Heat game in Miami, posed for photos at Big Pink restaurant and capped off the year with a date at Mauro’s Cafe in December.”
“2006 – 2012The pair appeared to be going strong for nearly a decade.”
“Image zoom Anna Kournikova | Credit: Jason Squires/WireImageReports circulated the duo had wed in a secret ceremony in Puerto Vallarta, but sources told PEOPLE at the time the rumors were false.”
“She later sported a simple band while out and about.”
“2004The rumor mill went into overdrive about a possible engagement — or wedding — when Kournikova stepped onto the court at the World Team Tennis match with a blindingly large pink diamond ring on her ring finger.”
“...shirt...”


According to TMZ, the couple welcomed a boy and a girl named Nicholas and Lucy
According to reports, Iglesias and Kournikova became parents at the weekend 16 years after their first meeting
Last December, when they flew to London, Kournikova wore another ordinary ring on her ring finger, which once again sparked wedding rumors
"Image zooming Enrique Iglesias and Anna Kournikova | image source: Issac baldizon / NBAE / gettyan the following year, Kournikova was photographed hanging out with Iglesias in a bikini as she was preparing to board a ship in Miami."
"In 2006, they sat in the front row and in the middle of the Miami Cleveland Cavaliers' game against the Miami Heat, posed for photos at the big pink restaurant, and dated at the Mauro cafe in December, ending the year."
"From 2006 to 2012, the two seem to have performed strongly in the past 10 years."
Image zooming Anna Kournikova | source: Jason squires / wire image reports reported that the two had a secret wedding in the port of barialta, but a source told people that the rumors at that time were false
"Later, she played a simple band while walking around outside."
"In 2004, when Kournikova stepped onto the court wearing a big pink diamond ring on her ring finger in a world tennis team match, rumors about her possible engagement or marriage became too heated."
“… "Shirt..."



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We will all, as ever, have to stay tuned.”
“And then on Tuesday, William and Harry attended a reception at Kensington Palace honoring those who work in Scotland Yard, and William confirmed that—rest assured—months later, George is still just as infatuated.”
“...over the crown...”
“But right up there with the rest of ‘em is the ongoing saga involving .”
“.”
“Prince George’s obsession with the police.”
“You’ll remember that back in December, Prince William handed a handwritten list to a Finnish Santa Claus on behalf of his 4-year-old son, in which George listed just one item he wanted for Christmas: a police car.”
“Police commissioner Jayne Richardson told William that there are more officers needed in the district, joking, “We are recruiting, actually, so if George and Charlotte are keen?”William responded, “[George] is obsessed, actually, by the police .”
“Is she obsessed with police cars?”


"We'll stay focused as always."
On Tuesday, William and Harry attended a reception for Scotland Yard staff at Kensington Palace. William confirmed that a few months later, George was still infatuated
“… On top of the crown... "
"But right there, with the others, is the ongoing saga."
“.”
"Prince George's obsession with the police."
"You will remember that last December, Prince William gave a handwritten list to a Finnish Santa on behalf of his 4-year-old son, and George listed only one thing he wanted for Christmas: a police car."
Police chief Jayne Richardson told William that the area needed more police, joking, "actually, we're recruiting, so if George and Charlotte are interested? William replied, "George is actually fascinated by the police."
"Is she obsessed with police cars?"



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They have assumptions, bulls***-ass remarks of what they think is going on.”
“How ill she is.”
“I just gotta sturdy up — I gotta propose in a fire way,' the 26-year-old rapper tells the magazine.”
“'We'll get married soon.”
“Travis, born Jacques Webster, says it's just a matter of time before he makes things official with Kylie, who he has been in a relationship with for 20 months.”
“Slamming the overreliance on technology in today's society, Travis said that is why his daughter will not be allowed to watch TV.”
“Waxing lyrical about the couple's baby girl, Travis admitted Stormi is banned from watching television, despite her mother's rise to fame on reality television.”
“She's that one'.”
“...with me to operate...”
“Baby girl Speaking to Rolling Stone the rapper 26 admitted that he and the 21 year old reality star were immediately ready to become parents when they found out they were expecting Stormi now 10 months He said It got to a point where I was like I need Kylie...”


"They have assumptions about what they think, and they have strong comments."
"How sick she is."
"I want to cheer up - I want to propose in a passionate way," the 26 year old rapper told the Wall Street Journal
"We're going to get married soon."
Born in Jacques Webster, Travis said it was only a matter of time before he and Kelly officially dated for 20 months
Travis attacked today's over reliance on technology, saying that's why his daughter can't watch TV
Travis, who is lyrical about the couple's baby girl, admits that Tommy has been banned from watching TV despite her mother's rise to fame on reality TV
"She's the one."
“… I'll do it... "
"The 26 year old admitted in an interview with the rolling stone rapper that when he and the 21-year-old reality star discovered that they were now 10 months pregnant with stormi, they were ready to be parents. He said, "when I need Kylie..."



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pharmaceutical Representative See also 7 WAYS NEWLYWEDS CAN KEEP THE HONEYMOON BLISS GOING AFTER THE WEDDING”
“Somehow, the laces got stuck and he couldn’t undo me.”
“As it turns out, I spent half an hour trying to get mine in!”
“By which time I was so frustrated I d lost the mood Selena Homemaker He vomited on my rented gown and I spent all night trying to clean stuff off the beading and sequins Winnie PR Manager We d knelt...”
“...down so many times for the tea ceremony See also 6 significant Chinese wedding traditions couples need to know that our knees and thighs were sore...”
“In the night, although he tried his best, my husband just couldn’t support himself with his knees and thighs which were shivering with overstrain.”
“So we ended up in a sitting position which worked out pretty well too Tin Li Civil Servant via GIPHY He took ages in the bathroom and when he finally emerged it was obvious he d been busy with a...”
“...warm up to prevent being overly aroused and ending our first night experience prematurely...”
“In my nervousness I blurted, ‘oh are you down?”
“'” – Shirlyn, Events Plannerphoto: 123rf“Great wedding night sex?”


"Medical representatives also saw seven ways for newlyweds to keep their honeymoon happy after their wedding"
"Somehow, the shoelace got stuck and he couldn't untie me."
"As it turns out, it took me half an hour to get mine in!"
"At that time, I was very depressed. I had lost the mood of a housewife. He vomited on my rented dress. I spent the whole night trying to clean up the beads and sequins of Winnie's PR Manager. We knelt down..."
“…… I went down the mountain many times to attend the tea ceremony and saw six important Chinese wedding traditions. Lovers need to know that our knees and thighs are sore... "
"At night, my husband tried his best, but his knees and thighs were shaking from overwork and he couldn't support himself."
"So we finally sat in a very good position. This is also the way that Tianli civil servant passed through Jifei. He spent a long time in the bathroom. When he finally appeared, it was obvious that he was busy all the time..."
“… Warm up to prevent over excitement and premature end of our first night experience... "
"I was so nervous that I blurted out," Oh, are you down? "
"'" – shirlyn, event planner photo: 123rf "wonderful wedding night sex?"



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If it’s over, it’s over and I can hopefully land somewhere else.””
“He came under fire in June, when the surrogate who carried his and partner Gage Edward’s daughter Monroe, now almost 2, sued the couple, Bravo and Flipping Out’s production company, Authentic Entertainment, for allegedly filming her delivery without her permission, among other issues.”
““There have been times when they picked up the show right after episode 3 airs,” he said.”
“...season...”
“I would think you might want to air the season a little sooner before the contract expires so that way you can decide whether or not you want to pick up the show He also claimed that Bravo had previously picked up Flipping Out in the middle of airing a...”
““My contract happens to expire before the rest of the season airs.”
“Image zoom Megan Weaver, Jeff Lewis and Jenni Pulos on Flipping Out | Credit: Nicole Wilder/Bravo/Getty Images“I understand the timing was not right for Bravo,” Lewis said on Jeff Lewis Live.”
“Lewis claims Pulos reported him to Bravo for “abuse and victimization” and later wrongful termination.”
“Then in September, just before Flipping Out‘s premiere, PEOPLE exclusively reported that Lewis had parted ways with his friend of nearly 20 years and co-star Jenni Pulos, after a huge fight that he says was caught on film and will be part of the show’s current season.”
“In recent months, the Jeff Lewis Design owner has been at the center of two major controversies.”


"If it's over, it's over. I hope to land somewhere else."
"He came under attack in June this year when his surrogate mother, who was carrying the daughter of him and his partner, gage Edward, Monroe (now nearly two years old), sued the couple, Bravo and authentic entertainment, the production company of flipping out, for filming her work without her permission."
"A few times they took the show after the third episode," he said
“… Season... "
"I think you might want to air the season a little earlier than the end of your contract, so you can decide whether to take the show or not, and he claimed Bravo was broadcasting one before
"My contract just expired before the rest of the season."
"Megan weaver, Jeff Lewis and Jenny Poulos in" turn out "photo source: Nicole Wilder / Bravo / Getty Images" Lewis said on Jeff Lewis's live show: "I know the timing is not right."
Lewis claimed that Poulos reported his "abuse and injury" to Bravo and later terminated the contract by improper means
"Then in September, just before the premiere of flipping out, people reported exclusively that Lewis broke up with his friend and co star Jennie Poulos, who had been in love for nearly 20 years. He said the war was filmed and would be part of the script season."
"In recent months, Jeff Lewis design has been the focus of two major controversies."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I had dinner with someone who is one of the most famous women on the planet — I won’t say who it is — who has not come out, who told me similar things.”He didn’t do anything about it, he says, because “there is nothing you can do.”
““Most people knew.”
“He rarely walked red carpets because he hates getting his picture taken.”
“(He and Cates have twins, Jakob and Naiia, born in 2001; the couple divorced in 2005.)”
“Ulrich was married to actress Georgina Cates by the age of 27 and moved to a farm in Virginia not long after.”
“It’s very obvious.” If only Skeet Ulrich saw the inside of my middle-school notebooks.”
“You go on Instagram now and, yeah, we all know Cole [Sprouse, who plays Jughead] is a heartthrob.”
“There was no real barometer.”
““As to where I sat on the heartthrob scale, I had no [idea].”
“...to life...”


"I had dinner with one of the most famous women on the planet - I don't want to say who - she hasn't come out yet, she told me something like that." He said he did nothing about it because "there's nothing you can do about it."
"Most people know that."
"He seldom goes on the red carpet because he hates taking pictures."
(he and Katz have twins, Jacob and Naya, born in 2001; the couple divorced in 2005.)
"Ulrich married actress Georgina cartes at the age of 27 and soon moved to a farm in Virginia."
"It's obvious." If only Skeeter Ulrich could see the inside of my high school notebook
"You're on instagram now, and yes, we all know that Cole is an exciting person."
"There is no real barometer."
"As for my position on the palpitation scale, I don't know."
"For life"



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Los Angeles fitness pro Anna Rahe's tip: Standing, lift your butt as you shift your weight to your heels.”
“PERFECT YOUR POSTURESlumpy equals dumpy.”
“...three times a day...”
“CONSIDER A SUPPLEMENT A blend of taurine a natural amino acid and vitamin B 6 will help you lose water weight without losing essential electrolytes claims Beverly Hills endocrinologist Eva Cwynar who suggests an Abadi Ease Water Retention 24 capsule...”
“5.”
“Also, the repetitive movements build up your jaw muscles, so your face looks wider, she says.”
“"You swallow air when you chew, creating gas, and the body can't digest the artificial sweeteners in gum, so you attract and retain water," says Los Angeles dermatologist Jessica Wu.”
“NIX THE GUMAvoid sugar-free gum.”
“4.”
“"It will draw water out of your cells—kind of like reverse osmosis," says New York dermatologist Francesca Fusco.”


"Los Angeles fitness expert Anna raher's advice: stand, raise your butt, and move your weight to your heels."
"Perfect your posture. Bulky is short."
“… Three times a day... "
"Consider a mixture of taurine, a natural amino acid, and vitamin B6 that can help you lose weight without losing essential electrolytes, and she recommends using Abadi ease water retention 24 Capsules..." said Beverly Hills endocrinologist EVA kevinar
“5.”
"Also, this repetitive movement strengthens your jaw muscles, so your face looks wider," she said
Jessica Wu, a Los Angeles dermatologist, said: "when you chew, you swallow air and produce gas. The body can't digest the artificial sweeteners in gum, so you attract and retain water."
"No sugar free gum."
“4.”
"It sucks water from cells like reverse osmosis," said Francesca Fusco, a New York dermatologist



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“44 000 likes on Twitter as of Friday April 7 and took the ambitious teen two weeks to create from start to finish...”
“IM ASKING EMMA STONE TO PROM the 17 year old wrote in all caps and decided to recreate the opening scene from la la land The video which is set to the tune of La La Land s opening number Another Day of Sun has over 20 000 retweets and...”
“As previously reported, the young Ryan Gosling look-alike posted his creative promposal to Twitter on Tuesday, April 4.”
““She didn’t actually go to prom with him, but he was invited to one of her concerts and he got to go up on stage with her so I think it worked out,” Staudenmaier said.”
“The teen also spoke with ABC on Wednesday, April 5, explaining that he was originally inspired by a former student from his high school, who asked Miley Cyrus to prom back in 2013.”
““I’m going to have a great time still with all my friends,” Staudenmaier told them.”
“Love, Emma.”Despite being turned down by Stone, he assured the GMA hosts that he’s looking forward to attending prom.”
“I do see Gosling around the eyes.”
“P.S.”
“Thank you.”


"As of Friday, April 7, there were 44000 people on twitter who liked it. This ambitious young man spent two weeks creating..."
"I invited Emma stone to the dance, and 17-year-old wrote the song in capital letters and decided to recreate the opening line of Lala land. The video, based on the opening line of another day in the sun, has been forwarded more than 20000 times, and.... "
"As previously reported, young Ryan Gosling posted his creative manifesto on twitter on Tuesday, April 4."
"She didn't actually go to the ball with him, but he was invited to one of her concerts, and he had to go on stage with her, so I think everything will be OK," Stoudemire said
"The teenager was also interviewed by ABC on Wednesday, April 5, explaining that his original inspiration came from a former high school student who invited Miley Cyrus to the dance in 2013."
"I'm going to have a good time with all my friends," Stoudemire told them
"Love you, Emma." Despite being rejected by stone, he assured the GMA host that he was looking forward to the prom
"I do see goslings around my eyes."
Postscript
"Thank you."



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The scene cuts out, before a title card announces that Spider-Man will return to the big screen with a new film slated for 2019 (no solid date has been set yet).”
“Instead, Marvel served up this silly nothingburger, with a knowing wink.”
“There are two credits scenes at the end of Spider-Man: Homecoming.”
“One might figure into future Marvel films, while the other is nothing more than a playful — but worthwhile — joke.”
“Mid- and post-credits scenes have become a Marvel tradition, something fans look forward to every time the company releases a new film.”
“Sometimes they contain huge reveals that hint at future movies (see: Black Panther at the end of Captain America: Civil War).”
“Other times, they serve as little winks from Marvel to its biggest fans, and call back to the company's history (see: Howard the Duck at the end of the first Guardians of the Galaxy).”
“They're fun.”
“They can be exciting.”
“And if we're lucky, they give us something to chew on until the studio’s next big release.”


"This is the end of the scene, before a title board announces that spider man will be released in 2019 (no date has been set yet)
"Instead, marvel offers this stupid hamburger, with an informed blink of an eye."
"There are two scenes at the end of spider man: going home."
"One may appear in a surprise movie of the future, and the other is just a funny but worthwhile joke."
"The mid and late stage scenes have become a tradition of miracles, which fans expect every time the company releases a new film."
"Sometimes, they have huge implications for future films (see: Captain America: the Panther at the end of the civil war)
"Other times, they're a small blink of an eye for Marvel's biggest fans. Let's look back at the company's history (see Howard the duck at the end of the first guardian of the Galaxy)
"They're fun."
"They can be exciting."
"If we're lucky, they'll give us something to chew before the next big release of the studio."



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...wasn t and what hurts and what was good She added So I m sure the feelings are not straightforward for the two of them Grey s Anatomy airs at 8 pm on Thursdays on ABC”
“There s so much love and there s so much that they ve shared and yet there s so much trauma and hurt and there s just so much to wade through in terms of what was real and what...”
““People are complicated and relationships are complicated,” she explained matter-of-factly.”
“...her character s on and off relationship with Owen...”
“I think that again now that we ve gotten through this very tragic story line I m anticipating and I m starting to see there s a lot of lightness in store Aside from the tumor Scorsone also commented on...”
“Practice her voice was really quite comedic and humorous...”
“I know that this whole season there s been the emphasis on bringing some of the lighthearted humor back infusing it into the show in the way that we had it a little earlier on When Amelia was on Private...”
“They can’t get much more down,” Scorsone shared.”
““I think, obviously, things are looking up for Amelia.”
“Scorsone revealed that she thinks this trauma will allow Amelia to have a new perspective on life and start a new chapter.”


“… No, what's painful, what's good, she added, so I believe the two of them are not directly in the gray anatomy of the air at 8 p.m. on Thursday at ABC
"They have too much love, too much in common, but also too much trauma and injury, too many things to experience, what is real, what is..."
"People are complicated and relationships are complicated," she explained realistically
“… Her role and Owen's intermittent relationship... "
"I think now that we've finished watching this very tragic story, I'm looking forward to, and I'm beginning to see, in addition to the tumor that sconson also commented on, there's a lot of light waiting for us..."
"Her voice is really funny..."
"I know the whole season has been about bringing some light humor back to the show, as we saw earlier in Amelia's private life..."
"They can't stand it any more," sconson said
"I think it's clear that Amelia is getting better."
"Scorson revealed that she thought the trauma would give Amelia a new perspective on life and open a new chapter."



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Mary’s baby died because there weren’t enough doctors or nurses to save him.”
“We are not rising to the challenge to help the women of the world.”
“I am so grateful I had access to such an incredible medical team of doctors and nurses at a hospital with state-of-the-art equipment.”
“When I finally made it home to my family, I had to spend the first six weeks of motherhood in bed.”
“And then I returned to the operating room for a procedure that prevents clots from traveling to my lungs.”
“I returned to surgery, where the doctors found a large hematoma, a swelling of clotted blood, in my abdomen.”
“First my C-section wound popped open due to the intense coughing I endured as a result of the embolism.”
“This sparked a slew of health complications that I am lucky to have survived.”
“So, when I fell short of breath, I didn’t wait a second to alert the nurses.”
“Because of my medical history with this problem, I live in fear of this situation.”


"Mary's child died because there were not enough doctors or nurses to save him."
"We didn't meet the challenge of helping the world's women."
"I'm very grateful for being able to come into contact with such an incredible team of doctors and nurses in a hospital with the most advanced equipment."
"When I finally got home, I had to spend my mother's first six weeks in bed."
"Then I went back to the operating room and had an operation to prevent blood clots from entering the lungs."
"I went back to the operating room and the doctor found a big hematoma in my abdomen, a congestive swelling."
"First of all, my C-section wound split, because the embolism caused me to cough violently."
"It caused a series of health complications, and I was lucky to survive."
"So when I was out of breath, I didn't wait a second to inform the nurse."
"Because I have a history of this problem, I live in fear of it."



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Catch the season finale next week on E!”
“The Miz and Maryse discovered that they are expecting at the end of this episode and a second bundle of joy added to the cast should make for plenty of drama on upcoming seasons of Total Divas.”
“It seems as though Lana has not learned from her previous experiences this season, and is continuing to act in ways that upset her extremely conservative husband.”
“This time, Rusev objected to Lana wearing a bikini while standing in their front yard in full view of the neighbors.”
“Lana insisted that she was only trying to get a tan, but Rusev seem to think that Lana was trying to give their male neighbors a great view of her impressive body.”
“While Lana is extremely attractive, I agree with Rusev that Lana should try to respect her husband’s feelings a little more.”
“In order to show Lana how it felt to have your significant others’ body on full display, Rusev mowed their lawn wearing only his underwear.”
“This didn’t phase Lana, however, she even took a picture to post on social media.”
“So, in order to continue to prove his point Rusev showed up to a barbecue completely nude.”
“So, Lana had to finally admit that maybe Rusev had a point and she would try to be more respectful of him when dressing.”


"Watch the end of the season on e next week!"
"Miz and Maryse find that they are looking forward to the end of this episode, and the joy of joining the second group should make total divas perform a lot of plays in the next few seasons."
"It seems that Lana hasn't learned from her experience before this season and continues to act in a way that disturbs her ultra conservative husband."
"This time, Rousseff objected to Lana standing in their front yard in a bikini, in the eyes of the neighbors."
"Lana insists that she just wants to get a tan, but Rousseff seems to think that Lana wants their male neighbors to see her impressive body."
"Although Lana is very attractive, I agree with Rousseff that Lana should respect her husband's feelings as much as possible."
"In order to show Lana how it feels to fully show the bodies of other people who are important to you, Rousseff only wears underwear to trim their lawns."
"It doesn't mean that Lana, however, even took a picture and posted it on social media."
"So, in order to continue to prove his point, Rousseff appeared naked at a barbecue."
"So, Lana finally has to admit that maybe Rousseff has a point. She will try to respect him more when she dresses."



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'”Watch the full clip from The Ellen Show above to see the scares and all of Smith’s comments about his haunted house.”
“I feel like if you talk to it and you’re like, ‘Please, I just need to sleep.”
““And they do.”
“Sometimes at night, I get up and I’m like ‘Leave me alone,'” he said, clapping his hands for emphasis.”
““I have a good relationship with the ghosts.”
“Despite his suspicions, he noted that he doesn’t allow it to affect his sleep schedule.”
“The scares came in the midst of the British pop star discussing his current residence, a house that he believes to be haunted.”
““I was waiting for it to come out of this.” He could hardly finish the second sentence before the box sprung open, sending Smith into the corner of his chair in fright.”
““I thought it was going to come out of this,” he joked, pointing at the box.”
“In between the first and second scares, the “Too Good at Goodbyes” singer noted that he thought a scare was coming from inside the box next to him, which then occurred just moments later.”


"'" watch the full footage of the above Allen Show and see Smith's fright and comments on his haunted house. "
"I think if you talk to it, you'll say, 'please, I just need to sleep.'"
"They did."
"Sometimes at night, when I get up, I think, 'don't bother me,'" he says, clapping his hands
"I have a good relationship with ghosts."
"Despite his doubts, he pointed out that he would not allow it to affect his sleep plan."
"The panic came when the British pop star discussed his current home, which he thought was haunted."
"I'm waiting for it to come out of that sentence." As soon as he finished his second sentence, the box popped open and smith sat down in the corner of his chair
"I thought it would come out of this box," he joked, pointing to the box
Between the first and second threats, the "too good at saying goodbye" singer said he thought someone in the box next to him had scared him, which happened a few minutes later



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It ends with her famous line: “Let’s do the damn thing!”The Bachelorette, Season 14 Premiere, Monday, May 28, 8/7c, ABC”
“— The Bachelorette (@BacheloretteABC) May 1, 2018The 28-year-old rips a heart in two and then dances around in a gold shimmering dress, ready to welcome new suitors.”
“Becca knows what she wants and we’re HERE FOR IT.”
“ABC dropped the promo this morning, and it features Becca throwing a whole lotta shade at ex-fiancé Arie Luyendyk Jr. — who dumped her for runner up Lauren Burnham.”
“Becca Kufrin is back and looking for love in the new teaser trailer for her upcoming season of The Bachelorette.”


The ending is her famous saying: "let's do that damn thing! Singles, Season 14 premiere, Monday, May 28, ABC
"Bachelor (@ Bachelorette ABC) on May 1, 2018, the 28 year old tore her heart in half and danced in a glittering gold dress, ready to meet a new suitor."
"Becca knows what she wants, and we're here."
ABC canceled the promo this morning, in which Becca cast a shadow over her former fiance, Ali luyandick Jr., who abandoned her for runner up Lauren Burnham
"Becca kufrin is back, looking for love in her upcoming singles Trailer."



**Something goes wrong**
“In honor of her 41st birthday, click through for a look back on her best looks, on and off the red carpet.”
“Witherspoon is the company’s best advertisement, frequently pairing her own designs with the likes of Saint Laurent, Christian Louboutin, and Tom Ford for a prim yet modern street style moment.”
“Witherspoon’s brand offers pieces reminiscent of her Southern roots; knee-grazing frocks, off-the shoulder tops, scalloped dresses, printed tunics, all with vibrant color.”
“She has also branched out and incorporated her timeless style into a contemporary women’s clothing line, Draper James.”
“Off-screen, Witherspoon has garnered even more attention for her powerhouse-producing streak and recent venture, Hello Sunshine, which aims to project female-driven stories across multiple digital platforms.”
“...which includes her pinnacle, Oscar-winning work as June Carter in Walk the Line, the self-destructive Cheryl Strayed in Wild, and, most recently, the gleefully short-tempered Madeline Mackenzie on HBO’s Big Little Lies.”
“Since then, Witherspoon has come even more into her own, showing unpredictable ambition through a diversity of roles.”
“Style EvolutionFollowing her role as the unstoppable and irresistible Elle Woods in the Legally Blonde films, Reese Witherspoon, who had previously starred as slightly more sinister characters in Election and Pleasantville, was quickly appointed as America’s newest sweetheart.”


"To commemorate her 41st birthday, please click here to review her best looks on and off the red carpet."
Witherspoon is the company's best advertisement. She often matches her design with people like Saint Laurent, Christian Louboutin and Tom Ford to create a simple and modern street style
"Witherspoon's brand offers clothes reminiscent of her southern roots; knee length dresses, off shoulder tops, fan-shaped dresses, printed tunics, all of which have bright colors."
"She's also extending her timeless style into a contemporary women's collection," said Draper James
"Outside of the screen, Witherspoon has gained more attention with its powerful series production capabilities and the recent venture capital Hello sunshine, whose goal is to project women driven stories on multiple digital platforms."
“…… These include her best work, Joan Carter in the Oscar winning "on the road," self destructive Cheryl lost her way in the wild, and, more recently, Madeleine McKenzie, who was jubilant and grumpy in HBO's "big lie."
"Since then, Witherspoon has been unique, showing unpredictable ambition through various roles."
"The evolution of style after her role as overwhelming, overwhelming al woods in legitimate blonde movies, Reese Witherspoon was quickly named America's newest sweetheart. Previously, she played a slightly sinister role in "election and pleasant valley."



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The new parents are starring together in a home improvement miniseries, Renovation Realities: Dale Jr. & Amy, which is set to premiere on June 2.”
“EARNHARDT JR.:Ready for next phase: Father and TV analystThe couple wed on New Year's Eve 2016.”
“Earnhardt and his wife offered social media updates throughout her pregnancy.”
“The 43-year-old Earnhardt retired after the 2017 NASCAR Cup Series and announced the "Baby Earnhardt" news in October.”
“The best dream ever."”
“It feels like a dream.”
“"@DaleJr and I are officially parents to a beautiful baby girl, Isla Rose Earnhardt.”
“Amy Earnhardt tweeted Tuesday morning.”
“"She’s finally here!"”
“Dale Earnhardt Jr. and his wife, Amy, welcomed their first child, Isla Rose Earnhardt, on Tuesday.”


"The new parents will co star in a family renovation Mini drama" renovating reality: Little Dale and Amy, "which will premiere on June 2
"Little enhardt: get ready for the next phase: father and TV analyst, the couple get married on New Year's Eve 2016."
"Enhart and his wife provided social media updates during pregnancy."
"The 43 year old retired after the Nasca Cup Series in 2017 and announced the news of" enhart baby "in October."
"The best dream ever."
"It feels like a dream."
"@ dalejr and I are officially the parents of a beautiful baby girl, Isla rose Earnhardt."
"Amy enhart tweeted on Tuesday morning."
"Here she comes at last!"
Dale enhart and his wife Amy welcomed their first child, Isla rose enhart, on Tuesday



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...some healing...”
“Then Americans said Eh let us know when you elect one JIMMY FALLON The Bits Worth Watching Two of Samantha Bee s Full Frontal correspondents went to Netroots Nation to take the pulse of a Democratic Party in need of...”
“He reminded viewers that when Republicans tried to pass a health care bill earlier this summer, it was called a “last-ditch” effort — and that the same language is being used now.”
““O.K., no, no.”
“You can’t have another last-ditch effort, O.K.?”
“No.”
“It says ‘last’ right in the name.”
“Jesus didn’t have the Last Supper and then go, ‘You know what, I could actually eat again.”
“Let’s do it, bang bang, I’ll meet you at Chili’s in 20 minutes.’” — TREVOR NOAHStephen Colbert suggested some more metaphorical language.”
““Republicans are trying to repeal and replace Obamacare, again.”


“… Some treatment... "
"And then the Americans said, well, let's know, when you pick out a Jimmy Fallon bit worth seeing, two Samantha bee's positive journalists go to netroots country to take a democratic pulse needed..."
"He reminded the audience that when Republicans tried to pass a health care bill earlier this summer, it was called a" last resort "- and it's using the same language now."
"Well, no, No."
"You can't make the last effort, can you?"
"No
"The name says" last one. "
"Jesus didn't eat the last supper and said," you know, I can really eat more. "
"Let's go, bang bang, I'll see you at Chili's in 20 minutes." Trevor noastfen Colbert suggests more metaphorical language
"Republicans are again trying to repeal and replace Obamacare."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“SO HAPPY EVERYONE WHO SHOULD BE INVOLVED WILL BE!!”
“— Justin Kirkland (@justinkirkland4) June 22, 2018THIS IS EXACTLY WHAT I SAID THEY SHOULD HAVE DONE!!”
““So happy everyone who should be involved will be.”“This is how we should deal with every racist, homophobe, anti-immigrant, conspiracy-spewer, and miscellaneous deplorable: move on without them,” someone else tweeted.”
““This is exactly what I said they should have done,” another Twitter user wrote.”
“But others were excited.”
““So are they just gonna pretend the loudmouth matriarch of the clan just doesn’t exist?”Also Read: Sara Gilbert Talks 'Roseanne' Cancellation on 'The Talk': 'I'm Sad' (Video)“This has to be one of the most shameless moves in TV history,” another user said.”
“This is really stupid,” one Twitter user said after the news broke.”
““Yuck.”
“We are so happy to have the opportunity to return with the cast and crew to continue to share those stories through love and laughter.”Fans, however, were slower to express happiness at the Conner family’s big return.”
““We all came back last season because we wanted to tell stories about the challenges facing a working-class family today.”


"Everyone who should be involved will be happy!"
"- Justin Kirkland (@ justinkirkland4) June 22, 2018 that's what I said they should do!"
"Everyone who should be involved will be happy." "That's how we should deal with every racist, gay, anti immigrant, conspiracy theorist and other regrettable person: move on without them," another tweeted
Another tweeter wrote: "that's exactly what I said they should do."
"But the others are excited."
"So are they going to pretend that the big mouth female head of the family doesn't exist?"? Another user said: "read at the same time: Sara Gilbert talks about the cancellation of" Roseanne "on" the talk ":" I'm sorry "(video)" it must be one of the most shameless acts in the history of television. "
After the news came out, one twitter user said, "this is stupid."
"Disgusting."
"We are very happy to have the opportunity to come back with the cast and the actors and continue to share those stories through love and laughter." However, the fans did not express their joy about the return of the Connors
"Last season we all came back because we wanted to talk about the challenges facing a working class family today."



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Either knock or use the doorbell.”
“'Do not approach me while I'm in the makeup chair unless I ask to speak with you directly.”
“'I could not find a way to walk from the stage to my dressing room, to sit in my makeup chair, to walk from my dressing room to the stage or to just sit and have lunch without somebody just walking in.”
“Harvey explained that for years, he struggled to do anything off-camera without being interrupted.”
“I just didn't want to be in this prison anymore where I had to be in this little room, scared to go out and take a breath of fresh air without somebody approaching me, so I wrote the letter,' he said.”
“'I don't apologize about the letter.”
“...pictured above in 2014 and to make an appointment if they wanted to speak to him On Thursday he defended the email in an interview with Entertainment Tonight...”
“A copy of the memo obtained by media blogger Robert Feder surfaced on Wednesday the day before Harvey s talk show was scheduled to end production in Chicago after five years In the email the 60 year old host told staff not to open the door to his dressing room...”
“The star had until then operated an open-door policy, allowing crew to stop by unannounced.”
“In it, he asked to be left alone while he was preparing for his the Steve Harvey Show on NBC, telling colleagues: 'Do not come to my dressing room unless you are invited'.”


"Knock or ring the doorbell."
"When I'm sitting in a make-up chair, don't come near me unless I ask to talk to you directly."
"I can't find a way to walk from the stage to the dressing room, to sit in a make-up chair, to walk from the dressing room to the stage, or to sit there for lunch without anyone coming in."
"Harvey explained that for many years, he had been trying to do anything outside the camera without being interrupted."
"I just don't want to stay in this prison anymore, I have to stay in this small room, afraid of going out for a breath of fresh air without anyone near me, so I wrote this letter," he said
"I don't apologize for this letter."
“… Pictured above in 2014, if they want to talk to him on Thursday, he will defend the email in an entertainment interview tonight... "
"A copy of a memo obtained by media blogger Robert Feder appeared on Wednesday, the day before Harvey's talk show was scheduled to stop broadcasting in Chicago for five years. The 60 year old host told staff in an email not to open the door of his dressing room..."
"Prior to this, the sky has been implementing an open policy, allowing the crew to stop without notice."
"In this letter, he asked himself not to be disturbed while preparing for NBC's" Steve Harvey show. "He said to colleagues," don't come to my dressing room unless you are invited. "



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Just last week stock for GameStop soared after a group of people on Reddit were able to get the stock price for it to rise significantly and cause a hedge fund worth billions of dollars to go ban Read more Peloton s Cody Rigsby Explains Recent Absence Reveals He s...”
“The 24-year-old social star revealed on the latest episode of his podcast that he invested about $50,000 in GameStop stocks.”
““Yellowfin were chewing today #200# @hook360 @lossuenosresort,” Connor wrote along with the photo.”
“The 26-year-old son of Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman recently took to his Instagram to share a rare photo of himself holding up a huge fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica.”
“...life...”
“Someone who s a very established actor and director in this industry gave me really terrible advice that was helpful because I just Read more Tom Cruise Nicole Kidman s Son Connor Posts Rare Photo of Himself on Instagram Connor Kidman Cruise is giving a rare glimpse into his personal...”
“Now, the 36-year-old actress and director is explaining the policy and opening up about what inspired her to institute it on her movie sets.”
“...no a holes policy that he violated...”
“A few hours earlier Hailey headed Read more Olivia Wilde Explains the No A holes Policy She Instituted on Her Movie Sets You might remember that Olivia Wilde fired Shia LaBeouf from her movie Don t Worry Darling last year and at the time several reports said she has a...”
“Hailey also stayed safe in a black face mask as she arrived at the restaurant.”


"Just last week, a group of people found out on reddit that Gamestop's share price had soared, leading to the ban of a multi billion dollar hedge fund. Read more, peloton's Cody Rigsby explains that his recent absence shows him
"The 24-year-old social star revealed in the latest podcast that he has invested about $50000 in Gamestop stock."
"Today, yellowfin tuna chews 200 hooks at the losunoso resort," Connor wrote in the photo
"Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman's 26 year old son recently shared a rare picture on instagram of him holding a big fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica."
“… Life... "
"A very famous actor and director in this industry gave me very bad advice, which helped me a lot, because I just read more about Tom Cruise's son, Connor, who posted his own rare photos on instagram. Connor Kidman cruise rarely saw him..."
"Now, the 36 year old actress and director is explaining the policy and revealing to the outside world what prompted her to adopt it in her film set."
“… There was no policy he violated... "
"A few hours ago, Haley Hyde read more and Olivia Wilde explained her ban policy on the set. As you may remember, Olivia Wilde fired Shiite rabov from the movie "don't worry, honey" last year, when there were several reports that she had a... "
"When Haley arrived at the restaurant, she was wearing a black mask and was safe."



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 33-year-old reality star -- who is eight months pregnant with her first child -- celebrated Tristan turning 27 on Tuesday by sharing a kissing pic with her Instagram followers that was accompanied by a heartfelt message.”
“In the photo, Khloe is holding the NBA pro's face as she lays a big smooch on him!”
“"To the happiest of birthdays my love!"”
“...she captioned the intimate image.”
“"How special is this thing called life that we share together?!”
“I am so blessed to be creating beautiful monumental memories with such a wonderful man!”
“I hope this year brings you all that you dream of!"”
“She concluded the sweet note: "You will forever be my always!”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The 33 year old reality TV star, who is pregnant with her first child in eight months, celebrated Tristan's 27th Birthday on Tuesday by sharing a photo of her kiss with instagram fans, along with a heartfelt message."
"In the photo, Chloe hugs the NBA professional in the face and gives him a big kiss!"
"Happy birthday, my love!"
“… She made the title for the intimate image. "
"How special is the life we share?"
"I'm so lucky to be able to create immortal memories with such a great person!"
"I hope this year will bring you everything you dream of!"
She ended the sweet note: "you will always be my forever!"



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I hope to kind of revolutionize and kind of rewrite a lot of what people think of when they think of mediums.””
““That’s a big reason behind all of this — I really feel like there are a lot of misconceptions behind mediums and what we do.”
““I totally understand skepticism, and I think it’s so important for me to show validation of my readings,” he explained.”
“Image zoom Credit: Tyler Henry/InstagramHenry previously opened up to PEOPLE about how one of the goals of his television show is to break down some of the misconceptions people have about mediums and the accuracy of their readings.”
“We focus on pretty much everything but readings,” he added.”
““When I go home he doesn’t ask me about readings.”
“But even though the pair met because of one of the 22-year-old’s reading, Henry says he and his boyfriend don’t discuss his work when they’re alone together.”
“...shortly about two weeks the Hollywood Medium star tells People Now adding that because Godwin s grandfather kept coming through repeatedly I took it as a sign to connect with his grandson more and it worked out Get push notifications with news features and more...”
“Tyler Henry says he owes his relationship with his boyfriend Clint Godwin to a very unusual source his boyfriend s dead grandfather Tyler Henry says he owes his relationship with his boyfriend Clint Godwin to a very unusual source Godwin s dead grandfather His grandfather passed before we met very...”


"I hope to completely change people's view of the media to some extent and rewrite many of their views on the media."
"This is an important reason behind all this - I really think there are a lot of misunderstandings behind the media and what we do."
"I fully understand skepticism and I think it's very important for me to prove that my readings are correct," he explained
"Image scaling credit: Tyler Henry / instagram Henry has previously revealed to people that one of the goals of his TV program is to break some misunderstandings about media and reading accuracy."
"We focus on almost everything but reading," he added
"When I came home, he didn't ask me about reading."
"But, although the two met because of a 22-year-old's reading, Henry said he would not discuss his work when he was alone with his boyfriend."
“… About two weeks later, the Hollywood media star told people magazine, and now added, "because Godwin's grandfather keeps coming, I use it as a sign to connect more with his grandson, which solves the problem of getting push notifications and news functions and more..."
"Tyler Henry said that his relationship with his boyfriend Clint Godwin was due to a very unusual source. Tyler Henry said that his relationship with his boyfriend Clint Godwin was due to a very unusual source. His grandfather died before we met. It was very..."



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Getty A source previously told PEOPLE in December that things between Kardashian and Bendjima who were first introduced during a trip to Paris in October 2016 are definitely serious...”
“I think going on a trip once in a while reminds me the importance of being present and in the moment when I m at home and I think it makes me the best mom that I can be Image zoom Kourtney Kardashian and Younes Bendjima Credit Bertrand Rindoff Petroff...”
“Shortly after the pair attended the Voices in Displacement by the Syrian American Medical Society event in Los Angeles on Friday where they held hands on the red carpet the 39 year old Keeping Up with the Kardashians star whisked her boyfriend away on a private plane for a special...”
“...trip...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Oh s— she got me on my way to idknow where,” Bendjima wrote on his Instagram Story, adding that he would turn 25 at midnight.”
“To make the flight more festive, Kardashian celebrated her boyfriend’s big day with balloons and a custom cake, which was decorated with a picture of Bendjima as a young boy.”
“Image zoom Credit: Vivien Killilea/Getty ImagesImage zoom Credit: Kourtney Kardashian/InstagramImage zoom Credit: Kourtney Kardashian/InstagramInstead of immediately revealing where the pair had jetted off to, Kardashian began sharing many photos of the lovebirds enjoying time together in Egypt, where they had previously vacationed together.”
“She also went on to post multiple photos of the pair enjoying the Christmas holiday together and snuggling up together in a variety of locations.”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”


"A Getty source told people in December last year that the affair between Kardashian and benjima was first introduced during their trip to Paris in October 2016, which is absolutely serious..."
"I think the occasional trip reminds me of the importance of being present at home. I think it makes me the best mom. I can be zoom Kourtney Kardashian and younes bendjima credit Bertrand rindoff Petroff..."
"Last Friday, shortly after they attended the voice in displacement event held by the Syrian American Medical Society in Los Angeles, they held hands on the red carpet. Kardashians, 39, flew away with her boyfriend in a private plane for a special event..."
“… Trip... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Benjima wrote on instagram: "Oh, she let me find me on my way there." He also said he would turn 25 at midnight
"To make the flight more festive, Kardashian celebrates her boyfriend's big day with balloons and custom-made cakes decorated with pictures of little boy benjima."
"Credit for image zooming: Vivien killiea / Getty imagesmimage credit for image zooming: Kourtney Kardashian / instagrammiimage credit for image zooming: Kourtney Kardashian / instagrammins in addition to immediately revealing where the two went by plane, Kardashian also began to share many photos of couples spending time together in Egypt, where they used to spend their holidays together."
"She went on to post a number of photos of the two enjoying the Christmas holiday together and cuddling together in different places."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Disney airs Wednesday May 17 at 2 00 p m PT 5 00 p m ET on Radio Disney and the Radio Disney app...”
“It s kind of like bringing Nashville out to LA so that I can be able to work and be able to be in California where I can keep making music but also feel like I m back home too at the same time Miley s full interview with Radio...”
“While celebrating the release of her latest single “Malibu”, the 24-year-old pop star stopped by Radio Disney on Thursday, and she was surprised when the magical folks at the station pulled up some throwback footage of her audition tape for the Disney channel eleven years ago.”
““You all are going to freak out,” Miley said of her audition tape.”
““By the way, my T-shirt says ‘I should have my own TV show.’ That is so funny.”
“That is crazy.”
“That is a jewel.”
“That is a gem.”“The first time I was ever in this building, which I drove to from Nashville with my mom…I had to sign in at the desk right there and tell them, ‘I’m here for an audition,'” Miley remembered.”
“For four seasons, Miley played the titular character on Hannah Montana, an ordinary girl by day and a famous singer by night, from 2006 to 2011.”
““I auditioned with a song that I had written (with a friend of my dad’s) called ‘We’re Going to the Beach.’ And it was about being in Nashville and leaving to go to the beach.”


"Disney will broadcast on Disney radio and Disney radio's app at 2pm EST on Wednesday, May 17..."
"It's a bit like bringing Nashville to Los Angeles so I can work and continue to make music in California, but at the same time I feel like I'm home, and Miley has a full interview with the radio..."
Celebrating the release of her latest single Malibu, the 24-year-old pop star visited Disney radio on Thursday and was surprised when the magicians on the radio pulled up some videos of her audition on Disney Channel 11 years ago
"You're all going to freak out," Miley said of her audition video
"By the way, my T-shirt says, 'I should have my own TV show.' That's interesting. "
"This is crazy."
"It's a gem."
"It's a gem." "I came to this building for the first time, my mother and I drove here from Nashville I had to sign my desk there and tell them, "I'm here for an audition," Miley recalled
"From 2006 to 2011, Miley played a nominal role in Hannah Montana for four seasons, an ordinary girl by day and a famous singer by night."
"I auditioned a song that I (and a friend of my father's) wrote. It's called" we're going to the beach. "It's about being in Nashville and then leaving for the beach."



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:EXCLUSIVE: Rita Ora Dishes on Her Love Life: 'I'm Crispy Dry Right Now'Rita Ora Looks Just Like Jennifer Lopez in Two Bold '70s LooksRita Ora Admits She Has No Idea What She's Singing in That One Part of 'Anywhere' (Exclusive)”
“See more in the video below.”
“Everyone's just really being positive, so it's lovely."”
“"I do really feel that, so I'm so happy that everybody kind of loves the songs.”
“And I just felt like, as humble as I can say this, it's about time," she said.”
“"It's finally been a moment where I can actually just really show off my musical talent with some of the most amazing people that I've met in this journey.”
“Ora is gearing up to release her first album in five years, and recently sat down with ET to discuss what it was like to step back in the studio again -- and reconnect with some of her old friends, like Ed Sheeran.”
“"Something special #ForYou coming in January... #FiftyShadesFreed @liampayne," she captioned the post.”
“The 27-year-old singer first shared a mysterious photo of herself and Payne staring into the camera, before posting a video previewing the music.”
“Rita Ora, who stars in the series as Mia Grey, took to Twitter on Thursday to tease her collab with Liam Payne on a song for the upcoming Fifty Shades Freed.”


"Related content: exclusive: Rita Ola tells about her love life:" I'm so brittle and dry right now. "Rita Ola looks like Jennifer Lopez in two bold '70s poses. Rita Ola admits that she doesn't know what she's singing in the" anywhere "part
"Please see more in the video below."
"Everyone is positive, so it's cute."
"I really feel it, so I'm glad everyone likes these songs."
"I just feel, though I can humbly say it's time," she said
"At this moment, I can finally show my musical talent with some of the best people I've met on my journey."
"Ola is preparing to release her first album in five years, and recently she sat down with ET to discuss how it feels to be back in the studio - to get back in touch with some of her old friends, such as ed Sheeran."
"A special gift for you in January... #She wrote in the title of the post:“ FiftyShadesFreed@liampayne 。”
The 27 year old singer first shared a mysterious picture of her and Penn staring at the camera, and then released a music preview video
Rita Ola, who plays MIA gray in the series, tweeted on Thursday about her collaboration with Liam Penn in the upcoming 50 years of freedom



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Stunt Coordinator Joel Kramer Dropped From Agency After Eliza Dushku AllegationsJamie Lee Curtis Responds to Co-Star Eliza Dushku’s Claims She Was Molested on the Set of ‘True Lies’Eliza Dushku Is Engaged to Boyfriend Peter Palandjian - See the Sweet Announcement!”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 37-year-old actress announced she married businessman Peter Palandjian on Aug. 18 with a sweet Instagram post on Sunday.”
“Dushku shared romantic wedding photos, also revealing her stunning backless wedding dress.”
“Palandjian, 54, is a former professional tennis player from Boston, a Harvard grad and is currently the CEO of Intercontinental Real Estate Corporation.”
“He also has four children from a previous relationship.”
“Dushku also relocated back to Boston after previously living in Los Angeles.”
“Fittingly, the two married in Boston, and participated in the monthly Boston Bike Party after exchanging vows.”
“"♥️♥️ 8.18.18," Dushku captioned the wedding day photos.”
“Dushku and Palandjian have largely kept their relationship private, but the former Buffy the Vampire Slayer star did announce their engagement last June.”


"Embedded code restart" content: stunt coordinator Joel Kramer accused Hami Lee Curtis in Eliza Dushku in response to co star Eliza Dushku's exit from the agency after being molested on the set of true lies. Eliza Dushku is engaged to her boyfriend Peter palangian - see the sweet announcement
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The 37 year old actress announced her marriage to businessman Peter palandjian on August 18 and posted a sweet post on instagram on Sunday."
"Dushku shared romantic wedding photos and revealed her amazing backless wedding dress."
"Palangian, 54, a former Boston professional tennis player, a Harvard graduate, is now CEO of intercontinental real estate."
"He also has four children from his ex-wife."
"After living in Los Angeles, Dushku also moved back to Boston."
"Appropriately, they got married in Boston, exchanged vows and went to a monthly Boston bike party."
“" ♥️♥️  8.18.18, "Dushku made the title for the wedding day photo."
"Dushku and palangian basically maintain a personal relationship, but the former vampire killer bafi did announce his engagement last June."



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Can a Cannon get to space?”FROM COINAGE: See Where 6 Stars Were Before They Were Famous...”
“Some heart surgeons!”
“Joking about what careers he’d rather see his twins end up pursuing, he added, “I want some astronauts!”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“They’re little hams — they see a microphone, they run for it.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
““But they have it.”
““I don’t want my kids to be entertainers,” he said on a segment for PEOPLE Now.”
“!”Cannon co-parents his twins with their mother, Mariah Carey, and he has admitted he wants a life away from the limelight for their little ones.”
“He joked, “FYI My Shotgun is registered!”
“LOL,” the father and current chairman of TeenNick, 36, wrote on Instagram Friday.”


"Can cannons go into space? "From the perspective of coinage: the position of six stars before becoming famous..."
"Some heart surgeons!"
He joked that he would rather see what career his twins ended up in, adding: "I want some astronauts!"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"They're little hams - they see a microphone and they run." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
"But they have."
"I don't want my children to be entertainers," he said in a segment of people now
"! cannon was raised with his twin mother, Maria Carey, and he admitted that he wanted their children to live away from the spotlight
"My shotgun is registered," he joked
"Ha ha," tinik's father and current chairman, 36, wrote on instagram on Friday



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ReplyParentThreadExpandLinkSo random but the other day I was googling celebrities with huge pupils after that Stormy Daniels interview and damn Angelina has huge pupils a lot lmao LSA is obsessedReplyThreadLink...”
“Not as fulfilling to me as health benefits.”
“I'm obsessed with ha lolReplyThreadLinkyeah, i'm super curious abt her as well.”
“!11111111ReplyThreadLinkShe's like the only celeb I wonder about as in like what's her true personality and attitude and things like that.”
“...i thought there were only three of themReplyThreadLinkKnoxReplyParentThreadLinkLmao she has twice that amountEdited at 2018-03-28 11:51 pm (UTC)ReplyParentThreadLinkWILL BRAD & JEN REUNITE THO!!!!!!”
“ReplyThreadLinkwho is that little one?”
“What a weird way they all described him.”
“ReplyThreadLinkNot even that "handsome, older-looking gentleman"?”
“ReplyParentThreadLinkso a woman can't date if she has to remain focused on her children?”
“ReplyParentThreadLinkShe looks blasted to space in that picReplyThreadLinkAnd haggard/tired.”


"It's too casual to reply to parentthreadexpandlinks, but a few days ago, I searched Google for celebrities with huge students after that stormy interview with Daniels. Damn Angelina has many huge students, but lmao LSA is obsessed with replying to threadlinks..."
"It's not as satisfying for me as health benefits."
"I'm crazy about ha loris rydlin. Yeah, I'm super curious about her."
She is the only celebrity I want to know, what is her real personality and attitude, and so on
“… I thought that there were only three reply links more than twice as many as she edited at 11:51 pm on March 28, 2018 (UTC), and Brad and Jen would reunite!! "
"Who's that little guy?"
"It's strange how they describe him."
"Not even the" handsome, older looking gentleman "
If a woman has to focus on her children, then she can't date? "
"Representthreadlink she looks exhausted, haggard / tired in that picture."



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I've never been like that.'”
“Relax it's a dress I bought that is fabric that laces up and looks like a corset!'”
“In North s case social media users were outraged that Kim and Kanye could let their four year old daughter step out of the house wearing such an adult garment...”
“The corset has laces crisscrossing in the front Backlash As photos of North wearing the corset began circulating on Instagram some users slammed the outfit in concerned comments Comments Someone wondered how people could decide to dress babies in corsets while some called the accessory ridiculous on a little girl...”
“Outfit: The four-year-old can be seen in a recent set of photos walking on the street with a corset on top of a peach-colored dress.”
“Doctors, however, have warned against waist trainers and pointed out that they could cause serious damage to internal organs.”
“Kim herself has advertised waist trainers, a type of corset, on social media, and credited them with helping shape her hourglass figure.”
“The clothing cinches a woman's waist to make them look smaller and enhance their bottom.”
“Corsets are designed to sexualize the female body and are often worn by burlesque dancers - and many social media users say the item is inappropriate for a child so young.”
“...daughter in a corset...”


"I've never been like that."
"Don't worry. This is a dress I bought. It's made of lace. It looks like a corset!"
"In the case of North, social media users were angry that Kim and Kanye could let their four-year-old daughter walk out of the house in such an adult dress..."
"This corset has crisscross shoelaces at the front, because photos of North wearing the corset began to spread on instagram. Some users criticized the corset in the following comments. Some people wanted to know how people decided to wear the corset for the baby, while others said it was ridiculous for the little girl..."
"Costumes: in a recent set of photos, a 4-year-old girl can be seen walking down the street in a pink skirt and corset."
However, doctors warned against using the device and pointed out that it could cause serious damage to the internal organs
"Kim himself has also advertised waist trainers (corsets) on social media and believes that they help shape her hourglass like figure."
"It ties women's waists, makes them look smaller and strengthens their hips."
"Corsets are designed to make women's bodies sexy, and funny dancers often wear corsets - which many social media users say are not suitable for such a small child."
“… Daughter in tights... "



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...incident comes just over a year after Kardashian was held at gunpoint during a Paris robbery which led the family to increase security measures as revealed by Kris Jenner...”
“Thanks for signing up to the Independent Culture newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here The...”
“According to E!”
“News, two suspects entered the grounds of their Bel Air mansion early on Friday, with the LA Police Department confirming an attempted motor vehicle theft was made around 5am.”
“The LAPD has confirmed that a witness saw one suspect enter and exit a vehicle before fleeing while a second suspect, who was hiding in some bushes, also fled; the LAPD also stated some personal items were taken from the car.”
“A source has claimed the suspect attempted to flee with a cell phone, but was caught by the property's security team.”
“"Nothing of Kim or Kanye's was taken.”
“Their armed security handled it.”
“The guy didn't even make it past the driveway.”
“He was startled by their security, and dropped the phone he was trying to take," they explained.”


“…… The incident happened more than a year after Kardashian was hijacked with a gun in a robbery in Paris. According to Chris Jenner, the robbery led to the Kardashian family strengthening security measures... "
"Thank you for registering for the independent cultural communication verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors the independent would like to inform you of the offer and update information by e-mail. Please check the box. If you wish to contact, please read our complete mailing list and agree terms here..."
"According to e!"
"It is reported that two suspects entered their bellelle building early Friday, and the Los Angeles Police Department confirmed that there was an attempted car theft around 5 a.m."
"LAPD confirmed that a witness saw a suspect escape from a car while a second suspect was hiding in the bush; LAPD also said that some personal belongings were taken from the car."
"It is reported that the suspect tried to escape with a mobile phone, but was arrested by the property security team."
"Neither Kim nor Kanye's things were taken away."
"Their armed security took care of it."
"That guy didn't even cross the driveway."
"He was startled by their security guard and dropped the call," they explained



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and more...”
“Farahan has also appeared in episodes of the TV series Wendy The Wendy Williams Show The Jeff Probst Show Good Day L A Hello Ross Wonderview In Bed with Joan Bethenny The Millionaire Matchmaker The Real The Dr Oz Show PoliticKING with Larry King The Shahs Come Clean with Nadine...”
“Born in Tehran, Iran in 1973, Reza Farahan moved to the United States as a child and grew up in Beverly Hills.”
“Reza Farahan works in the real estate industry and is known to work hard and party hard.”
“He is a good friend of Mercedes "MJ" Javid.”
“Not only do Reza and MJ frequently party together, they are also co-workers at the Kelly Williams real estate agency.”
“Reza is a very unique individual.”
“Not only is he half Jewish, half Muslim, he is also openly gay.”
“This is an incredibly unique combination within the Persian community.”
“Consequently, Reza has endured a great deal of prejudice throughout his life.”


“… And more... "
"Farrahan also appeared in the TV series Wendy Williams, Jeff Probst, a good day, hello Ross, bed wonder, Millionaire Matchmaker Joan bessney, the real doctor Oz, Larry King's politics and Nadine's innocence..."
"Born in Tehran, Iran in 1973, he moved to the United States as a child and grew up in Beverly Hills."
"Reza Farahan is in the real estate industry and is known for his hard work and hard work."
"He's a good friend of Mercedes, MJ and Javed."
"Not only do Reza and MJ get together a lot, they're colleagues at Kelly Williams real estate."
"Reza is a very unique individual."
"He's not only half Jewish, half Muslim, but openly gay."
"It's an incredibly unique combination in the Persian community."
"So Reza has endured a lot of prejudice all his life."



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Inspire.””
“I love to dance that’s why I brought these,” she added, pointing to her sneakers.”
“Awards red carpet Stranger Things star Millie Bobby Brown is all about comfort...”
“The 13-year-old actress, who is nominated for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Drama Series, wore a high-low sequin pink Calvin Klein 205W39NYC halter dress and Repossi jewelry to the award show, but instead of heels, she opted for crisp white low-top Converse sneakers.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Her reasoning?”
““You got to go for Converse.”
“You gotta dance the night away, win or lose!” Brown told PEOPLE on the red carpet about looking forward to hit the dance floor at the SAG Awards afterparties.Be sure to check out PEOPLE’s full SAG Awards coverage to get the latest news on Hollywood’s big night.”
““You know you gotta keep it stylish,” the actress continued on the E!’s Live from the Red Carpet.”
““It’s fun to go to the parties.”


"Motivation."
"I love dancing, so I brought these," she added, pointing to her sneakers
"Awarding the red carpet stranger thing to star Millie Bob Brown is all about comfort..."
"The 13-year-old actress was nominated as an actress for her outstanding performance in a drama series. She wore a high and low sequined pink Calvin Klein 205w39nyc suspender skirt and repossi jewelry to the awards ceremony, but instead of high heels, she chose the cool white low top converse sneakers."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Her reasoning?"
"You have to go to converse."
"Win or lose, you have to dance all night! Brown told people on the red carpet that he was looking forward to getting on the dance floor at the sag awards ceremony after the party. Be prepared to check out people magazine's full coverage of the sag awards for the latest news on Hollywood nights. "
"You know you have to keep fashion," the actress continued! We live on the red carpet
"It's fun to go to a party."



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Millie Bobby Brown Was Really Into Her Shoes at the MTV Movie & TV AwardsTween Star Millie Bobby Brown’s Chicest Shoe MomentsCelebrity Statement Shoes: July 2017Cara Delevingne Kicks Up Her Designer Boots at ‘Valerian’ Event — and Brought Along Her Dog...”
“Want more?”
“CREDIT: REX ShutterstockKate Spade Piedra heels, $250; katespade.comClick through the gallery to see some of Brown’s chicest shoe moments.”
“Watch on FNMillie Bobby Brown wearing Kate Spade sandals.”
“If you’re wary of stacking colors, Brown might convince you that going bold is the way to go.”
“For more color, she topped the look off with strappy block heels from Kate Spade that retail for $250.”
“Brown, also known as Eleven, wore a bright Victoria Beckham pleated minidress that she layered over a crisp white sleeveless top.”
“Her first stop was Comic-Con in San Diego over the weekend.”
“Now, with the Netflix series’ season 2 right around the corner, the star is wowing us again with her style as she began doing promo for the brand-new episodes.”
“When it comes to style, 13-year-old “Stranger Things” actress Millie Bobby Brown has already turned heads in the fashion industry on the red carpet with her co-stars and recently with her latest campaign for Converse.”


"Millie Bob Brown put on her shoes at the MTV film and Television Awards. Millie Bob Brown's most fashionable shoes fashion manifesto shoes: in July 2017, Carla delaviny put on her famous brand boots at the valerian event - and brought her dog... "
"Want more?"
Credit: Rex Kate Spade high heels, 250 dollars; katespade.com Click through the gallery to enjoy Brown's most fashionable shoe moment. "
"Look at Millie Bobbie brown in Kate Spade sandals."
"If you're cautious about color overlays, Brown may convince you that boldness is the best choice."
"To add color, she topped it with Kate Spade's lace up heels (retail $250)
Brown, also known as "eleven," is wearing a Victoria Beckham pleated miniskirt and a layer on a crisp white sleeveless top
"Her first stop was the weekend comic show in San Diego."
"Now, as the second season of Netflix series approaches, the star starts making promotional films for the new series, and her style makes us Marvel again."
On the fashion front, 13-year-old "strange things" actress Millie Bobby Brown has made her mark on the red carpet with her partners and her latest campaign for converse



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When she returned to the show in season 7, Frankel accused Singer of stealing dresses.”
“From there, it only got worse.”
“Frankel followed up days latter on Twitter implying that it wasn’t Radziwill’s choice, writing, “Bravo has reasons for not asking hwives to return.”
“Image zoom Carole Radziwill and Bethenny Frankel | Credit: Heidi Gutman/BravoIn July, Radziwill announced she was departing the show on her own terms, saying in a statement to PEOPLE that she was “thrilled to leave frenemies behind” and to move on to other projects.”
“But as it aired, Frankel and Radziwill’s friendship fell apart even more — Radziwill even blasting Frankel in a scathing blog post, calling her “self-righteous” and claiming that her “ego” has gotten the best of her.”
“The season ended with Frankel and Radziwill on cordial terms.”
“...were barely speaking to one another...”
“Radziwill called Frankel a liar telling her every time we re together you re kind of aggressive with me and kind of dismissive Frankel disputed that saying that she is accurate in every single detail and Radziwill was condescending By the time their trip to Colombia came around the two...”
“Image zoom Carole Radziwill and Bethenny Frankel | Credit: Paul Cheney/BravoEvery time the two met to address their issues, their anger would intensify.”
“She then got annoyed hearing that Frankel insulted her on-again, off-again boyfriend Adam Kenworthy (whom she called “a bit of an operator”), and started confronting Frankel about talking negatively behind her back.”


"When she came back in season seven, Frankel accused singer of stealing clothes."
"After that, it will only get worse."
Frankel hinted on twitter in the following days that this was not laziwell's choice, writing: "Bravo has reason not to let horvis come back."
Image zooming Carol ratchevel and Bethany Frankel | source: Heidi Gutman / Bravo in July, when ratchevel announced that she would withdraw from the show on her own terms, she told people in a statement that she was "happy to leave her friends behind" and continued to work on other projects
"But in the process of broadcasting, the friendship between Frankel and laziwell broke down even more -- laziwell even criticized Frankel in a severe blog article, calling her" self righteous "and claiming that her" self "had taken the upper hand over her."
"At the end of the season, Frankel and laziwell have a good relationship
“… We hardly speak... "
"Laziwell called Frankel a liar. Every time we were together, you always told her that you were a little aggressive to me. Frankel retorted with disdain that she said she was accurate in every detail, and laziwell had bowed down when they were traveling to Colombia..."
"Zoom in and out Carol lazwell and Bethany Frankel | source: every time Paul Cheney / Bravo meets to solve a problem, their anger intensifies."
When she heard that Frankel insulted her boyfriend Adam Kenworthy again and again (she called him "an operator"), she was very angry and began to confront Frankel, saying that she said something negative behind her back



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“No word on if Justin Timberlake, who is performing during Sunday’s Super Bowl halftime show, has plans for dancers in giant animal costumes to join him on stage.”
“Nobody has to be perfect in life,” he told NPR.”
“And he wants to clear the air.”
“The dancer, who became a viral sensation during Katy Perry’s halftime show three years ago for seemingly botching the choreography, broke his silence to NPR and insisted his performance was intentional.”
““So there’s a set choreography.”
“There’s also what’s called freestyle choreography, or like you get to move around or play your character as a dancer, right?” the dancer, Bryan Gaw, told NPR.”
“Katy Perry performs with her shark dancers during the Super Bowl halftime show in 2015.”
“Rob Carr / Getty Images“I’m in a 7-foot blue shark costume … there’s no cool in that, so what’s the other option?”
“Well I’m gonna play a different character … this is an underdog.”
“It’s an everyday person.”Gaw, who toured with Perry for five years, left the road about a year ago and is now a hair stylist in West Hollywood.”


"There's no word yet on whether Justin Timberlake plans to have dancers in giant animal costumes on stage with him."
"No one has to be perfect in life," he told NPR
"He wanted to clarify the facts."
"The dancer caused a sensation in Katie Perry's half court performance three years ago because of his seemingly poor choreography. He broke his silence on NPR and insisted that his performance was intentional."
"So there's a choreography."
"There's also so-called freestyle dancing, or you can walk around, or play your role as a dancer, right? "Dancer Brian Gao told NPR."
"Katie Perry performed with her shark dancers in the Super Bowl half-time show in 2015."
"Rob Carr / Getty Images" I'm wearing a seven foot blue shark suit There's no sense of cool in it, so what's the alternative? "
"Well, I'm going to play a different role This is a loser. "
"This is an ordinary man." GAW and Perry toured together for five years, left the road about a year ago and are now hairdressers in West Hollywood



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MORE : Hillary Clinton delivers Fire And Fury against Donald Trump in hilarious Grammys skitMORE : Janelle Monae declares ‘women mean business’ in powerful #TimesUp speech at Grammys...”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“Got a showbiz story?”
“The Grammys saw a number of powerful speeches – Janelle Monae spoke out in support of Time’s Up, while Logic supported those affected by suicide and also hit back at Donald Trump’s ‘shithole countries’ comment during his performance of 1-800-273-8255.”
“The ladies provided backing vocals to Kesha as she sang her emotional track Praying, with the singer breaking down in tears at the end of the performance.”
“The former Fifth Harmony member performed alongside Kesha earlier in the night, along with Cyndi Lauper, Bebe Rexha, Julia Michaels, Andra Day and the Resistance Revival Chorus.”
“‘And all I know is that just like dreams, these kids can’t be forgotten and are worth fighting for.’The sweet message was welcomed with applause from the audience, with Beyonce seen clapping Camila’s words.”
“I’m a proud, Cuban-Mexican immigrant, born in eastern Havana, standing in front of you on the Grammy stage in New York City.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisement‘And honestly no part of my journey is any different from theirs.”
“Camila gave a moving speech about her immigrant parents Picture: Kevin Winter/Getty Images for NARAS)‘They showed me what it means to work twice as hard and never give up.”


"More: Hillary Clinton is furious with Donald Trump at the funny Grammy Awards skitMORE:Janelle Monae He delivered a powerful "timesup" speech at the Grammy Awards ceremony, declaring that "women are serious."
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"Is there a story about the show business?"
"There were a lot of influential speeches at the Grammy Awards - Janelle monae publicly supported" it's time, "while logic supported those affected by suicide, and hit back at Donald Trump's" shithole countries "comment on the performance 1-800-273-8255."
"When Kesha sang her touching song" pray ", the ladies provided her with a accompaniment. At the end of the performance, the singer was in tears."
"Former fifth harmonic members performed with Kesha earlier in the evening, Cindy Lauper, beressa, Julia Michaels, Andrea day and the resistance revival chorus."
"What I know is that, like a dream, these children can't be forgotten and are worth fighting for." The sweet words were warmly welcomed by the audience, and Beyonce applauded for Camilla
"I am a proud Cuban Mexican immigrant, born in Eastern Havana, standing in front of you on the New York Grammy stage."
"My journey is no different from theirs."
"Camilla gave a touching talk about her immigrant parents. Pictures: Kevin winter / Getty pictures for nalas." they showed me the meaning of working harder and never giving up. "



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET) on E!”
“They’re having me talk about a fall for some reason.”
“In fact, there were only two people who knew what exactly happened at the time of her death: his grandmother and her husband, his late grandfather, who was accused of her murder.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On Wednesday’s episode of Hollywood Medium With Tyler Henry, Murray, 36, finally got some closure about her death.”
““There’s this feeling that grandpa would’ve said or verbalized something to people before he died and after he died, his words were changed.”
“He’s like, ‘No, I’m not taking accountability for this.”
“This isn’t right.’ There’s something wrong here with the narrative that’s put after,” Tyler Henry, 22, told the One Tree Hill alum.”
““For some reason, they’re having me talk about grandma.”
“I don’t know what this is,” Henry explained.”


"ET) on e!"
"They asked me to say it was a fall for some reason."
"In fact, only two people know what happened when she died: his grandmother and husband, his late grandfather, were accused of murdering her."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"On Wednesday's Hollywood media and Taylor Henry show, Murray, 36, finally ended up dead."
"There is a feeling that grandfather will say something to people before he dies. After he dies, his words will change."
"He said," no, I won't take responsibility for that. "
"It's not right," Tyler Henry, 22, told the dumushan alumni. There's something wrong with the following narrative. "
"For some reason, they let me talk about grandma."
"I don't know what this is," Henry explained



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She added, if you’re tired, it doesn’t matter because when the child wants to play, you just have to either way.”
“AdvertisementAdditionally, Tyra revealed her baby is “the boss” because his demands come front and center.”
“The host of America’s Next Top Model claimed she wants her child to understand what she’s up to whenever she’s away.”
“The former supermodel said, “that’s how we have these things, and we can travel and get on airplanes.”Banks said, despite her hard work and constant traveling, she often brings her son along.”
“...that she wants her child to know what it takes to get what you want out of life.”
“Banks said to E!”
“While speaking with the reporter, she said she is a “hardworking momma” and plans to set an excellent example of what it’s like to be a person with a tremendous work-ethic.”
“Although it isn’t clear if Banks had the same illness as Kim, it’s clear that she must’ve needed the surrogate to have a child.”
“In an episode of Keeping Up With The Kardashians, the reality star revealed that her doctor said another pregnancy would be too much of a risk.”
“Banks, like Kim Kardashian, had her baby via surrogate due to possible complications during surgery.”


"If you're tired, it doesn't matter, she added, because when the child wants to play, you just have to choose either way."
In addition, Tara revealed that her child is the "boss" because his requirements are the most important
The host of "the next top model in America" claimed that she wanted her children to know what they were doing when they were away
"That's how we have these things, we can travel and fly," the former supermodel said Banks said that despite her hard work and frequent business trips, she often takes her son with her
“… She wants her children to know how to get what you want from life
"Banks said to me!"
"In an interview with reporters, she said that she was a" hardworking mother "and planned to set an excellent example to show what a person with extraordinary professional ethics is like."
"It's not clear if banks has the same disease as Kim, but it's clear that she must have a surrogate mother to have a baby."
In keep in touch with the kardashians, the reality TV star revealed that her doctor said the risk of getting pregnant again was too high
"Like Kim Kardashian, banks gave birth through surrogacy due to possible complications during the operation."



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A spokesperson for Marchesa told The Post, “Marchesa is looking forward to presenting their Fall ’18 collection in an updated format this season.””
“Caring for my young children is my first priority and I ask the media for privacy at this time.”As for the upcoming presentation, the brand has little to say.”
““I have chosen to leave my husband.”
““My heart breaks for all the women who have suffered tremendous pain because of these unforgivable actions,” Chapman said in a statement in October.”
“Shortly after the scandal erupted, reports surfaced of Marchesa employees leaving the company, as well as the brand’s collaboration with Helzberg Diamonds being put on hold indefinitely.”
“...but as they got closer, she choked.”It’s been a little over three months since Chapman announced her separation from Weinstein in the wake of dozens of women coming forward with allegations of his sexual abuse.”
“.”
““They were gung ho .”
“She was too scared,” a source told The Post.”


A spokesman for Marchesa told the post, "Marchesa is looking forward to presenting their fall 2018 collection in the latest form this season."
"Taking care of my young children is my top priority, and I ask the media to keep their privacy at this time." As for the upcoming press conference, the brand has nothing to say
"I choose to leave my husband."
"I am heartbroken for all women who have suffered so much from these unforgivable acts," Chapman said in a statement in October
"Shortly after the scandal, reports of the departure of Marchesa employees surfaced, and the brand's partnership with helzberg diamonds was shelved indefinitely."
“…… But as they got closer, she choked, "it's been more than three months since Chapman announced his separation from Weinstein, when dozens of women came forward and accused him of sexual abuse."
“.”
"They are ganghao."
"She was so scared," a source told the post



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s so extraordinary.”RELATED VIDEO: Sarah Jessica Parker’s Riveting Breakdown of 10 Memorable ‘Sex and the City’ Looks — Including the Iconic Tutu...”
“Oh my God, we saw it … it’s so humbling.”
“Parker...”
“The Divorce star shared several clips from her viewing experience on Monday, revealing on Instagram that she was taking in the celestial event from aboard a boat in “beautiful South Carolina.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We are officially eclipse chasers,” she wrote.”
“In another video, Parker, 52, showed off her eclipse glasses as the celestial event began, writing, “The thrills of eclipse chasing!”
“First sighting.”She also advised, “Don’t look without glasses!”As totality occurred, Parker filmed from the boat, showing glimpses of the sky.”
“She gushed excitedly in the clip: “Oh my God, this is the most spectacular light I have ever seen.”
“It doesn’t make any sense!”“It’s happening!”
“You guys, it’s happening!” she squealed.”


"It's extraordinary." Related videos: Sarah Jessica Parker's 10 unforgettable "sex and the city" - including the iconic ballet skirt
"Oh, my God, we see It's too humble. "
"Parker..."
The divorcee star shared several of her viewing experiences on instagram on Monday, when she filmed the sky on a ship in beautiful South Carolina. Get news, feature, etc
"We are officially eclipse chasers," she wrote
In another video, Parker, 52, shows her eclipse glasses, which she wrote: "the thrill of the eclipse!"
"For the first time." She also advises, "don't look without glasses! "When the total eclipse happened, Parker filmed it from the boat, showing a glimpse of the sky."
"Oh, my God," she said excitedly in the clip, "this is the most spectacular light I've ever seen."
"It doesn't make any sense! "It happened!"
"Guys, it's happening! "She screamed."



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We are sorry for the pain caused by this terrible man, and sorry that you weren’t afforded a safe opportunity to pursue your sports dreams.”Image zoom Credit: Carlos Osorio/AP/REX/Shutterstock...”
“...to hold Maroney to her non disclosure agreement which had a penalty for violating its terms...”
“Fund on behalf of the Heroic gymnasts of the USA Gymnastics Team Get push notifications with news features and more...”
“Teigen and Legend’s donation came just days after Judge Rosemarie Aquilina of Michigan’s Ingham County Circuit Court sentenced the 54-year-old to 40 to 175 years in prison for his crimes.”
“Image zoomTeigen has spoken out about the members of the USA women’s gymnastics team before and had previously said she would be “absolutely honored” to pay any fine Maroney would potentially face for breaking an NDA in order to testify at Nassar’s trial.”
“To donate to the Time’s Up Legal Defense Fund, which will provide subsidized legal support to women and men in all industries who have experienced sexual harassment, assault, or abuse in the workplace, visit its GoFundMe page.”
“Learn more about Time’s Up, an organization of women in entertainment combating sexual harassment and inequality, on its website.”
“The entire principle of this should be fought an NDA to stay quiet about this serial monster with over 140 accusers but I would be absolutely honored to pay this fine for you McKayla In a statement obtained by PEOPLE earlier this month USA Gymnastics revealed they had no plans...”
“USA Gymnastics has not sought and will not seek any money from McKayla Maroney for her brave statements made in describing her victimization and abuse by Larry Nassar nor for any victim impact statements she wants to make to Larry Nassar at this hearing or at any subsequent hearings related...”
““We have said it in other contexts, but we have not been direct enough with you.”


"We feel sorry for the pain caused by this terrible man, and we also feel sorry that you didn't get a safe chance to pursue your sports dream."
“…… Maroni is required to abide by her confidentiality agreement, which is punished for violating its terms... "
"The fund receives news features and more push notifications on behalf of the heroic Gymnasts of the US gymnastics team..."
"Just days before tegan and legend donated, Rosemarie Aquilina, a judge at the English Chinese County Circuit Court in Michigan, sentenced the 54 year old man to 40 to 175 years in prison for the crime."
Image zoom Teigen, who has previously spoken publicly about members of the U.S. women's gymnastics team, said she would be "absolutely honored" to pay any fine Maroni might face for breach of confidentiality agreement in order to testify in the Nasar trial
"To donate to the voice of the times legal defense fund, which will provide subsidized legal support to men and women in all industries who suffer from sexual harassment, abuse or abuse in the workplace, visit its gofundme page."
"Please learn more about time's up, an organization of women in the entertainment industry, on its website to combat sexual harassment and inequality."
"The whole principle that this should be a struggle to keep the confidentiality agreement silent, this series of monsters with more than 140 plaintiffs, but I am absolutely honored to pay this fine, you mckeira got in a statement by the people of USA gymnastics earlier this month revealed that they have no plans..."
"The U.S. gymnastics team did not and will not ask for any money from mckeira Maroni because of the brave statements she made when describing the injury and abuse of Larry Nasar to her, and will not make any victim impact statements to Larry Nasar at this hearing or any subsequent hearing related to this..."
"We have said it on other occasions, but we are not direct enough to you."



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch the promo below.”
““What did you do Warren?” Kimmel can be seen yelling at presenter Warren Beatty.”
“At the end of the promo, La La Land producers can be shown stopping their acceptance speech to announce that, in fact, Moonlight had won best picture.”
“Promising “better chills” and “thrills,” the Academy assures that this year’s show will include “bigger moments” and even “better surprises,” taking a moment to poke fun at last year’s best picture flub.”
“Get Out Spider Man Homecoming It and Beauty and the Beast...”
“ABC and the Academy also released the first official promo for the Oscars proclaiming there s no better season than Oscar season Highlighting what s to come for this year s ceremony the ad includes clips from many of this year s successful films such as Baby Driver Wonder Woman...”
“The 2018 ceremony will air live on ABC from the Dolby Theatre at Hollywood & Highland Center, with Jimmy Kimmel reprising his hosting duties.”
“The Oscars preshow will thus start at 6:30 p.m. ET/ 3:30 p.m. PT.”
“ABC and the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences announced Monday that the 90th annual Academy Awards, set for March 4, will start at 8 p.m. ET/ 5 p.m. PT, a half-hour earlier than prior telecasts.”
“And this year, in addition to hopefully avoiding a repeat of last year's memorable best picture flub, the show might even end earlier.”


"Look at the promo below."
"What did you do, Warren? "You can see Kimmel yelling at the host Warren Beatty."
"At the end of the promo, we can see that the producers of La Land stopped their acceptance speech and announced that in fact, moonlight won the best picture award."
The Academy promises "better cold" and "excitement" and guarantees that this year's show will include "bigger moments" and even "better surprises", taking a moment to make fun of last year's best picture flub
"Leave spider man and go home, beauty and beast..."
"ABC and academy also released the first official promotional film of the Oscars, announcing that there is no better season than the Oscars, focusing on the content of this year's awards ceremony. The ad includes clips from many of this year's successful films, such as "wonder woman the baby driver"... "
"The 2018 awards ceremony will be broadcast live at ABC's Dolby theater in Hollywood Highland Center, and Jimmy Kimmel will resume his hosting duties."
"The Oscars ceremony will start at 6:30 p.m. EST / 3:30 p.m. Pacific time."
ABC and the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences announced on Monday that the 90th Academy Awards ceremony, scheduled for March 4, will start at 8:00 p.m. EDT / 5:00 p.m. Pacific time, half an hour ahead of previous TV shows
"And this year, in addition to hoping to avoid repeating last year's unforgettable best picture, the show may even end earlier."



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“There is then a post script that reads:"In case you're searching for a holiday-inspired breakfast, these Pizza Dough Cinnamon Rolls are a fan favorite."”
“According to People, the whole thing has caused fresh outrage about the chef online.”
“In the newsletter, Batali wrote:"As many of you know, this week there has been some news coverage about some of my past behavior.”
“I have made many mistakes and I am so very sorry that I have disappointed my friends, my family, my fans and my team.”
“My behavior was wrong and there are no excuses.”
“I take full responsibility."”
“"Sharing the joys of Italian food, tradition and hospitality with all of you, each week, is an honor and privilege.”
“Without the support of all of you — my fans — I would never have a forum in which to expound on this.”
“I will work every day to regain your respect and trust."”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
Then there was a post that said, "if you're looking for a holiday breakfast, these pizza dough cinnamon rolls are fans' favorites."
"According to people familiar with the matter, the whole incident has caused a new round of anger against the chef on the Internet."
"As many of you know, there are some news reports this week about my past behavior," Batali wrote in the newsletter
"I made a lot of mistakes and I'm sorry to disappoint my friends, family, fans and the team
"My behavior is wrong, there is no excuse."
"I take full responsibility."
"It's an honor and privilege to share Italian food, tradition and hospitality with you every week."
"Without the support of all of you - my fans - I would never have a forum to make that point."
"I will work every day to regain your respect and trust."



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now they’ve left to start their own agency.”
“In an excerpt from his new book, theThe Power Brokers of Beverly Hillson 04th of Feb 2021 Branden and Rayni Williams sold $700 million of real estate for Rick Hilton’s firm in 2019.”
““He’s a Lot of Fun to Be With”: Inside Jeffrey Epstein and Donald Trump’s Epic Bromance(since Jan, 2021) Beginning in the late ’80s, the infamous sex trafficker and the future president (and their mutual friend Ghislaine Maxwell) palled around for almost two decades.”
“Baketivity and more...”
“Explaining her 2017 process to fellow director Olivia Wilde of 13 Valentine s Day date night ideas you can do at home on 04th of Feb 2021 If you re looking for a fun way to celebrate Valentine s Day at home we d recommend these activities from Muse Paintbar...”
“Olivia Wilde and Emerald Fennell on Banning A–holes and ‘Are You Sure?’ From Movie Setson 04th of Feb 2021 Emerald Fennell’s pitch meetings for “Promising Young Woman” were telling, to say the least.”


"Now they're leaving and starting their own agency."
"In his book festival selection, on February 4, 2021, Beverly Hillson's power brokers Branden and rayni Williams sold $700 million of real estate for Rick Hilton's company in 2019."
"It's fun to be with him": in Jeffrey Epstein and Donald Trump's epic "bromance" (since January 2021), which began in the late 1980s, the notorious sex trafficker and the future president (and their common friend, Ghislaine Maxwell) lingered for nearly 20 years
"Baking and more..."
"Explain to Olivia Wilde, who is also a director, the process of 2017, and introduce the idea of 13 Valentine's day night you can do at home on February 4, 2021. If you want to find an interesting way to celebrate Valentine's day at home, we recommend these activities of Muse paintbar..."
"Olivia Wilde and emerald Fennell about banning hole a and 'are you sure? "Starting with the film" busson "on February 4, 2021, the promotion for" promising young women "organized by emerald Fennell is very convincing, to say the least."



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx | Credit: Kevin Mazur/Getty ImagesHowever, when Foxx was asked during the NBA All-Star Celebrity Game in February about shooting hoops with Homes days earlier, he immediately took off his microphone and walked off of the live interview.”
“She also made an appearance at his 50th birthday party in Los Angeles in mid-December 2017.”
“Though the pair have never confirmed their relationship, they’ve been stepping out more often since a photographer captured a rare photo of them together, walking hand-in-hand on a Malibu beach last September.”
“...untrue RELATED VIDEO Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx Celebrate Together in Rare Appearance Ahead of the Grammys Foxx and Holmes were first seen dancing together in the Hamptons in 2013 one year after the actress split from Tom Cruise following six years of marriage...”
“The pair were previously spotted together last month following a report that the couple had been planning a wedding and called it off because they had split due to trust issues However Holmes publicist shot claims of both a wedding and breakup down calling all the various report 100 percent...”
“Foxx also dressed down, opting for a blue sweatshirt and a pair of shorts, which he also paired with sunglasses.”
“Holmes kept things casual for their outing, pairing a billowy white shirt with a matching pair of pants, which she accessorized with a pair of round sunglasses.”
“At one point, the 39-year-old Dawson’s Creek alum even practiced her back-bend skills, getting a little extra support from the Beat Shazam host, 50.”
“In the photographs, the pair were spotted kissing while lounging on a beach towel, as well as cuddling up together in front of a volleyball net.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Image zooming Katie Holmes and Jamie fox | image source: Kevin Matsu / Getty Images hover. When fox was asked to shoot with his family a few days ago at the NBA all star masters in February, he immediately took off his microphone and left the interview."
"In mid December 2017, she also appeared at his 50th birthday party in Los Angeles."
"Although they have never confirmed their relationship, they have walked out more frequently since a photographer took a rare picture of them walking hand in hand on Malibu beach last September."
“… In 2013, Fox and Holmes were first seen dancing together in Hampton. A year ago, the actress and Tom Cruise split up after six years of marriage... "
"Last month, it was reported that they planned to have a wedding, but they broke up because of trust problems, so the wedding was cancelled. However, Sherlock Holmes' public relations staff reported on their wedding and breakup, saying that all the reports were 100%
"Fox is also very low-key, chose a blue sweatshirt and a pair of shorts, he also paired with sunglasses."
Sherlock Holmes always wears casual clothes on outings. She matches a wavy white shirt with a pair of matching trousers and a pair of round sunglasses
"On one occasion, Dawson stream alum, 39, even practiced her back bending technique and got a little extra support from beat Shazam, 50."
In the photo, they are lying on a beach towel, kissing and cuddling in front of a volleyball net
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Our priorities are different now.”
“We have either gotten married and have kids now or are in serious relationships.”
“What was your first reaction when you were approached to do another season of “Jersey Shore?”Snooki: We told MTV we were ready to come back, and with the help of the fans, they brought us our family vacation.”
“Here, the cast of “Jersey Shore” talks to Variety about reuniting, what’s different, and what’s not.”
““As long as the viewers are excited and invested in the ‘Jersey Shore’ cast journey, we’re there,” Diaz says.”
“...which will not take place in Miami and should audiences connect with the cast the same way they did the first time around MTV is open to many more seasons...”
“There are many viewers who are in their late 20s and 30s and juggling all these things but still wanting to have strong relationships with friends and have experiences together and take a vacation and forget about it all Jersey Shore Family Reunion has already been renewed for another season...”
“...family viewers lives have changed dramatically but the desire to have fun is still present...”
“Viewers are looking for something that just reinforces the basic joys of life and family and friendship and the permission to let loose Diaz also says the millennial MTV audience has grown up with the cast and like the Jersey Shore players who are now married and have their own...”
“...of intense newscasts and constant political headlines...”


"We have a different focus now."
"We are either married and have children or we have a good relationship."
"When you were invited to another season of Jersey coast, what was your first reaction? "Snooky: we told MTV we were ready to come back, and with the help of the fans, they took our family on holiday."
"Here, the actors of Jersey coast tell variety about reunion, what's different, what's different."
"As long as the audience is excited and engaged in the journey of Jersey coast's cast, we're there," Diaz said
“… It won't happen in Miami if the audience gets in touch with the actors and the MTV they do for the first time is open to more seasons... "
"There are a lot of people in the audience who are in their 20s and 30s. They are dealing with all these things, but still want to have a strong relationship with their friends, experience together, go on holiday together, and forget all this. Family reunion on the Jersey coast has been renewed for the next season... "
“…… Great changes have taken place in family life, but people still long for happiness... "
"Audiences are looking for something to enhance the basic pleasures of life, family and friendship, and indulgence's permission Diaz also said that the millennial MTV audience grew up with the cast, just like the Jersey coast players, they are now married and have their own..."
“…… Intensive news and constant political headlines... "



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““…that time you think, damn, I’m about to nail this … and then you don’t,” she captioned the video on April 10, adding the hashtags “#inthestudio” and “#whatthehellwasthat.”For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“...making her dream album Clarkson shared a hilarious behind the scenes moment in the recording studio in April in which she hit a wrong note before breaking out into hysterical laughter...”
“It was so adorable that the whole audience turned their head away from Kelly to watch her The insider who noted that Clarkson stopped to take photos with everyone who wanted one added Kelly was gleeful and on the verge of happy tears the whole night as she talked about...”
““River Rose was rocking out to every song,” an eyewitness tells Us Weekly.”
“When she took the stage, Clarkson performed five songs from Meaning of Life as well as her 2004 hit “Walk Away,” while her daughter stole the show.”
“Clarkson celebrated the album with Atlantic Records at NYC’s Rainbow Room on Wednesday, September 6, and was joined by her husband, Brandon Blackstock, and their kids River Rose, 3, and Remington, 16 months.”
“The powerhouse vocalist, who was previously signed with RCA, also surprised fans who pre-ordered her album on iTunes with a second song “Move You” as an instant download.”
“The track is the first single off of her eighth studio album, Meaning of Life, which is her first record since signing with Atlantic Records in June 2016.”
“The singer, 35, released the audio and music video for her new single “Love So Soft,” On Thursday, September 7.”
“Kelly Clarkson is back and stronger than ever.”


On April 10, she tagged the title of the video with "in the studio" and "what's that" and said, "that time you thought, damn, I was going to take care of this And then you don't know. " For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to us weekly's YouTube page
“…… Clarkson, who made her dream album, shared a funny behind the scenes moment in the studio in April. At that moment, she played the wrong sound and burst into hysterical laughter... "
"It's so cute that all the audience turned their heads away from Kelly to see her. The insider noticed that Clarkson stopped to take a picture with everyone who wanted a picture. Kelly was very happy all night and almost cried when she talked about it.... "
"The Rose River swings in every song," a witness told weekly
When Clarkson came on stage, she sang five songs from "the meaning of life" and her 2004 hit song "go away", while her daughter took the lead
Clarkson celebrated the album with Atlantic Records at Rainbow hall in New York on Wednesday, September 6. Her husband, Brandon Blackstock, their 3-year-old river rose and 16-month-old Remington joined in
The pop singer, who signed up with RCA, also surprised fans who had pre purchased her album on iTunes. The second song "moving you" was downloaded as an instant download
"This song is the first single of her eighth studio album the meaning of life, which is her first album since signing with Atlantic Records in June 2016."
The 35 year old singer released audio and music videos for her new single "love is so soft" on Thursday, September 7
"Kelly Clarkson is back, stronger than ever."



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And happier too.””
“I probably should have moved on a couple of years earlier.”
“Subscribe now for the exclusive interview, only in PEOPLE!”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Grey’s Anatomy fans may still be mourning the loss of their beloved Dr. Derek “McDreamy” Shepherd after he was killed off last April, but Patrick Dempsey, the actor who played him for 11 seasons, was ready to move on.”
““I’m very grateful for Grey’s Anatomy,” Dempsey tells PEOPLE exclusively in this week’s issue.”
““It’s given me the opportunity to do everything.”
“But at the same time there was a cost Indeed long hours and an enormous time commitment began to take a toll on the 50 year old actor who also struggled spending so much time away from his wife Jillian...”
“...and their three children Talula 14 and 8 year old twin boys Darby and Sullivan...”
““I think after a certain period of time, no matter how much money you make, you want control out of your own schedule,” says Dempsey, who stars in Bridget Jones’s Baby, out Sept. 16.”


"And happier."
"I should probably have moved a few years earlier."
"Now subscribe to the interview, only in person!"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Fans of Gray's anatomy may still be celebrating their beloved Dr. Derek Shepard（ Dr.Derek "Mcdreamy" shepherd mourned his death after he was killed last April, but actor Patrick Dempsey, who played him for 11 seasons, is ready to move on
"I really appreciate Gray's anatomy," Dempsey told people in this week's special issue
"It gives me a chance to do anything."
"But at the same time, it's really a long-term price. The huge time investment starts to make the 50 year old actor pay the price, and it's hard for him to spend so much time leaving his wife Jillian..."
“… And their three children tarula, 14, and 8-year-old twin boys Darby and Sullivan
"I think after a while, no matter how much money you make, you want to control your schedule," said Dempsey, who starred in Bridget Jones' baby on September 16



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I kept getting up.””
“But one thing I am proud of is: I did not let those mistakes define who I am.”
“The mistakes I’ve made are loud and clear.”
“If you think about that arc, that tells you a hell of a story, right?”
“I had two hip surgeries, two knee surgeries, and a doping-scandal.”
“I hadn’t played in two years.”
“My best two years happened at 19 and as a broken-down 40-year-old.”
“We appreciate being a mother and father, and we’re so similar; we’re both workaholics.”Advertisement“I left it all on the field.”
“When talking about his relationship, he said, “We both appreciate where we are in our lives.”
“And not only that but as you all know by now, Alex has been dating Jennifer Lopez for awhile.”


"I've been getting up."
"But one thing I'm proud of: I didn't let those mistakes define who I am."
"My mistakes are loud and clear."
"If you think about the arc, it will tell you a terrible story, right?"
"I had two hip surgeries, two knee surgeries, and a doping scandal."
"I haven't played for two years."
"My best two years happened at the age of 19, as a collapsing 40."
"We appreciate being parents, and we're very similar; we're all workaholics." The ad "I left everything on the spot."
When it comes to his relationship, he said, "we all appreciate our lives."
"Not only that, you know, Alex and Jennifer Lopez have been dating for a while."



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"We've been offered $6 million for 18 seconds of one Nirvana song and I turned it down."”
“"I've protected it [the Nirvana catalogue] from everything from Kentucky Fried Chicken commercials to movies about board games," Love told the paper, as reported by UsWeekly.”
“In the meantime, Love says she is preserving the Nirvana song catalog from becoming too commercial or cheesy.”
“"When she's 40, she becomes a member of the board and she has a vote, but not now."”
“"There's this myth out there — put out by Frances' lawyers — that Frances runs the catalogue, which is absolute nonsense," Love revealed.”
“Katy Winn/Getty ImagesLove, who is estranged from her daughter Frances Bean, also sets straight rumors that the 21-year-old has executive control over the Nirvana brand.”
“Love's daughter, Frances Bean, will become a member of the board that controls Nirvana's catalogue when she turns 40.”
“Love says that the majority of lost millions went towards settling several lawsuits over the years, including a legal battle between Love and the surviving members of Nirvana over the band's unreleased material and a Twitter defamation suit.”
“I make enough to live on, I'm financially solvent, I focus on what I make now."”
“"It's rock 'n roll, it's Nirvana money, I had to let it go.”


"For 18 seconds of a Nirvana song, we got an offer of $6 million, and I refused."
"From Kentucky Fried Chicken ads to movies about board games, I've protected it (Nirvana catalog)," rove told us weekly
"At the same time, AI says she's keeping a catalog of Nirvana songs to avoid becoming too commercial or tacky."
"When she was 40, she became a member of the board, she had the right to vote, but not now."
"There's such a myth - put forward by Francis's lawyer - that Francis runs the catalog, which is absolutely bullshit," love revealed
"Katy Winn / Getty Images love, who is estranged from her daughter, Frances bean, also said frankly that the 21-year-old has executive control of nirvana."
"Love's daughter, Francis bean, will be on the board of directors who control Nirvana at the age of 40."
"Most of the millions of people lost over the years, lov said, were to settle several lawsuits, including legal proceedings between lov and the surviving members of Nirvana over the band's unpublished materials, as well as twitter libel lawsuits."
"I make enough money to make a living, I'm financially solvent, and I'm focused on what I'm making now."
"It's rock music, it's nirvana money, I have to let go."



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Moving forward, the reality star-turned-interior designer says she hasn’t been dating much and is “just chilling.” However, a source told us last month she’s actually “dating tons of people.””
““I don’t take the pictures down, I’m not that kind of person,” she said.”
“...proof isn t going anywhere...”
“I want people to know that it wasn t just all of this scandalous talk in the papers When asked if she ll be deleting the evidence of her time with D Agastino on social media the Countess says the...”
““People don’t get to see that part, there was love, there was as good times,” the mom of two said.”
“...capture their romantic side during their short lived marriage which was her second and his first...”
“It was a beautiful wedding it was his birthday it was one hell of a party and it was New Year s Eve so I don t regret it The reality star also maintains that the cameras didn t fully...”
“...courtship but nonetheless tied the knot in a glamorous wedding...”
“He just couldn t give up his bachelor kind of lifestyle The former couple whose love story became a dramatic plot line on The Real Housewives of New York City faced rampant rumors of infidelity on his part during their...”
““I know he loved me, that’s not the issue.”


The reality TV turned interior designer said she's been dating only a few times recently and it's "chilling.". However, a source told us last month that she was actually "dating a lot of people."
"I don't take pictures, I'm not that kind of person," she said
“… The evidence doesn't work... "
"I want people to know that when asked if they would delete the evidence that she was with agastino on social media, it wasn't just the slander in the newspapers that the countess said..."
The mother of two said, "people don't see that part. There's love and good times."
“… It was her second and his first time to capture their romantic side in their short marriage. "
"It's a beautiful wedding, it's his birthday, it's a hellish party, it's new year's Eve, so I don't regret it. The reality TV star still insists that the camera is not enough..."
“…… Courtship, but in a charming wedding formed an indissoluble bond.... "
"He just can't give up his single life style. The love story of the former couple has become a dramatic plot of New York City's" real housewife ". In their marriage, he is faced with rumors of infidelity..."
"I know he loves me, that's not the problem."



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I fell in love with the song too and listened to it on repeat.””
“Happy Father’s Day daddy, nothing compares to you.”Chris Cornell, lead singer of Soundgarden and Audioslave, died in May 2017 after a performance in Detroit.”
“Toni Cornell, 13, shared a video featuring her and father singing “Nothing Compares 2 U” which was made famous after Sinéad O’Connor covered it.”
“The teen posted it on Cornell’s YouTube page with a note that read “I love you and miss you so much.”
“You were the best father anyone could ask for.”“Our relationship was so special, and you were always there for me.”
“You gave me courage when I didn’t have any,” she wrote.”
““You believed in me when I didn’t.”
“I miss your love everyday.”Cornell ended the note writing “Recording this song with you was a special and amazing experience I wish I could repeat 100 times over and I know you would too.”
“The coroner ruled his death suicide by hanging.”
“It got me really mad,’ you said,” she wrote.”


"I fell in love with the song, too, and listened to it in repetition."
"Happy father's day, Dad. There's nothing like you." Chris Cornell, lead singer of Soundgarden and Audioslave, died in May 2017 after a performance in Detroit
13-year-old Tony Cornell shared a video in which she and her father sang "unparalleled 2U," a song that became famous after sin é ad O'Connor reported
The teenager posted a note on Cornell University's YouTube website that said, "I love you and miss you so much."
"You are the best father anyone can ask for." "Our relationship is very special. You are always by my side."
"When I didn't have courage, you gave me courage," she wrote
"I don't believe you, but you believe me."
"I miss your love every day." Cornell wrote at the end: "it's a special and wonderful experience to record this song with you. I hope I can repeat it 100 times. I know you will, too."
"The coroner ruled that his death was suicide by hanging."
"It makes me angry," you said, "she wrote."



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo by Matt HarringtonDorinda Medley is a paid HomeGoods partner.”
“Photo by Matt Harrington Photo by Matt Harrington Photo by Matt Harrington Tip 2 Create a Faux Mantle At my NYC apartment I don t have a fireplace so each year I like to create a faux mantle in my living room where I ll hang stockings and decorate with...”
“As a mom and member of Bravo’s Real Housewives of NYC cast, I love any reason to celebrate!”
“I can’t help but jump right into holiday decorating and what better way to do that then to get some new holiday décor inspiration?”
“You know what that means… time to go shopping!”
“My decorations go-to: HomeGoods, of course!”
“For me, holiday décor needs to evoke feelings of “old Christmas” and memories of days gone by.”
“I love traditional, colorful and old fashion pieces – the more color, the better I like it!”
“The holidays in New York City (and the Berkshires!)”
“...are my absolute favorite time of year.”
“Photo by Matt Harrington Photo by Matt Harrington Photo by Matt Harrington Tip 2 Create a Faux Mantle At my NYC apartment I don t have a fireplace so each year I like to create a faux mantle in my...”


"Matt Harrington Dorinda Medley is a paid home products partner."
"Matt Harrington photo Matt Harrington photo Matt Harrington tip 2 make an artificial Cape in my New York apartment. I don't have a fireplace, so every year I like to make an artificial Cape in my living room, where I hang stockings and decorations..."
"As a mother and a member of Bravo's New York housewives crew, I love any reason to celebrate!"
"I can't help jumping into holiday decoration, what better way to get some new holiday decoration inspiration?"
"You know what that means It's time to go shopping! "
"My decorations are: household goods, of course!"
"For me, holiday decorations need to evoke the 'old Christmas' feeling and memories of the past."
"I like traditional, colorful and old fashion - the more colors, the more I like it!"
"Holidays in New York City (and Berkshire)"
“… It's my favorite time of the year. "
"Matt Harrington photography Matt Harrington photography Matt Harrington tips 2 create an apartment in my New York, I don't have a fireplace, so every year I like to create one of my artificial mantle..."



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Foxx celebrated his big day at Los Angeles Paramount Studios on Wednesday where he was not only joined by Holmes but also A list friends like Leonardo DiCaprio Snoop Dogg Tobey Maguire and Foxx s The Jamie Foxx Show co star Garcelle Beauvais as well as his daughters 23 year...”
“...old Corinne and 8 year old Annalise...”
“Splash NewsSplash NewsThough Foxx and Holmes are rarely spotted together, the two weren't shy inside the party.”
“At one point, the birthday boy could be seen touching the actress' left arm as they leaned in close to talk.”
“Holmes had a huge grin on her face and was laughing at something he said during their chat.”
“An eyewitness tells ET that, inside the soiree, Foxx and Holmes "seemed besotted" with each other.”
“"Jamie kept beckoning for Katie to come up to the stage but she didn’t want to,” the eyewitness said.”
““They were so cute!”Splash NewsFoxx performed for the crowd, as did Snoop, Ice Cube and Ludacris.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Fox celebrated his big day at Paramount Studios in Los Angeles on Wednesday, where he had not only Sherlock Holmes, but also Leonardo DiCaprio Snoop Dogg Toby Maguire, the co star of fox's Jamie fox show, and his 23-year-old daughter..."
“… Old Colin and 8-year-old annalis... "
Although Fox and Holmes seldom get together, they are not shy at parties
"Once, you could see the birthday boy caressing the actress's left arm. They leaned together and talked up close."
"Sherlock Holmes grinned, and she began to laugh at what he said while they were talking."
A witness told et that at the party, Fox and Holmes "seemed to be fascinated by each other"
"Jamie kept waving Katie on stage, but she didn't want to," the witness said
"They are so lovely! Splash newsfox performs for the audience, as do snoop, ice cube and Ludacris



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Proof Jason Aldean's Baby Is Cooler Than Us...”
“They revealed the name they'd chosen for their first son when they shared pictures of his nursery online, and they have chronicled his childhood extensively via social media, sharing personal glimpses and special moments on a weekly, sometimes daily basis.”
“The couple turned to Instagram when they revealed they were expecting their first child together in May of 2017, and they subsequently announced the baby was a boy just a few weeks later.”
“These Country Singers Have All Welcomed Babies in 2018:Fans can probably look forward to Aldean and Brittany sharing quite a bit of her second pregnancy with fans.”
“I have two older daughters and there's a pretty big age difference in my two older daughters and Memphis, so we wanted to have one who's a little closer in age to him so he has somebody to hang out with."”
“"We both agreed that we wanted to have two.”
“"Our theory is, 'Hey, we got one in diapers and formula right now so, while we're in this mindset we might as well knock it out,'" Aldean told Taste of Country Nights in April.”
“Aldean has two older daughters, Keeley and Kendyl, from his first marriage, and he made no secret of the fact that he and Brittany planned to have another child as soon as possible after he and Brittany welcomed Memphis on Dec. 1, 2017.”
“In the picture, Memphis is lounging in a onesie that reads: Big Brother.”
“The country star and his wife, Brittany, announced the news via Instagram on July 10 with a photo of his 7-month-old son.”


"To prove that Jason Alden's children are cooler than us..."
"When they share their first son's parenting photos online, they reveal the name they chose for their first son, record his childhood extensively through social media, and share personal glimpses and special moments every week (sometimes every day),"
"When the couple revealed in May 2017 that they were going to have their first child together, they turned to instagram, and a few weeks later they announced that the child was a boy."
"All of these country singers have a baby in 2018: fans may expect aldian and Brittany to share with their fans a lot about her second pregnancy."
"I have two eldest daughters. My two eldest daughters are very different in age from Memphis, so we want to have one closer to his age so that he can have someone to go out with."
"We all agreed to two."
"Our theory is, 'Hey, we now have one in diapers and formula, so when we're in this mindset, we might as well get rid of it,'" aldian told country night in April
"Alden has two eldest daughters, Kiley and Kendall, since his first marriage. He has no secret. After he and Brittany welcome Memphis on December 1, 2017, they plan to have another child as soon as possible."
"In this picture, Memphis lies lazily on a list that says" big brother. "
The country star and his wife Brittany announced the news through instagram on July 10, with photos of his seven month old son attached



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tags : 15 Central Park West, 220 central park south, sting, trudie stylerNeighborhoods : Upper West Side...”
“[Via NYP][Listing: 15 Central Park West PH16/17B by Suzun J Bennet for Sotheby’s and 15 Central Park West PH16/16B by Deborah Kern of the Corcoran Group]RELATED:Images courtesy of The Corcoran Group.”
“Other famous residents of the “limestone Jesus” have included Robert De Niro, Denzel Washington, Bob Costas, Goldman CEO Lloyd Blankfein, Alex Rodriguez and and a gaggle of hedge fund bigs.”
“In addition to those incredible views, residents at 15 Central Park West have access to spectacular amenities like a landscaped motor court, parking garage, 14,000-square-foot fitness center, skylit lap pool, sauna, screening room, private restaurant, wine rooms, a library, children’s playroom and an outdoor terrace.”
“Here’s a look at the 400-square-foot terrace, usable in all seasons thanks to heaters and a canopy.”
“The ensuite bath includes his-and-her dressing rooms, double spa baths and a sauna.”
“On the second level, accessible by a separate elevator entrance, there’s a luxurious master bedroom with breathtaking Central Park views.”
“Across the living space is a stylishly-appointed chef’s kitchen–equipped with two refrigerators, four ovens and three dishwashers–and one of the spiral staircases; adjacent is the dining room.”
“The aforementioned fireplace divides the living room from the sitting room, which has built-in bookshelves, with more shelves nearby in the library.”
“The rockstar-worthy residence offers 5,400 square feet of interior space, four bedrooms and 44 feet of frontage along Central Park.”


"Label: 15 Central Park West, 220 Central Park South, sting, Trudie Styler neighbors: Upper West..."
"[through New York City] [listing: suzu J Bennet's Central Park West 15 16 / 17b, corcorcoran group's Deborah Kern's Central Park West 15 16 / 16b] related: image of corcorcoran group."
Other prominent residents of limestone Jesus include Robert De Niro, Denzel Washington, Bob Costas, Lloyd Blankfein, chief executive of Goldman Sachs, Alex Rodriguez and a group of hedge fund bosses
"In addition to these incredible views, residents of Central Park West 15 can enjoy spectacular amenities such as a beautiful car park, parking garage, 14000 square foot fitness center, skylight swimming pool, sauna, projection room, private restaurant, wine room, library, children's play room and outdoor terrace."
"This is a 400 square foot terrace, which can be used all the year round due to the heating and ceiling."
The suite bathroom includes his and her dressing room, double spa and sauna
"On the second floor, there is a separate elevator entrance and a luxurious master bedroom with an amazing view of Central Park."
Opposite the living room is a chic chef's kitchen with two refrigerators, four ovens, three dishwashers and a spiral staircase; next to the dining room
"The fireplace mentioned above separates the living room from the living room. The living room has built-in bookshelves, and there are more bookshelves near the library."
"Rockstar worth house offers 5400 square feet of interior space, four bedrooms and 44 feet of Central Park frontage."



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...pic.twitter.com/Kp92OzqPEM — Ellen DeGeneres (@TheEllenShow) January 11, 2018(Via Ellen on YouTube)”
““Today I need you because there’s a lot going on in my life right now.”Our community of Montecito has been through a lot.”
““This room is always filled with positivity and love and today I really need it,” she began.”
“The host grows quite upset while revealing how she and wife Portia DeRossi had returned on December 27 from fire evacuations, only to be ordered to evacuate again on Sunday.”
“In the below clip, Ellen uses her monologue to explain how much she loves Montecito.”
“...even though her home won t have water or gas service until further notice...”
“All of my neighbors homes are gutted The neighbors out back their houses are gone Oprah continued commenting upon how she shares a fence with Ellen and how several nearby homes are simply gutted Fortunately for Winfrey her house is located on a knoll so she feels safe for now...”
“It took awhile for reality to set in for Winfrey the next morning:“I’m looking out the front window, I think everything’s fine, everything’s fine — and it wasn’t until I put my boots on walking and I realized everything … wasn’t fine at all.”
“She commented on how the sky looked red — “I didn’t know at the time that there were some gas fires, something exploded” — and then the mudslides began.”
“Winfrey also brought some firefighters, who received an enormous round of applause, on camera while telling Ellen that she’s not fleeing Montecito because she wants to do whatever possible to help her community.”


“... pic.twitter.com/Kp92OzqPEM -Ellen DeGeneres (@ the EllenShow) January 11, 2018 (via Ellen on YouTube)
"I need you today because I have a lot to do in my life now." Our Montecito community has gone through a lot
"This room is always full of positivity and love, and today I really need it," she began
"The host became very upset when she revealed how she and his wife Portia derossi returned from a fire evacuation on December 27, but was ordered to evacuate again on Sunday."
"In the following clip, Ellen uses her monologue to explain how much she loves Montecito."
“… There will be no water or gas service in her home until further notice... "
"All of my neighbors' houses have been hollowed out, and all of them have disappeared. Oprah continues to comment on how she shares a fence with Allen and how several nearby houses have been hollowed out. Fortunately, Winfrey's house is located on a hill, so she feels safe now..."
The next morning, reality finally came to Winfrey: "I looked out the window and I thought everything was fine, everything was fine - I didn't realize it until I put on my boots and walked It's not good at all. "
"She commented on how red the sky looked -" I didn't know there was a gas fire, something exploded "- and then the debris flow started."
"Winfrey also brought some firefighters, who received warm applause under the camera, and told Ellen that she didn't escape Montecito because she wanted to do everything possible to help her community."



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““How was this week?” Deb Dailey, president of the EMS Training Center of Southern Nevada and the group’s leader, asked four attendees who had gathered on an August evening.”
“Mental health servicesOn Wednesday evenings, Stoney’s Rockin’ Country is silent save for the grumble of ceiling fans and the “how are you’s” of a hodgepodge of Route 91 shooting survivors.”
“Benjamin Hager Las Vegas Review-Journal @benjaminhphotoKristine Schalk reads a diagram addressing self care during a local Route 91 survivors support group on Wednesday, Sept. 26, 2018, at Stoney's Rockin' Country, in Las Vegas.”
“Benjamin Hager Las Vegas Review-Journal @benjaminhphotoDeb Dailey, left, president of the EMS Training Center of Southern Nevada, shares a moment with Chris Philippsen during a local Route 91 survivors support group on Wednesday, Sept. 26, 2018, at Stoney's Rockin' Country, in Las Vegas.”
“Benjamin Hager Las Vegas Review-Journal @benjaminhphotoDeb Dailey, left, president of the EMS Training Center of Southern Nevada, and Chris Philippsen discuss the steps of healing at a local Route 91 survivors support group on Wednesday, Sept. 26, 2018, at Stoney's Rockin' Country, in Las Vegas.”
“...s Rockin Country in Las Vegas...”
“Benjamin Hager Las Vegas Review Journal benjaminhphoto Deb Dailey left president of the EMS Training Center of Southern Nevada Chris Philippsen and Kristine Schalk discuss their anxieties leading up to the anniversary of October 1 during a local Route 91 survivors support group on Wednesday Sept 26 2018 at Stoney...”
“Benjamin Hager Las Vegas Review-Journal @benjaminhphotoYvette Archuleta talks about her lingering anxiety leading up to the anniversary of Oct 1 during a local Route 91 survivors support group on Wednesday, Sept. 26, 2018, at Stoney's Rockin' Country, in Las Vegas.”


"How about this week? Deb Dailey, chairman of the EMS training center in Southern Nevada and head of the organization, asked four participants who met in August evening
On Wednesday night, in addition to the complaints of ceiling fans and the "hello" of the survivors of the highway 91 shooting, stoney's hometown of rock music was silent
"Benjamin Hager Las Vegas Review Magazine @ Benjamin Hager Las Vegas Review Journal @ read a chart about self-care at a local road 91 survivor support group in stoney's rocking'country, Las Vegas on Wednesday, September 26, 2018."
"Benjamin Hager Las Vegas Review Magazine @ Benjamin Daley, left, President of EMS training center in Southern Nevada, shares a moment with Chris Phillipson at the local highway 91 survivors support group in stoney Rock Town, Las Vegas, Wednesday, September 26, 2018."
"Benjamin Hager, Las Vegas Review Magazine @ Benjamin Daley, left, President of EMS training center in Southern Nevada, and Chris Phillipson discussed the rehabilitation steps of the local highway 91 survivors support group in stoney rock village, Las Vegas on September 26, 2018 (Wednesday)
“… Las Vegas rock country... "
"Benjamin Hager Las Vegas Review Journal Benjamin photos DEB Dailey leaves Southern Nevada Schalk) at the local highway 91 survivors support group, which held a meeting on September 26, 2018, to discuss the anxiety before the anniversary on October 1
"Benjamin Hager's Las Vegas Review Magazine @ Benjamin hotoyvette Archuleta talked about her lingering anxiety ahead of the October 1 anniversary at a meeting of the local road 91 survivors support group in stoney's rocking'country, Las Vegas, on Wednesday, September 26, 2018."



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Scroll down for 27 of her must-haves.”
“So for our February issue, we asked our cover star to spill on all of her favorite things, from fashion and food to travel and pop culture.”
“We can't get enough of the self-proclaimed beauty junkie's top picks across the board, makeup and otherwise.”
“Seriously, for anyone looking to test out a new face mask, Barrymore's Instagram feed is the gift that keeps on giving.”
“Of course, we also admire (and appreciate) the fact that she's willing to share her endless supply of tried-and-true skincare recommendations with the masses.”
“She's just living her best life, and we can't help but admire each and every step she takes.”
“...carpet...”
“After growing up in Hollywood Barrymore isn t fazed by glitz and glamour and these days you d have better luck spotting her on a weekend hike with daughters Olive 5 and Frankie 3 than you would on the red...”
“The 42-year-old Santa Clarita Diet star and Flower Beauty founder constantly keeps it real, whether she's sharing her favorite beauty products on Instagram or rocking sweats in the airport.”
“She's spent three-plus decades in the spotlight, but you'd be hard-pressed to find a celebrity who's any more down-to-earth than Drew Barrymore.”


"Scroll down to see the 27 she must have."
"So in our February magazine, we asked the cover star to introduce her favorite things, from fashion and food to tourism and pop culture."
"We can't satisfy ourselves whether it's make-up or other aspects to regard ourselves as the first choice of beauty addicts."
"To tell you the truth, for anyone who wants to try a new mask, Barrymore's Instagram feed is a gift that is constantly presented."
"Of course, we also admire (and appreciate) her willingness to share her constant stream of proven skin care advice with the public."
"She's just living the best life, and we can't help admiring every step she's taken."
“… Carpet... "
"Growing up in Hollywood, Barrymore wasn't bothered by flashiness and glamour. Now you'll be more lucky to find her hiking on weekends with her daughters olive 5 and Frankie 3 instead of on the red..."
"The 42 year old Santa Clarita dieting star and founder of Huamei has always been true, whether she's sharing her favorite beauty products on instagram or sweating at the airport."
"She's been in the spotlight for more than 30 years, but it's hard to find a more down-to-earth celebrity than Drew Barrymore."



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"They would like to thank his fans for their continuous love and loyalty and ask that their privacy be respected at this time."”
“As for Cornell's wife, part of her statement reads,We discussed plans for a vacation over Memorial Day and other things we wanted to do.”
“It was then reported Thursday by the Associated Press that the medical examiner determined Cornell committed suicide by hanging.”
“As of that afternoon, the Wayne County Medical Examiner's Office had not yet performed a full autopsy report, E!”
“News reported.”
“However, Chris Cornell's family believes his suicide may have been an accident, as revealed in two separate statements; one from Kirk Pasich, the family's attorney, and one from Cornell's wife, Vicky Cornell, released to E!”
“News Friday.”
“Pasich's statement reads:Without the results of toxicology tests, we do not know what was going on with Chris — or if any substances contributed to his demise.”
“Chris, a recovering addict, had a prescription for Ativan and may have taken more Ativan than recommended dosages.”
“The family believes that if Chris took his life, he did not know what he was doing, and that drugs or other substances may have affected his actions.”


"They want to thank his fans for their continued love and loyalty and demand respect for their privacy at this time."
"As for Cornell's wife, part of her statement said we discussed plans for memorial day leave and other things we wanted to do."
"Then the Associated Press reported on Thursday that the coroner determined that Cornell had hanged himself."
"As of the afternoon of that day, the Wayne County forensic office had not conducted a complete autopsy report, e!"
"News coverage."
"However, Chris Cornell's family believes that his suicide may have been an accident, as revealed in two separate statements; one from family lawyer Kirk pasich and the other from his wife Vicky Cornell, who was released to e!"
"Friday news."
"PASiC's statement read: without the results of toxicological tests, we don't know what happened to Chris, and we don't know if any substance caused his death."
"Chris is a recovering addict who has a prescription for avermectin and may have taken more than the recommended dose of avermectin."
"The family thought that if Chris committed suicide, he didn't know what he was doing, and drugs or other substances might have affected his behavior."



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s a long story… but I never was raped, and I never was harmed, and I don’t know how I got out of that hotel room.”She added, “It always starts with, ‘I’m a healer, I want to massage you.’ I sort of squirmed my way out.””
““I got out of there unscathed.”
““He made sure that I saw his gun, which I had never seen a gun in real life,” Margulies said in an interview Friday on SiriusXM.”
““The Good Wife” actress Julianna Margulies recalled when she “squirmed” her way out of being alone with Seagal in a hotel room.”
“De Rossi is the second actress to accuse Seagal of inappropriate behavior in the last week.”
“Ellen DeGeneres, de Rossi’s wife of nine years, tweeted she was “proud of” her wife for opening up about the alleged encounter.”
“Unfazed, she replied, ‘Well, I didn’t know if he was your type,’” she said.”
““I ran out and called my agent.”
“He told me how important it was to have chemistry off-screen as he sat me down and unzipped his leather pants,” she recalled.”
““My final audition for a Steven Segal [sic] movie took place in his office.”


"It's a long story But I've never been raped, I've never been hurt, and I don't know how I got out of that hotel room. " She added, "it always starts with 'I'm a therapist, I want to give you a massage.'. I'm creeping out a little bit. "
"I left there unscathed."
"He showed me his gun, which I've never seen in real life," Margulis said in an interview with Sirius XM on Friday
"Good wife" actress Juliana Margulis recalled that she was "wriggling" out of her loneliness in a hotel room with Segal
"De Rossi was the second actress to accuse Segal of misconduct last week."
"Ellen DeGeneres, his wife of nine years, tweeted that she was" proud "of her candid meeting
"She replied without panic, 'well, I don't know if he's your type,'" she said
"I ran out and called my agent."
"He sat me down, zipped up my leather pants and told me how important it was to make the chemicals disappear from the screen," she recalled
"My last audition for Steven Segal was in his office."



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I had to have cartilage taken from my ear to rebuild my nose and a couple of operations to scrape out the cartilage because the scar tissue wasn’t healing properly,” he continued.”
““But I went to the wrong guy to put my face back together.”In the years since, photos of Rourke’s bruised, bandaged, post-surgery face have circulated online.”
“Mary Jo Buttafuoco: 25 Years After Being Shot in the Face, She Can Smile Again Thanks to Nerve Surgery“Most of it was to mend the mess of my face because of the boxing,” he said then.”
“He revealed to the Daily Mail in 2009 that he had, by then, undergone five operations on his nose.”
“Image zoom Credit: Mickey Rourke/InstagramThe star’s changing looks have made headlines in recent years.”
“”I don’t know what day it is don’t even realize operation is over.”Rourke gave very few details about the procedure and a rep for the star did not immediately respond to a request for comment from PEOPLE.”
“Now i am ‘pretty again ‘:(lol)… one more to go” he wrote alongside a smiling photo of himself and a doctor with a bandage on his nose.”
““Moments after nose surgery with Dr. Dhir.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The 65-year-old boxer-turned-actor opened up in an Instagram post about his latest trip to the doctor, this time for a nose job.”


"I had to take cartilage out of my ears to rebuild my nose, and I had several surgeries to remove the cartilage because the scar tissue didn't heal properly," he continued
"But I've got the wrong person and restored my face." In the years since then, pictures of bruises and bandages on Locke's face after his operation have been circulating on the Internet
"Mary Jo butafuko: 25 years ago, after she was shot in the face, she was able to laugh again because of neurological surgery." At the time, he said, "most of it is to repair the facial confusion caused by boxing."
"He told the daily mail in 2009 that by then, he had had five operations on his nose."
"Thanks to image zooming: Mickey Locke / instagram in recent years, stars' varied looks have made headlines."
"I don't know what day it is. I don't even know that the operation is over." Locke gave few details of the procedure, and a representative of the star did not immediately respond to requests for comment
"Now I'm beautiful again." (HA HA) There's another one He wrote next to a smiling photo of himself and a doctor with a bandage on his nose
"The moment after I had nose surgery with Dr. Deere."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The 65 year old boxer actor revealed on instagram that he went to see a doctor last time, this time for nose surgery."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I love this country and honestly tried my best.””
““I’m a risk taker artistically, but clearly this rendition didn’t strike the intended tone.”
“On Friday’s episode of The Ellen DeGeneres Show, Duhamel defends Fergie’s controversial performance of “The Star-Spangled Banner” at the NBA All-Star Game.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““She’s been slammed and hammered for this national anthem,” DeGeneres says of the sultry rendition, which was harpooned on social media.”
““I think that she would probably admit that it was not her best work.”
“But the girl’s crazy-talented, she really is.”
“And she’s an amazing woman, an amazing human being,” says Duhamel, 45, of Fergie, 42, with whom he shares custody of their 4-year-old son Axl.”
“(The former couple announced their separation after eight years of marriage in an exclusive statement to PEOPLE in September.)”
““It’s hard to see someone you care about get beat up like that.”


"I love this country and do my best sincerely."
"I'm an adventurer in art, but it's clear that this kind of interpretation didn't achieve the expected tone."
On Friday's Ellen DeGeneres Show, Duhamel defended faggie's controversial star spangled banner performance in the NBA all star game
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She got a lot of flak and flak for the national anthem," DeGeneres said of the sultry song, which has been hyped up on social media
"I think she might admit it's not her best work."
"But this girl is really talented."
"She's a great woman, a great person," said Duhamel, 45, of Fergie, 42, who raised their 4-year-old son, Akers
"(the former couple announced in an exclusive statement to people magazine in September that they were separated after eight years of marriage.)
"It's hard to see people you care about being beaten like this."



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“All prices are subject to change and items could sell out based on the merchant’s inventory.”
“See u on the other side pic.twitter.com/a2bBlc1RDy — Bethenny Frankel (@Bethenny) October 30, 2017“My furry first baby, May ur next life be as beautiful as this one was.”
“The “Real Housewives of New York City” star announced the sad news of Cookie’s death on her social media accounts Monday morning.”
“My @cookiedabooboo is gone.”
“Bless her furry heart... — Bethenny Frankel (@Bethenny) October 30, 2017“My @cookiedabooboo is gone.”
“Bless her furry heart,” Frankel, 46, wrote.”
“She later paid tribute to Cookie, who was 17, with a sweet photo and message.”
“My furry first baby, May ur next life be as beautiful as this one was.”
“Thank u for the love u gave to me &my peanut.”
“Thank u for the love u gave to me & my peanut.”


"All prices will change, and the goods may be sold out, depending on the inventory of the merchant."
"See you on the other side pic.twitter.com/a2bBlc1RDy -Bethany Frankel (@ Bethenny) October 30, 2017 "my hairy first child, may your next life be as beautiful as this one."
The "real housewife of New York City" star announced the death of biscuit on his social media account on Monday morning
"My @ cookiedaboobo is gone."
"Bless her hairy heart... -Bethenny Frankel (@ Bethenny) October 30, 2017 "my @ cookiedabooboo is gone."
"Bless her furry heart," Frankel, 46, wrote
"Then she saluted 17-year-old cookie with a sweet photo and message."
"My hairy first child, may your next life be as beautiful as this one."
"Thank you for your love & my peanuts."
"Thank you for your love & my peanuts."



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m very proud of this.””
“I got six ounces!”
“Despite raving about the pros of breastfeeding, the twin sister of Nikki Bella says the cons are outweighing the positive aspects.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Mom guilt’s the worst feeling in the world,” Bella admits.”
““The guilt always plays in.”
“...child with husband fellow wrestler Daniel Bryan...”
“To the point it makes me feel bad when I m doing it because I m so miserable But it s not only the physical and emotional stress that affects the WWE star who welcomed her now 17 month old...”
“I hate pumping.”


"I'm very proud of that."
"I have six ounces!"
"Despite the praise for the benefits of breastfeeding, nikibala's twin sister said the disadvantages outweigh the positive."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Mom's guilt is the worst feeling in the world," Bella admits
"Guilt is always at work."
“… And her husband's child wrestler Daniel Blaine
"When I did this, it made me feel bad because I was in pain, but it wasn't just physical and emotional pressure that affected the 17 month old WWE star who welcomed her..."
"I hate pumping."



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Marc Jacobs, Iman and More Celebs Remember Legendary Photographer Bill CunninghamRelated Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Gigi Hadid, Kendall Jenner and Kaia Gerber Slay the Marc Jacobs New York Fashion Week ShowCindy Crawford Attends Marc Jacobs Party in Honor of Gorgeous Daughter Kaia Gerber With Her Family: Pics!”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“'Bachelor' Finale: Arie Luyendyk Jr. Proposes to Becca Kufrin Only to Dump Her in Shocking Footage This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“"And to my Ride or Die fiancé @chardefrancesco I LOVE YOU❤️"For an example of how not to do a proposal, watch coverage of the last Bachelor finale below.”
“#flashmobatchipotle #moves THANK YOU, everyone, for making this happen video @plural_nyc @laurengerrie @seandon212@1.800.newbold," Jacobs wrote in a caption on the video.”
“"And, this happened...'Charly Defrancesco will you marry me'?”
“...yes repeatedly and the two embraced...”
“In an Instagram video of the occasion the aforementioned flashmob took over a New York Chipotle boogied down to Prince s Kiss and then stopped as Jacobs dropped to one knee to pop the question You can t hear the proposal itself but DeFrancesco was all smiles as he nodded...”
“It may not sound like it, but fashion designer Marc Jacob's proposal to boyfriend and model/candlemaker Charly "Char" Defrancesco was epic.”


"Mark Jacobs, Iman and more celebrities remember the legendary photographer Bill Cunningham gallery..."
"Embedded code restart" content: Gigi Hadid, Kendall Jenner and Kaya Gerber kill mark Jacobs New York Fashion Week show, Cindy Crawford attend mark Jacobs party, pay homage to beautiful daughter Kaya Gerber and her family: photos
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The end of" Bachelor ": Ali luyandick, Jr. proposed to Becca Coughlin, but she was thrown into a shocking scene. This video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's information."
"For my fiance, I love you ❤️ "For an example of how not to propose, take a look at the last single man story below."
Thank you very much for making this a reality nyc@laurengerrie@ Email: seandon212@1.800.newbold "Jacobs wrote in the title of the video."
"And it happened "Charlie de Franco, will you marry me?"
“…… Yes, they hugged each other... "
"In an instagram video, the flash mob takes over a New York chipotle, hisses at the prince's kiss, then stops, Jacobs kneels down and asks a question: you can't hear the proposal itself, but de Francesco smiles and nods..."
"It may not sound like much, but fashion designer mark Jacobs' proposal to her boyfriend and model / Candlestick producer Charlie de fresco is epic."



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And it somehow just got more dramatic.”
“With the series premiere set for April 5, the promos are kicking into high gear, and they truly don’t disappoint.”
“The premiere of Jersey Shore: Family Vacation is right around the corner, and MTV is really coming through with the promos, teasers, and sneak peeks.”
“Last week, we got the first official trailer for the series ― which airs on April 5 ― and this week, well… MTV has outdone themselves.”
“Fans of the original series will be thrilled to see MTV’s March 20 release: the most dramatic reading of “The Note” ever.”
“Yes.”
“Yep.”
“MTV has had the Jersey Shore fam do a dramatized reading of the piece of writing that spelled the beginning of the end for Ronnie Ortiz-Magro and Sammi “Sweetheart” Giancola way back when.”
“And, yes, it’s exactly as amazing as you’re picturing.”
“They’re Back!”


"Somehow, it became more dramatic."
"With the premiere of the play on April 5, the promo is coming to a climax, and they really won't let people down."
The premiere of "Jersey coast: family vacation" is just around the corner, and MTV's promos, banter films and voyeurism films are overwhelming
"Last week, we got the first official trailer of the series - it was broadcast on April 5 - and this week, well MTV has surpassed itself. "
"Fans of the original show will be very excited to see the release of MTV on March 20: it's the most dramatic interpretation of note in its history."
"Yes."
"Yes."
MTV has made a dramatic reading for families on the Jersey coast. When did Ronnie Ortiz Magro and Sammy giankola's "sweetheart" end
"And, yes, it's as amazing as you think."
"They're back!"



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In addition, the American Idol champion sang the lyrics to “So This Is Love” from Disney’s Cinderella, which she sings to her youngest child as a lullaby.”
“Corden...”
“RELATED VIDEO Kelly Clarkson Can t Stop Crying Over Voice Contestant s Powerful Rendition of Piece by Piece When she wasn t wooing her husband of four years Clarkson was singing her singles Since You ve Been Gone Love So Soft Stronger Because of You and Whole Lotta Woman with...”
“And fast forward to the present, Clarkson shares four kids with Blackstock, including 16-year-old stepdaughter Savannah, 10-year-old stepson Seth, 3-year-old daughter River Rose and 19-month-old son Remington “Remy” Alexander.”
“...the country group s tour manager at the time...”
“Image zoom Credit CBS The pair who married in 2013 first met at a rehearsal for the Academy of Country Music Awards in 2006 where Clarkson was performing a duet with Rascal Flatts on their tune What Hurts the Most Blackstock who is the former stepson of Reba McEntire was...”
““I feel like we’re making a porn,” Blackstock joked.”
““Is this intervention?” the mother of two said before being surprised by her husband with sparkling apple cider, a rose, chocolate covered strawberries and a violinist.”
““It’s difficult because I work a lot and I’m a mom but we try,” Clarkson said of spending time with her husband away from work when he’s not also being her manager.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


In addition, the American idol champion sang the lyrics of "so that's love" from the Disney movie Cinderella, which she sang as a lullaby to the youngest child
"Cordon..."
"Related video Kelly Clarkson can't help crying. She uses her voice to perform paragraph by paragraph forcefully. When she doesn't ask her husband who has been married for four years, Clarkson is singing her single since you left, because you and the whole Lota woman love so gently and more strongly..."
Fast forward to now, Clarkson and Blackstock have four children, including 16-year-old stepdaughter Savannah, 10-year-old stepson Seth, 3-year-old daughter rivers and 19-month-old son Remington "Remy" Alexander
“… The manager of the national tour group at that time... "
"The CBS couple, who got married in 2013, first met at the rehearsal of the 2006 Academy of country music awards, when Clarkson was performing a duet with rascal fratz on their tune. What hurt the darkest stock? Who was Rebecca mcvisser's former stepson
"I think we're doing porn," Blackstock joked
"Is this intervention? The mother of two said before her husband surprised her with sparkling cider, roses, chocolate strawberries and violinists
"It's difficult because I work a lot, and I'm a mother, but we work hard," Clarkson said of spending time outside of work with her husband, who is not her manager
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““AHHHHHHHHH” Sarah Hyland wrote.”
““Yaaaaaaaaas girl,” Ashley Tisdale commented on her photo.”
“Hidalgo, who has made guest appearances on Grey’s Anatomy and How I Met Your Mother, also heard from some famous faces about the news.”
“Congratulations both of you,” she commented on Daugherty’s Instagram.”
““Fabulous news!!!”
“The author of the Fifty Shades trilogy, EL James, congratulated the pair on their engagement.”
“Daugherty is best known for his roles as Noel Kahn on Pretty Little Liars and as Sawyer in Fifty Shades Freed, which is currently in theaters.”
““Amsterdam for Valentine’s Day ,” the Dancing with the Stars alum captioned a video of his hotel room in the Netherlands on February 14.”
“.”The pair, who started dating in October 2016, also shared photos from their aforementioned trip to Amsterdam via Instagram earlier this month.”
“Sucker.”Hidalgo posted the same photo to her Instagram on Monday, simply writing, “Ok @brantdaugherty, I’ll marry you.”


"Ah, ah, ah," Sarah Helan wrote
"Girl," Ashley Tisdale said of her photos
"Hidalgo has guest starred in Gray's anatomy and how I met your mother, and he has heard about it from some celebrities."
"Congratulations, both of you," she commented on Doherty's instagram
"Good news!"
Al James, author of the fifty shadows trilogy, congratulates the two on their engagement
Doherty is best known for his role as Noel Kahn in "the beautiful little liar" and Sawyer in "Fifty shadows," which is currently on
"Valentine's Day is in Amsterdam," the star dancing alumni wrote in a video in Holland on February 14
"The two started dating in October 2016 and shared photos of the Amsterdam trip earlier this month via instagram."
"Idiot." Hidalgo posted the same photo on her instagram on Monday, just saying, "OK @ branddaugherty, I'll marry you."



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...he is getting medical and psychological help...”
“I wanted to show myself my ex partner and the world that I was the master of my mind and my body and that NO ONE could take my spirit away from me After the wrestling challenge triggered his PTSD Ammo returned to the United States from Colombia and says...”
“I did The Challenge to prove to myself that I was strong — that I could do anything.”
““On this season on MTV’s The Challenge, fans got to see every step of my journey towards recovery.”
“And yet: I still didn’t know that it was rape.”It was not until he spoke to a social worker at Planned Parenthood that Ammo became aware that interrelationship rape existed and a crime.”
““And it was non-consensual.”
“It was mortifying,” the post reads.”
““I remember saying ‘no’ and ‘I don’t want to’ but my partner insisted that he was going to ‘make me take it’ and teach me ‘how to be a man.’ ”“It was painful.”
““In November of 2016 I was raped in my own bed by my former partner,” the former Mormon writes.”
“Memories of the attack came flooding back during a challenge that saw another competitor hold him down.”


“… He is receiving medical and psychological help... "
"I want to show my former partner and the world that I am the master of my mind and body and that no one can take my spirit away from me after the wrestling challenge triggered his PTSD ammunition returned from Colombia to the United States," he said
"I'm doing this challenge to prove to myself that I'm strong - I can do anything."
"In this season's MTV challenge, fans saw every step of my recovery."
"However: I still didn't know it was rape." It wasn't until he talked to a social worker at the family planning center that amo realized the existence and crime of relational rape
"It's involuntary."
"It's embarrassing," the Post wrote
"I remember saying 'no' and 'I don't want to', but my partner insisted that he would 'let me accept' and teach me 'how to be a man'," it was painful
"In November 2016, I was raped by my ex partner in my own bed," the former Mormon wrote
"In a competition, another contestant put him on the ground, and people's memories of the attack came to mind."



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Alyssa Bailey News and Strategy Editor Alyssa Bailey is the news and strategy editor at ELLE.com, where she oversees coverage of celebrities and royals (particularly Meghan Markle and Kate Middleton).”
“Royal perks to some, but just another day of work for royal-in-training Meghan.”
“She's made public appearances in the UK's England, Wales, Scotland, and Northern Island.”
“But nothing will stop him from having Meghan on his arm for the big day.”Markle, meanwhile, got a personal tour of Great Britain and Northern Island from her fiancé Prince Harry.”
“He lives a reclusive life in Mexico.”
““He’s not exactly thrilled at facing the world’s glare.”
““Thomas [Senior] is overjoyed to be beside his little girl on the day she becomes a princess—even if he has to battle his demons to get there," a source told the outlet.”
“The photo was taken on March 27, days after The Sun reported that Thomas will be at the ceremony to walk Markle down the aisle.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Alyssa Bailey, news and strategy editor ELLE.com She oversees coverage of celebrities and royalty, especially Megan markel and Kate Middleton
"The royal family has given some extra allowance, but it's just another day for the royal family to train Megan."
She has made public appearances in England, Wales, Scotland and the North Island
"But nothing can stop him from carrying Megan through this important day." Meanwhile, markel got a personal trip to Great Britain and the North Island from his fiance Prince Harry
"He lives in seclusion in Mexico."
"In the face of the strong light of the world, he is not very excited."
A source told the media: "Thomas (Senior) was very happy to be with his little daughter on the day she became a princess, even if he had to fight the devil to get there."
"This photo was taken on March 27. A few days ago, the Sun reported that Thomas would attend the wedding and let markel down the aisle."



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And we’re just thrilled we get to do this again together.””
“...is excited to see what she comes up with when the Monterey moms stories continue We re just thrilled to welcome her to our family...”
“We did try to accommodate him but we did want to get the season started soon because I think the people want it soon Instead director Andrea Arnold Transparent I Love Dick will helm Season 2 s episodes and Witherspoon...”
“But when they started planning for Season 2, she says, “unfortunately, he was busy.”
““We are so deeply grateful to Jean-Marc Vallée: his vision and his artistry… he put his heart and soul into this,” star/executive producer Reese Witherspoon told reporters backstage in the Globes press room.”
“But when it does, it’ll be without Jean-Marc Vallée, who directed all seven episodes of Season 1.”
“...a second season...”
“The acclaimed HBO drama won a whopping four Golden Globes including Best Limited Series TV Movie and acting trophies for stars Nicole Kidman Alexander Skarsgard and Laura Dern and it finally confirmed last month that it will be returning for...”
“Yes, yes, Big Little Lies won just about every Golden Globe in sight on Sunday night — but what will it look like when it comes back?”


"We're glad we can work together again."
“… It's good to see what she came up with when the story of mother Monterey goes on. We're just happy to welcome her to our family... "
"We do try to adapt to him, but we do want the season to start soon, because I think people want it to start soon, not Director Andrea Arnold. I love dick to be at the helm of season 2 and Witherspoon..."
But when they started planning for the second season, she said, "unfortunately, he's busy."
"We are very grateful to Jean Marc Valle for his vision and artistry He's all in it, "star / executive producer Reese Witherspoon told reporters backstage in the globe press room
"But when it came out, there was no Jean Marc Valle, who directed all seven episodes of the first season."
“… Season two... "
"This highly acclaimed HBO TV series won four Golden Globe Awards, including the best limited series TV film award and the acting trophy starring Nicole Kidman Alexander Skarsgard and Laura Dean, and finally confirmed that it will return to..."
"Yes, yes, big lie won almost all the Golden Globes on Sunday night, but what will it look like when it comes back?"



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Oscars also will be televised live in more than 225 countries and territories worldwide.”
“The 89th Oscars will be held on Sunday, February 26, 2017, at the Dolby Theatre® at Hollywood & Highland Center in Hollywood, and will be televised live on the ABC Television Network at 7 p.m. ET/4 p.m. PT.”
“But where can you watch it around the world?”
“Here is your guide Africa M Net Albania Digitalb Andorra Canal Spain Armenia Public TV Company of Armenia Asia HBO Asia Australia Nine Network Austria ORF 1 or Pro 7 Sat 1 Azerbaijan AZTV Belarus ONT Second Nat l TV Channel Belgium Flemish Chello Media Prime or Canal France Benelux...”
“BE TV SA Bolivia Red Unitel Canal 9 Brazil TV Globo Bulgaria BTV Cinema Canada CTV Television Network Chile LaRed China CCTV 6 Colombia Vista RCN Costa Rica Canal 7 Croatia HRT Croation Television Cyprus Intervision Services Denmark TV2 Film or Danmarks Radio TV DR 1 2 3 Dominican Republic...”
“Teleantilles Ecuador Telecuartro Guayaquil El Salvador Canal Dos Estonia Kanal 2 Fiji Fiji Broadcasting Corp Finland YLE France Canal France Georgia Rustavi 2 Broadcasting Germany Pro 7 Sat 1 Greece Intervision Services Guatemala Channels 3 7 11 13 Holland Liberty Global Content or Chello Media Honduras Compania Televisora Hondurena Hong...”
“Kong Pearl Channel TVB Iceland RUV India Star India Indonesia KompasTV Ireland RTE RTE 2 and BSkyB Israel DBS Satellite YES Movies Hot Vision Italy Sky Italia Sky Cinema Japan Wowow NHK Kazakhstan JSC Khabar Agency Korea CJE M Orion Cinema Liechtenstein Pro 7 Sat 1 Luxembourg French Dutch Canal...”
“France Luxembourg German Pro 7 Sat 1 Macedonia Sitel TV Malta Italian Sky Italia Sky Cinema Mexico Red Azteca Ch...”
“7 Middle East Gulf DTH Entertainment OSN Monaco French Canal France Monaco Italian Sky Italia Sky Cinema Mongolia Mongol TV Montenegro Radio Television Montenegro New Zealand Sky Network Sky Movies Nicaragua Canal 2 Norway Modern Times Group Viasat or TV3 TV6 Papua New Guinea Nine Network Panama Medcom Paraguay Canal...”
“9 Peru Canal 2 Poland Canal Poland Portugal SIC Romania Digi Film Russia CIS USSR JSC Chanel One Serbia Radio Television Serbia Singapore Media Corp Ch...”


"The Oscars will also be broadcast live on television in more than 225 countries and regions around the world."
"The 89th Academy Awards ceremony will be held on February 26, 2017 (Sunday) at the Dolby theatre in Hollywood Highland Center, and will be broadcast live on ABC TV network at 7:00 p.m. EST / 4:00 p.m. Pacific time."
"But where can you see it all over the world?"
"This is your guide Africa m network Albania digital Andorra canal Spain Armenian Armenian Armenian public television company Armenian Asia HBO Asia Australia nine networks Austria ORF 1 or pro 7 sat 1 Azerbaijani aztv Belarus ont second national television channel Belize Flemish munchero media prime minister or canal France Benelux..."
"Be TV SA Bolivia red unitel canal 9 Brazilian TV station global Bulgaria BTV cinema Canada CTV TV network Chile lared China CCTV 6 Colombia Vista RCN Costa Rica canal 7 Croatian HRT Croatian TV station Cyprus intervisibility service Denmark TV2 film or Denmark radio and television station Dr 123 Dominican Republic..."
"Teleantares Ecuador teleuartro Guayaquil El Salvador canal DOS Estonia Kanal 2 Fiji Fiji Broadcasting Company Finland YLE France canal France Georgia rustavi 2 broadcasting Germany Pro 7 sat 1 Greece intervisibility service Guatemalan channel 3 7 11 13 Holland liberty global content or Chello media Honduras company tviola hondurena Hong..."
"Hong Kong Pearl channel TVB, Iceland RUV, star of India, India Indonesia kompastv, Ireland RTE RTE 2 and BSkyB Israel star show satellite yes films are popular in sky Italy sky cinema, Japan WoWow NHK, Kazakhstan JSC kabar, acting for South Korea CJE m Orion cinema, supporting dunston Pro 7 sat 1, Luxembourg France Holland canal..."
"French Luxemburg German occupation 7 sat 1 Macedonian Sitel TV Maltese sky Italy sky cinema Mexico red Azteca ch.."
"7 Middle East Gulf DTH entertainment OSN Monaco France canal Monaco Italy sky Italy sky cinema Mongolia Mongolia TV station Montenegrin radio TV station Montenegrin New Zealand Sky Network Sky movie Nicaraguan canal 2 Norway Hyundai Group viasat or TV3 TV6 Papua New Guinea nine nets Panama Matteo Paraguay canal..."
"9 Peru canal 2 Poland canal Poland Portugal SiC Romania digi film Russia CIS Soviet Union JSC Chanel No.1 Serbia radio and television station Serbia Singapore media company ch.."



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Bon Jovi | Credit: Chelsea Lauren/REX/ShutterstockRELATED: The Night Richie Sambora Walked Away From Bon Jovi: ‘He Just Didn’t Come to Work’”
“Bon Jovi is gearing up to head back out on a two-month tour starting March 14 in Denver, Colorado and ending in Washington, D.C. on May 14.”
“...show...”
“The band who will be inducted into the 2018 Rock and Roll Hall of Fame in April recently released the second leg of their latest album This House Is Not For Sale with two new singles titled When We Were Us and Walls But what s an album without a...”
“Getty Images Image zoom Bon Jovi Credit Alberto E Rodriguez Getty Images An award and a return to stage is not the only thing Bon Jovi is kicking off the year with...”
“We ve been at this game a long time and the only advice I ll tell this incredible generation of incredible talent is just stay true to who you are and then they re going to make you guys icons too someday Image zoom Jon Bon Jovi Credit Christopher Polk...”
““I want to thank the three and a half decades of fans that have been listening to Bon Jovi songs,” frontman Jon Bon Jovi, 56, said during the band’s acceptance speech.”
“...notifications with news features and more...”
“The legendary rock band was honored with the first ever iHeartRadio Icon Award to celebrate their contributions to music throughout their 35 year career during the 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards on Sunday where they performed classics like It s My Life and You Give Love a Bad Name Get push...”
“...to Who You Are It s been more than three decades and Bon Jovi has sure held on to what they ve got...”


"Image zooming Bon Jovi | image source: Chelsea Lauren / Rex / shuttersto ckRELATED:Richie Sambora The night he left Bon Jovi: "he just didn't come to work."
"Bon Jovi is preparing to start a two month tour, starting in Denver, Colorado on March 14 and ending in Washington on May 14."
“… Show
"The band that will be inducted into the 2018 rock and Roll Hall of fame in April recently released the second paragraph of their latest album this house, including two new singles called when we ares us and walls, which is a picture without "My album."
"Getty pictures zooming bonjovi credit Alberto e Rodriguez Getty pictures an award and returning to the stage is not the only thing bonjovi is starting this year with..."
"We've been in this game for a long time, the only suggestion I'll tell this incredible generation of incredible talents is just to keep the real who you are, and then they'll make your icons also one day image zooming Jon Bon Jovi credit Christopher Polk..."
"I want to thank the fans who have been listening to Bon Jovi songs for 35 years," said lead singer Jon Bon Jovi, 56, in the band's award-winning speech
“… Newsletters and more... "
"The legendary rock band won the first-ever iHeartRadio icon award to celebrate their 35 year career in music at the 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards, where they performed" it's my life "and" you give love a bad name "at the awards ceremony on Sunday Name get push)
“… For who you are, it's been more than 30 years. Bonjovi must insist on what they have... "



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“(Kloss may have just sent a standard laughing face since she's a dog person.)”
“But, sleep easy, Jennifer Lawrence and all other concerned Kaylor fans: EVERYTHING IS OKAY.”
“Really!”
“Kloss just assured the New York Times!”
“When the outlet asked her about the status of her and Swift's friendship in a new interview, Kloss replied, “Don’t believe everything you read."”
“So, Kloss' "Swish Swish" caption and Perry hangout truly do mean nothing?”
“The NYT noted that Kloss and Swift "continue to be good friends, and they talk frequently."”
“Imagine all the laughing-cat emojis they texted when that first Kaylor is dead story went around.”
“Maybe Swift really is just keeping her relationships private.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Close may have just given a standard smile because she's a dog lover."
"But sleep well, Jennifer Lawrence and all the other fans who care about Keller: everything's fine."
"Really
"Klaus just assured the New York Times!"
When asked about her friendship with swift in a new interview, Klaus replied, "don't believe everything you read."
So, is Claus's "whoosh" title and Perry's stroll really meaningless
The New York Times pointed out that Klaus and swift "continue to be good friends and they talk a lot."
"Imagine the smiling cat faces they texted when the first story of Keller's death spread."
"Maybe swift really just kept her relationship secret."



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Susan Kelechi Watson, who plays Randall’s wife, Beth, told ET that the relevant scenes about the shocking surprise weren’t even in the initial script.”
“Do not proceed if you have not watched Tuesday's episode of This Is Us.”
“If you have, read our recap and our exclusive postmortem, then come on back...”
“This week’s This Is Us dropped a massive surprise on fans — but Chrissy Metz, who plays the newly-pregnant Kate Pearson on the show, revealed that not even her own family knew the big twist ahead of time.”
“Responding to a fan on Twitter who asked, “How hard was that to keep to yourself?” Metz replied: “Beyond difficult!”
“My real family didn’t even have a clue.”Beyond difficult!”
“My real family didnt even have a clue Chrissy Metz ChrissyMetz October 18 2017 EXCLUSIVE Milo Ventimiglia and Mandy Moore on This Is Us Season 2 Premiere s Final Scene But as ET learned it wasn t just friends and family who were in the dark about Kate s pregnancy...”
“...the cast was too...”
““It was one of the those things that was left out of the script when we first got it,” she said of the pregnancy reveal.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
Susan kelledge Watson, who plays Randall's wife, Beth, told et magazine that the scenes related to the shocking surprise were not even in the original script
"If you don't watch this is us on Tuesday, don't go on."
"If so, please read our summary and exclusive autopsy report and come back..."
"This week's" this is us "has brought fans a big surprise - but Chris Metz, who plays pregnant Kate Pearson in the show, revealed that even her own family didn't know about the big turn ahead of time."
"How hard is this for you?" one fan asked on twitter? Metz replied, "beyond the difficulties!"
"My real family doesn't even have a clue." It's very difficult
"My real family didn't even know that Kris Metz, Kris Metz's exclusive Milo Ventimiglia and mandimore were on October 18, 2017, which is the last scene of the second season premiere in the United States, but according to ET, it's not just friends and family who know nothing about Kate's pregnancy..."
“…… The actors are so... "
"It's one of the things that we missed when we first got the script," she said of pregnancy revelation



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AIN’T NEVER LOST.”
“This is the best show, everyone.”
“Also, Miz and Maryse sold their house by accident.”
“This week: NONE OF THAT MATTERS, BECAUSE RUSEV WITH A PIG.”
“And now, the most bizarre and wonderful moments from season seven, episode five of Total Divas.”
“PIGS In a move that immediately puts Alexa and Nia into the Total Divas Hall of Fame not that they weren t already in there through four strong STRONG episodes Alexa wants to go to a pig farm and get...”
“...a pet pig...”
“After some wonderful pig farm footage, including Alexa’s privates being endangered by a spiky fence, she adopts a pig named Larry Steve.”
“They later bring this pig to Rusev’s Name Day party (more on that shortly), and the name “Larry Steve” tickles Rusev no end.”
“Everything about the pig tickles Rusev.”


"Never lost."
"Everybody, this is the best show."
"And Miz and Maris accidentally sold the house."
"This week: it doesn't matter because Rousseff is with a pig."
"Now, it's the most bizarre and exciting moment in the fifth episode of season 7 of total queen."
"Pigs in a move immediately put Aleksa and NIA into the total queen of fame, not where they have been through four powerful plots. Aleksa wants to go to the pig farm and get..."
“… "Pet pig..."
"After some wonderful pig farm scenes, including Aleksa's private life threatened by a sharp fence, she adopted a pig named Larry Steve."
"They later brought the pig to Rousseff's naming Day Party (more on that later)," Larry Steve "made Rousseff laugh
"Everything about pigs tickles Rousseff."



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We just didn't know for two days if she was going to make it or not."”
“It was just something that I never, ever expected to hear, as a parent, about any of my kids."”
“As for how Demi is doing, Dianna told Newsmax TV, “She's happy.”
“She's healthy.”
“She's working on her sobriety, and she's getting the help she needs.”
“That in itself encourages me about her future and about the future of our family."”
“Dianna got permission from Demi before appearing on the news channel where she opened up about her reaction to the apparent overdose.”
“She said, “It's still a really difficult thing to talk about.”
“I literally start to shake a little bit when I start to remember what happened that day."”
“Demi's assistant was the one who called Dianna, who “was in shock” over the news.”


"We didn't know for two days whether she would come or not."
"As a parent, I never thought I would hear about my children."
"As for what happened to Demi, Diana told newsmax," she was happy. “
"She's healthy."
"She's trying to stop drinking and she's got the help she needs."
"That in itself encouraged me to care about her future and the future of our family."
"Diana got permission from Demi before she appeared on the news channel, where she disclosed her reaction to an apparent overdose."
"It's still a hard thing to talk about," she said
"When I started to think about what happened that day, I really started to shake a little bit."
"Demi's assistant is the person who called Diana, and Diana was" shocked "by the news."



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And Allison isn’t afraid to point out that.””
“I all the time say trend is an extension of 1’s character.”
““I wish to type of match that.”
““[Allison is] enjoyable and energetic,” stated Hollywood stylist Tara Swennen, whose numerous clientele ranges from the ever-so edgy Kristen Stewart to America’s favourite mama Julie Bowen.”
“...highest honor from the very begin of the season...”
“It was Janney s first time and nomination on the Oscars and apart from her strong efficiency a tough take a look at the fifty eight yr previous s current ensembles show she was poised to simply accept movie s...”
“The I, Tonya star went residence with the gold at Sunday night time’s Academy Awards, profitable the Greatest Supporting Actress class.”


"Alison is not afraid to point that out either."
"I've always said that trend is an extension of one's character."
"I want to find a type that matches it."
"Allison is pleasant and energetic," says Tara swennen, a Hollywood stylist. Her clients range from Kristen Stewart to Julie Bowen, America's most popular mother. "
“… Top honors from the start of the season... "
"This is the first time that Jenny has been nominated for an Oscar. In addition to her excellent work efficiency, looking at the Oscar ceremony 58 years ago, she is ready to accept the film s...."
"I, Tonia's star, came in with the gold medal at the Oscars on Sunday night. This is the greatest supporting actress."



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See what she previously told The Daily Dish about where things currently stand with the RHOC vet, below.”
“But does Kelly see a friendship with Shannon in her future?”
“But believe it or not, the newbie told The Daily Dish earlier this summer that she wasn't all that bothered when she initially found out about Shannon's friend Nina's comments at the '70s party.”
“But her husband Michael Dodd and her new friend Vicki Gunvalson saw the situation differently telling Kelly that regardless of the fact that she was never a prostitute people might still think it s true if the rumor gets out...”
“...there...”
“"It got me really angry," Kelly said (clip above).”
“"I'm thinking to myself, 'OK, how could I ever be a prostitute?”
“I got married when I was 25 to my first husband.”
“I went to college.”
“I worked for Gannett newspapers.”


"Take a look at what she said to the daily menu. See below for the current status of RhoC veterinarians."
"But does Kelly see the future friendship with Shannon?"
"But believe it or not, the rookie told the daily menu earlier this summer that she wasn't so upset when she first discovered Shannon's friend Nina's comments at a party in the 1970s."
"But her husband, Michael Dodd, and her new friend, Vicky gonwason, have different views on the situation. They tell Kelly that no matter she has never been a prostitute, if rumors spread, people may still think it's true..."
“… There... "
"It makes me very angry," Kelly said (above)
"I was thinking," well, how could I be a prostitute? "
"I married my first husband when I was 25."
"I went to college."
"I work for the gannet."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But when he pulls off to indulge in his real passion, the movie rides just as it should — low and slow.”
“Also Read: Demian Bichir Joins Cast of 'Conjuring' Spinoff 'The Nun'But as the movie pulls back from Danny’s typical teenage resentments, de Montreuil wisely allows the other actors to fill more of the frame.”
“Nor are we likely to empathize much with the kid when the camera pulls out and we see the aspiring graffiti artist racing to redecorate L.A.’s Sixth Street Bridge — and then use it as an open-air urinal — while his friends worry about the approaching sirens.”
“Claudia (Yvette Monreal, “Faking It”) has a college scholarship to protect, so she drives off just in time, leaving Danny and his best friend Chuy (Tony Revolori, far from the lobby of “The Grand Budapest Hotel”) literally holding the bag.”
“A couple of spray paint cans are enough to land the boys in jail, though they get bailed out soon enough by Danny’s father, Miguel (Demián Bichir).”
“Miguel has finally built himself a quiet life, with devoted girlfriend Gloria (Eva Longoria) and an adorable stepdaughter (Montse Hernandez, “Jane the Virgin”) who’s avidly planning her quinceañera.”
“When he’s not with them, Miguel can be found at his car repair shop in Boyle Heights, working on the revered, pristine 1961 Impala he lovingly calls Green Poison.”
“Also Read: LA Film Festival Embraces Diversity With 'Lowriders' Opener, Ava DuVernay AwardMiguel — who doesn’t want Danny to join his other son, Francisco (Theo Rossi,”Sons of Anarchy”), behind bars — is intimidating enough to keep Danny on track for a while.”
“But as a recovering alcoholic with lingering anger management issues and a general disdain for human communication, he’s not exactly the easiest guy to connect with.”
“So it’s no surprise that Danny’s an easy mark for Francisco, who gets out of jail nursing a massive, eight-year grudge against his father.”


"But when he began to indulge in his real passion, the rhythm of the film was just right - low and slow."
"Read also: Demian bisher joined the cast of the magician, the nun, but as the film emerged from Denny's typical teenage resentment, de Montreux wisely allowed other actors to take over more of the scene."
"When the camera moves away, we see the aspiring graffiti artist competing to redecorate the Los Angeles Sixth Street Bridge - and then use it as an outdoor urinal - while his friends are worried about the approaching siren, we are not likely to sympathize with the child."
"Claudia (Yvette monrell," pretends ") has a college scholarship to protect, so she drives away just in time to let Denny and his best friend Trey (Tony rivaroli, far from the lobby of the Budapest Hotel) really carry the bag."
"Two spray cans are enough to put the children in jail, but Daniel's father Miguel (Demian bisher) soon bailed them out."
"Miguel has finally established a quiet life for herself, with a loyal girlfriend Gloria (Eva Longoria) and a lovely stepdaughter (Montessori Hernandez," virgin Jane "), and she is eagerly planning her fifth anniversary."
"When Miguel is not with them, he can be found at his garage in Boyle Heights, where he is studying the respected, primitive 1961 impala that he affectionately calls" green poison. "
"Read also: the Los Angeles Film Festival embraces diversity with the 'low rider' opener, EVA duvinai, Edward Miguel - who doesn't want Denny to join his other son, Francisco (Theodore Rossi," son of anarchy "), in prison - is enough to intimidate to keep Denny on track for a while."
"But as a recovering alcoholic, he has persistent anger, management problems and general contempt for interpersonal communication, and he is not the easiest person to contact."
"So it's no surprise that Dani is a gullible man for Francisco. He has been holding a grudge against his father for eight years since he got out of prison."



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For access to all our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews – Subscribe on YouTube!”
“Check out our handy lineage charts to track how many kids each mom has, and who they're with.”
“So to help keep things straight, we got to work on these handy family trees.”
“In fact, most of the Teen Mom girls have kids with more than one father.”
“And TBH, she's not the only MTV star with difficult-to-follow family lines.”
“Between two sons from different fathers, a daughter from her new husband, and two step-kids, it can honestly be really hard to keep track of the Teen Mom girl's family.”
“Thanks to her marriage to David Eason, Jenelle Evans now has like five kids.”


"To access all of our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews, subscribe on YouTube!"
"Check out our handy pedigree chart to track how many children each mother has and who they are with."
"Therefore, in order to keep things going, we have to study these convenient genealogies."
"In fact, most teenage mothers and girls have more than one father's child."
"And she's not the only MTV star with a difficult family."
"Between the sons of two different fathers, the daughter of a new husband, and two stepsons, it's really hard to understand this teenage mother's family."
"Thanks to her marriage to David Ethan, Janel Evans now has five children."



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Learn more about Time’s Up, an organization of women in entertainment combating sexual harassment and inequality, on its website.”
“To donate to the Time’s Up Legal Defense Fund, which will provide subsidized legal support to women and men in all industries who have experienced sexual harassment, assault, or abuse in the workplace, visit its GoFundMe page.”
“...a drama series and the cast is nominated for outstanding performance by an ensemble in a drama series for the second time they won last year as well as outstanding action performance by a stunt ensemble in a comedy or drama...”
“RELATED VIDEO SAG Awards 2018 Get Out The Big Sick and Big Little Lies Score Nominations It s shaping up to be a big night for the hit Netflix series which is up for four TV awards David Harbour and Millie Bobby Brown are each up for outstanding performance in...”
“...official live red carpet show on Twitter or your favorite streaming devices...”
“We are all dead Image zoom Gaten Matarazzo at the 24th Annual Screen Actors Guild Awards Credit Frederick M Brown Getty Be sure to check out PEOPLE s full SAG Awards coverage to get the latest news on Hollywood s big night and watch PEOPLE Entertainment Weekly and TNT s...”
““The show ends.”“There’s no show — it starts and then the credits just roll,” added Matarazzo.”
““I know a little bit.”“We all die!” joked Schnapp, 13.”
““We know nothing,” said Matarazzo, 15, during an interview on E!’s red carpet.”
“The cast of Stranger Things is nominated for outstanding performance by an ensemble in a drama series, which they won last yearGet push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Please learn more about time's up, an organization of women in the entertainment industry, on its website to combat sexual harassment and inequality."
"To donate to the voice of the times legal defense fund, which will provide subsidized legal support to men and women in all industries who suffer from sexual harassment, abuse or abuse in the workplace, visit its gofundme page."
“…… For the second time last year, the series and actors were nominated for the best performance of the series, and for the best action performance of a comedy or dramatic stunt company... "
"The nomination of the 2018 video sag Award" big illness, big lies "will be an important night for the popular Netflix series, which will win four TV awards. David Harper and Millie Bob Brown will be in "We got a good performance in the competition."
“… Official live red carpet show on Twitter or your favorite streaming device... "
"At the 24th Screen Actors Guild Awards ceremony, we are all dead. Please read people magazine's full coverage of sag awards, learn the latest news of Hollywood big night, and watch people entertainment weekly and TNT s
"The show is over." "There was no performance - it started, and then the actors started," matalazo added
"I know a little." "We are all dead! 13-year-old schnap joked
"We don't know anything," 15-year-old matalazo said in an interview with E! "This is the red carpet."
The crew of "strange things" was nominated for their outstanding performance in a drama series. They were nominated last year for news, feature, etc



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I want to be worthy of standing shoulder to shoulder with the brave artists who are fighting for all people to be treated with the respect and dignity they deserve.”
“Center in New York, and RAINN.”
“Farrow specifically called out stars who have worked with Allen recently, including Greta Gerwig and Blake Lively, who danced around acknowledging the allegations against Allen in various interviews.”
“Farrow made headlines again in December with an op-ed for the Los Angeles Times that asked why the #MeToo movement—which has swept up the careers of alleged predators like Harvey Weinstein—had not yet had an impact on Allen’s career.”
“Allen has denied the claims.”
“Dylan Farrow, who was adopted by Allen and Mia Farrow, has alleged that Allen sexually abused her when she was a child.”
“Chalamet has been asked several times in the last few months about his decision to work with Allen—a controversial figure most recently because of accusations from his estranged daughter.”
“Chalamet’s co-star Rebecca Hall, however—who also starred in Allen’s 2008 film Vicky Cristina Barcelona—has said she regrets working on the project and has donated her salary from the film to Time’s Up.”
“Selena Gomez Jude Law Liev Schreiber and Elle Fanning have largely remained silent on this matter even when asked about it directly...”
“Chalamet ultimately decided to donate his salary to various charities because he wants to be worthy of standing shoulder to shoulder with the brave artists who are fighting for all people to be treated with the respect and dignity they deserve His high profile co stars in the film including...”


"I want to be worthy of standing side by side with brave artists who strive for the respect and dignity that everyone deserves."
"The center is in New York, Ryan."
"Farrow specifically named the stars who worked with Allen recently, including Greta gweger and Blake Lively, who admitted the charges against Allen in various interviews."
"Farrow made the headlines again in December last year. He published a review article in the Los Angeles Times, questioning why the so-called" meto movement "sweeping the career of predators such as Harvey Weinstein has not yet had an impact on Allen's career."
"Allen denied that."
"Dylan Farrow, adopted by Ellen and Mia Farrow, accused Ellen of sexually abusing her as a child."
"In the past few months, chalamit has been asked many times about his decision to work with Allen, who has recently been a controversial figure because of the charges against his estranged daughter."
"However, Charlotte's co star Rebecca hall, who also starred in Allen's 2008 film Vicky Cristina Barcelona, said she regretted participating in the project and donated the salary from the film to time's up
"Selena Gomez Jude Law leaf Schreber and Al fanning are basically silent on this matter, even if they are directly asked about it..."
"Chalamit finally decided to donate his salary to various charities, because he wanted to fight side by side with brave artists, so that all people can get due respect and dignity. His high-profile partners in the film include..."



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“At this point the news of the Trump administration is the news of people investigating it and figuring out what’s really going on.” — RACHEL MADDOW”
“...and likely under a criminal obstruction of justice probe, for something that you openly committed and then bragged about to the Russians before you bragged about it on NBC News, you don’t get to make your own news anymore.”
“I feel like they don’t really get to make their own news anymore.” — RACHEL MADDOW“Once you’re the first president in American history who’s under counterintelligence investigation by the F.B.I.”
“I don’t know but Mike Flynn’s pleading the Fifth.”
“What are they going to be doing?”
“...probe who’s currently working in the White House and isn’t one of the people who’s on the trip with him — and then mysteriously Reince Priebus and Steve Bannon got sent home early today.”
“And so now we’re trying to figure out who the person of interest is in this F.B.I.”
““With this trip, The Washington Post announces Friday night that there’s a significant ‘person of interest’ working actively in the White House as a senior adviser to the president.”
“On “The Late Show,” she told Stephen Colbert that she had begun to feel the Trump administration may have lost some of its ability to manipulate the media.”
“Rachel Maddow recently became the highest-rated cable news host.”


"At this point, the news from the trump administration is the news that people are investigating this and getting to the bottom of it." - Rachel maddo
“…… And it's very likely that in a criminal obstruction of Justice investigation, before you brag on NBC news, you brag to the Russians about something you have committed in public, and you can't do your own news any more. "
"I think they really can't do their own news anymore." - Rachel maddo "once you become the first president in the history of the United States to be investigated by the FBI."
"I don't know, but Mike Flynn is asking for a fifth."
"What are they going to do?"
“…… Find out who's currently working in the White House, not the people he's visiting with - and then the mysterious Raines pribas and Steve Bannon were sent home earlier today. "
"So now we want to figure out who's involved in the FBI."
"The Washington Post announced Friday night that there is an important 'stakeholder' working actively in the White House as a senior adviser to the president."
"On the evening show, she told Stephen Colbert that she had begun to feel that the trump administration might have lost some of its ability to manipulate the media."
"Rachel maddo has recently become the most watched cable news anchor."



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.25888324873096447
Correct number is  51
Total number is  197
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
